Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Book ``The Tragedy of the Submarine ``Komsomolets'': </F>
Designer's Arguments'' by Dmitriy Andreyevich Romanov, 
Assotsiatsiya izdateley Sankt-Peterburga, 5,00'0 copies, 189 
pages] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Annotation </H5>
  The author of this book--the assistant chief designer of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets''--offers his interpretation of the 
tragedy that played itself out in the Sea of Norway on 7 April 
1989. His opinion regarding the causes of the accident and 
demise of the submarine, which is based on documented testimony, 
contradicts the conclusions reached by the government commission. 
  This book is intended for a wide range of readers. 
  This book was published with the assistance of the 
Nuclear- Powered Submarine ``Komsomolets'' Memorial Charity. 
  Profit from the book's sale will be used to provide 
assistance to families of deceased submariners. 
<H5>  From the Author </H5>
  On 7 April 1989 an accident occurred aboard the Soviet 
nuclear- powered submarine ``Komsomolets'' in the Sea of Norway, 
as a result of which the submarine sank, and a large part of its 
crew tragically perished. 
  A government commission created to reveal the causes of the 
accident contained representatives both from the USSR Navy and 
from the Ministry of Ship Building Industry. 
  In the course of the commission's work, members of its 
working group from ship building industry who directly 
participated in the submarine's construction--chief delivery 
agent V. M. Chuvakin, delivery mechanic E. P. Leonov and 
assistant chief designer D. A. Romanov--arrived at a special 
opinion regarding the causes of the accident and the demise of 
the submarine that differed from the opinion of other members of 
the working group representing the navy. However, it was not 
reflected in the materials of the commission's working group. 
This compelled us to write a letter to the chairman of the 
government commission, CPSU Central Committee Secretary O. D. 
Baklanov, but even after this, the opinion of the naval 
engineers influenced the official conclusion of the government 
commission regarding the causes of the accident and demise of 
the submarine to only a most insignificant degree. 
  Appeals by the author of this book in the newspapers 
IZVESTIYA, KOMSOMOLSKAYA PRAVDA, KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, SOVETSKAYA 
ROSSIYA and SMENA and in the journal OGONEK regarding certain 
aspects of the tragedy turned out to be fruitless as well. 
  Thus the opinion of the workers of ship building industry 
regarding the causes of the tragedy of the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' never was brought to the awareness of the 
people, which is what compelled me to write this book. 
  The documentary narrative ``The Tragedy of the Submarine 
``Komsomolets'' '' cannot be considered to be the labor of a 
single author. Many specialists of ship building industry and 
the navy took part in the examination of the tragedy and the 
causes leading up to it, and in the analysis of the events and 
of the actions of the personnel in the fight for the ship's 
survival. The author analyzed the results of their work, and 
used them in the book. 
  The author is deeply grateful to Sevmashpredpriyatiye 
Production Association workers V. M. Chuvakin, E. P. Leonov and 
V. A. Vybornykh (the enterprise's assistant chief designer), and 
to designers and sector and division chiefs of the Rubin Central 
Design Office of Marine Engineering for their active support and 
invaluable assistance in writing this book. 
  The author is also grateful to his numerous opponents, whose 
arguments, often unobjective or incompetent, promoted a more 
careful examination of all aspects of the tragedy, and made it 
possible to confirm the conclusions presented here for the 
judgment of readers. 
  D. A. Romanov 
<H5>  Foreword </H5>
  This work by marine engineer and submarine designer D. A. 
Romanov is devoted to a tragic event in the history of the 
Soviet Navy--the disaster that occurred on 7 April 1989 in the 
Sea of Norway with the deep-sea nuclear-powered submarine 
``Komsomolets''. 
  From the first days the author was actively involved in 
designing, building and commissioning the submarine 
``Komsomolets'', and he participated personally in the most 
critical trials and practical tests of the specific 
possibilities of the unique ship as a whole, and of the 
technical concepts embodied in its design. 
  A deep knowledge of all of the circumstances of the tragedy 
and a high level of technical erudition combined with honesty 
and principles led the author to his own opinion regarding the 
causes of the accident aboard the submarine ``Komsomolets'' and 
the subsequent demise of it and its crew of 42. 
  In the book offered here to the reader, D. A. Romanov 
persuasively demonstrates that the main cause of the tragedy in 
the Sea of Norway was something other than technical 
imperfections in the ship's design or insufficient reliability 
of the equipment installed aboard the ship--in this regard the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'' differed favorably from most Soviet 
submarines. 
  The incompetency of higher officials of the navy in matters 
regarding crew training and personnel work, poor development of 
the navy's infrastructure, and stagnation and irresponsibility 
in the leading directorates of the navy are the main causes of 
the navy's high accident rate. This is precisely the cause which 
led to the fact that Captain 1st Rank Ye. A. Vanin's poorly 
trained crew was sent off on that fateful cruise aboard the 
ill-prepared submarine ``Komsomolets''. 
  The refusal to recognize this fact does nothing for the 
honor 
of the naval leadership. Rejecting the obvious and protecting 
``the honor of the uniform,'' the naval leadership is not 
taking any steps to fundamentally reorganize naval service. 
  The designer's truthful and honest narrative will be useful 
both to specialists in ship building industry and to naval 
personnel in service afloat of all ranks. 
  Hero of the Soviet Union, Vice Admiral (Reserve) Ye. D. 
Chernov 
<H5>  What Is This Book About? </H5>
  Different hypotheses regarding the causes of the tragedy of 
the Soviet nuclear-powered submarine ``Komsomolets'' have been 
stated in numerous articles published in a number of newspapers 
and journals by representatives of the navy. Their essence 
reduces to the following: 
A. a fire occurred as the result of an electrical equipment 
fault; 
B. the temporal proximity of the fire and leakage of air 
systems predetermined the high intensity and swiftness of the 
fire's development, and rendered fire extinguishing resources 
ineffective. 
  What in the opinion of naval representatives helped the 
accident to come about? Let's listen to the opinion of workers 
of the Main Naval Staff: ``As far as causes bringing about the 
accident are concerned, numerous technical imperfections in the 
submarine's various systems should be named first. Their 
presence may be attributed entirely to things left undone by the 
designers and ship builders, and to the impermissible liberalism 
displayed during the ship's acceptance trials.''[.sup]1[/] 
  And he concluded: ``Despite the self-sacrificing and 
technically competent actions by the personnel, it was 
impossible to save the submarine.'' 
  And any critical remarks regarding the actions of the 
personnel and their occupational training were met ``with 
bayonets'' by the navy's ``royal host,'' which was not averse to 
falsifications and obvious slander. 
  Soviet and foreign experience in designing new models of 
military equipment shows that there is no such thing as 
absolutely safe equipment, and unfortunately its operation is 
always associated with the probability of accidents, 
unpredictable in many cases. Throughout all time, military 
equipment was created on the basis of the latest scientific and 
technical accomplishments, and naturally it unavoidably fell 
within the zone of maximum technical risk. Nuclear-powered 
attack submarines are the most complex, potentially dangerous 
and vulnerable objects in this respect. The especially high fire 
danger they present is a consequence of the high levels of power 
flowing through the compartments, the proximity of combustible 
materials and working media to equipment presenting a fire 
danger, imperfections in resources monitoring conditions in the 
compartments, and the limited possibilities of available fire 
extinguishing resources. 
  At the same time we cannot agree with N. Cherkashin's 
assertion[.sup]2[/] that the fire and explosion danger of 
submarines corresponds to locating a powder magazine in a 
gasoline storage area, and that submariners live in an 
environment in which death awaits them at any second. There is 
no need for extremes either in embellishing the life of 
submariners or in inflating the horror. Service aboard 
submarines is harsh and difficult even without these horrors. 
And no break areas, swimming pools, canaries and artificial 
grass can do anything to make it significantly easier. 
  Designers creating and testing submarines are constantly 
concerned with improving the equipment, raising its reliability 
and reducing the degree of technical risk, but it is impossible 
to totally exclude the probability of accidents. Under these 
conditions the theoretical training and practical skills of 
every crewmember--that is, the professionalism of the people 
operating the complex and potentially dangerous equipment--have 
always had the decisive role, and will continue to do so. It is 
the professionalism of the crew that actually influences the 
situation and events in a submarine's compartments before and 
during an accident, prevents or, in the opposite case, promotes 
the advent and development of an accident situation, and 
determines the effectiveness of the personnel's actions in 
recovering from the accident. Captain 2d Rank (Reserve) V. V. 
Stefanovskiy, the former chief engineer of a naval ship repair 
plant, and currently the senior watchman of a gardening 
cooperative, was right a thousand times over when he said: 
``Competent seamen can deal with an accident. Responsible seamen 
won't let one happen.''[.sup]3[/] For this truthfulness, 
Vladimir Vladimirovich did have to make a career change. 
  The submarine ``Komsomolets'' did not differ in any way from 
modern submarines currently in operation in terms of the 
composition of combat and technical resources, including its 
control systems and its damage control systems. It was accepted 
in 1983, and in August 1984 it was commissioned. 
  ``After its commissioning, the submarine underwent 
experimental operation for several years. The reliability of the 
design concepts and the correspondence of operating 
characteristics to calculated parameters were checked out during 
this period. The trials were carried out intensively in the most 
varied navigation conditions, including in totally 
self-contained navigation. As with any other trials, certain 
problems did occur, but not a single serious breakdown ever 
occurred. The submarine crews gave a high evaluation to its 
operating properties on the basis of their navigation 
experience.''[.sup]4[/] 
  We should add to this that all of the trials, as well as 
experimental operation and subsequent patrol duty, were carried 
out by the first crew under the command of Captain 1st Rank Yu. 
A. Zelenskiy, with the participation of a group of specialists 
from the USSR Ministry of Ship Building Industry in the stage of 
experimental operation. In 1988 the submarine was recognized as 
an outstanding submarine, and it was awarded the name 
``Komsomolets''. Captain 1st Rank Ye. A. Vanin's crew was the 
second crew of this submarine, and the cruise that began on 28 
February 1989 and ended in the tragedy of 7 April was its first 
independent cruise. 
  While giving credit to the heroism and bravery of the 
crewmembers, we need to objectively evaluate their actions 
during the accident, so as not to allow repetition of such cases 
in the future due to wrong and biased conclusions based only on 
real and imaginary imperfections of a submarine. In this case I 
cannot but agree with Vice Admiral Ye. D. Chernov's 
opinion[.sup]5[/] that any distortion or toning down of 
information, even out of the most humane motives, is immoral in 
relation to submariners serving patrol duty. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UST-003LC-03A>           Preparation of the Submarine ``Komsomolets'' for Launching </FIG>




  [Text] We will also examine the 
``numerous technical imperfections'' supposedly present in this 
submarine, which in the opinion of the naval leadership helped 
to bring about the accident. 
  And we will describe measures being undertaken to raise the 
reliability of submarines currently in operation. 
<H5>  The Crew </H5>
  According to the detail design, the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' 
should have been serviced by highly qualified specialists from 
among officers and warrant officer technicians. 
  According to the manning table approved in 1982 by the 
General Staff of the USSR Ministry of Defense, the submarine's 
crew was 57 persons (29 officers with rank not below senior 
lieutenant, 26 warrant officer technicians and two 
compulsory-service petty officers). In this case the engineering 
department (BCh-5) should have consisted of 10 officers and 10 
warrant officer technicians. 
  But later on the crew was increased to 64 persons without 
industry's consent, and warrant officer technicians were 
replaced by compulsory-service seamen, supposedly in connection 
with difficulties in manning crews with warrant officers, and 
for the purposes of economizing resources. However, this 
automatically reduced the crew's potential in terms of its 
combat and occupational training. This change in the crew's 
qualitative composition had an especially great effect on the 
damage control and electrical engineering divisions of 
BCh-5--the principal subunits fighting for the ship's survival. 
Thus while in the former the total manning was increased by two 
seamen, one warrant officer technician of three was replaced by 
a compulsory-service seaman, and in the electrical engineering 
division, while the manning was kept the same, two of four 
warrant officer technicians were once again substituted by 
compulsory-service seamen. 
  This reduction of professional level, ``planned'' by the 
navy's elite, affected not only the crew of the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' but also all other submarines. Note that this 
``rationalization'' by the naval leadership was not reflected or 
evaluated in the materials of the government commission. It 
would have been naive to expect this, since the ``Combat 
Training'' section of the working group of the government 
commission, which addressed this issue, consisted entirely of 
fleet representatives who were to one degree or another 
accessory to such stupid bungling, bordering on the criminal. 
  Great was the price paid by the country for such 
``economy''! 
For some reason it was not until after the demise of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'' that the Main Naval Staff came to 
understand that ``the crews of ships of this type should be 
manned only by officers and warrant officers, because 
compulsory-service seamen and petty officers lack the means to 
adequately master operation of a submarine in such a short 
time.''[.sup]6[/] 
  A slight digression: Questions that had not been clarified 
to 
one degree or another by the working group of the government 
commission will be broached subsequently here on several 
occasions. And not because they couldn't be clarified. They were 
not clarified due to active opposition by naval representatives, 
who made up the absolute majority of the commission. 
  In what matter were the circumstances of the submarine 
accident investigated? The members of the government commission 
subjected 16 members of the crew that participated in the cruise 
to only an initial interrogation. In this case most of the 
members of the working group were present, but for practical 
purposes they did not take part in the interrogation. And only 
once did they (a narrow circle persons from the working group) 
visit the hospital for a short time to officially interrogate 
crew members. Unofficially, however, behind the backs of the 
members of the working group representing industry, fleet 
representatives visited the hospital several times, where they 
talked with the crew and exerted certain pressures upon it. This 
is why the explanatory reports of some of the crew members 
differ considerably from what these people had said to members 
of the government commission. ``The survivors talked a great 
deal in the beginning, but then they bit their 
tongues....''[.sup]7[/] 
  And it is absolutely clear that Captain 1st Rank S. I. 
Bystrov was totally inconsistent with reality when he asserted: 
``...surviving ``Komsomolets'' crew members were questioned in a 
fault finding manner by the State Commission, which also 
contains representatives of industry. All unanimously marked the 
high level of special knowledge of the 
submariners.''[.sup]8[/] 
  The working group has a tape recording of the interrogation 
of submarine personnel by members of the government commission, 
the explanatory reports of the surviving members of the crew, 
extracts from the ship's log and extracts from the control log 
of the main propulsion unit. Interrogation of personnel during 
visits to the hospital was not documented. 
  From the very beginning, naval representatives did 
everything 
to prove that the submarine was prepared well for the cruise, 
that the personnel were excellently trained, and that the 
actions of the ship's attack center and the leadership of the 
Northern Fleet were the right ones, and if the submarine sank 
and the greater part of the crew perished, this was at the fault 
of the designer and industrial workers. 
  An extensive campaign to publicize the ``competent'' actions 
of the crew, begun in the press under the leadership of the 
fleet command long before the initial conclusions were reached 
by the government commission, was also directed at concealing 
serious shortcomings associated with manning and training the 
crews, with servicing the submarine and with solving social 
problems. It had nothing in common with real concern for people, 
with the objective of raising the fleet's combat readiness. 
  The administration of the CPSU Central Committee also voiced 
its opinion. A news brief appeared in the 13 May 1989 edition of 
PRAVDA regarding decoration of the crew of the submarine 
``Komsomolets''. The assessment of the crew's professional 
actions had already been made: ``In a critical situation the 
crew acted with maximum bravery and technical competency, 
fighting to save the ship and render it safe.'' Thus the 
administration of the CPSU Central Committee confirmed and 
approved the actions taken by the naval leadership to conceal 
the true causes of the accident. These same ends were also 
pursued by the government commission. 
  But let's return to Captain 1st Rank Ye. A. Vanin's crew. It 
was formed in June 1984. It had underwent combat training, 
passed all of the tests and was brought out to the first 
line[.sup]9[/]by September 1987. Under a point scoring 
system, the crew was fourth in the division, and it had not 
participated in a single independent combat patrol. The 
assertion that this was ``one of the strongest crews one could 
imagine''[.sup]10[/] was quite significantly exaggerated. In 
1988 the crew underwent retraining at the training center, and 
in September it was certified with an unsatisfactory score in 
ship damage control (a letter from submarine commanders of the 
Northern Fleet's First Flotilla sent in August 1989 to CPSU 
Central Committee Secretary O. D. Baklanov). According to my 
information the average score received by the crew in work on 
damage control problems was only 2.7 on a five-point scale. But 
none of this is contained in materials of the ``Combat 
Training'' section of the government commission's working group, 
which consisted of naval representatives only. This fact appears 
in distorted form in N. Cherkashin's articles[.sup]11[/] as: 
``And in the training center where both of the crews had been 
``perfected,'' they hastened to write an unfavorable performance 
report on Vanin, the deceased commander of the ``Komsomolets'', 
second-guessing the usual course of thinking of the supreme 
leadership: ``criminal negligence''.'' 
  In the letter mentioned above from the submarine commanders, 
it is asserted that the crew had corrected the shortcomings 
revealed in work on damage control problems, and completed them 
with a good grade. But knowing the make-up of the command of the 
division to which the submarine ``Komsomolets'' belonged, I dare 
to assert that none of the division's flag-officer specialists 
were well enough versed in the material of this submarine to 
rule adequately on performance in damage control problems. 
  In early January 1989 a conflict occurred in the crew during 
the submarine's preparation for patrol duty. It involved the 
crew's work on ship damage control problems, it was examined at 
an emergency party meeting,[.sup]12[/] and it ended in the 
hospital for Captain 3d Rank A. S. Ternovskiy, the submarine 
deputy commander for political affairs. ``It so happened that 
the crew of the ``Komsomolets'' would not accept the former 
deputy commander for political affairs, and did not wish to go 
out to sea with him'' is how N. Cherkashin explains this 
event.[.sup]13[/] 
  Let's return to the act drawn up by the ``Crew Political 
Morale'' section of the government commission's working group: 
``Captain 3d Rank Yu. I. Maksimchuk was transferred to crew 604 
on temporary duty for the time of patrol duty on 16 January 1989 
in place of the regular political worker, Captain 3d Rank A. S. 
Ternovskiy. Captain 3d Rank A. S. Ternovskiy was not allowed to 
serve patrol duty for health reasons. Prior to patrol duty he 
visited the hospital twice for treatment from 12 January to 27 
January 1989 with a diagnosis of a ``neurological condition, not 
sharply pronounced, situationally predicated'' and from 16 
February to 28 February 1989 with a diagnosis of ``an asthenic 
state, moderately expressed''.'' 
  The places of the cause and effect were deliberately changed 
here. The deputy commander for political affairs wound up in the 
hospital as a result of a conflict and his suspension from 
patrol duty, and not vice versa, as the section of the working 
group indicated above tried to portray this. One need not be a 
great expert in medicine to understand that this ``cause'' of 
Ternovskiy's replacement was clearly fabricated. The members of 
the section also understood this--that could be the only 
explanation for the following supplement to the act: ``In 
resolving the matter of suspending (Now he's suspended, although 
previously it was said that he was disallowed--D. R.) of Captain 
3d Rank Ternovskiy from patrol duty, it was also considered that 
he was unable to carry out his duties in full volume.'' So what 
was the reason for Ternovskiy's suspension? Illness, or his 
``inability to carry out his duties in full volume''? The 
section members never did get around to attentively analyzing 
this conflict, and they didn't talk with deputy commander for 
political affairs Ternovskiy. Obviously they only tried to show 
that there are no shortcomings in the work of the navy's 
political organs, and that there couldn't be any. But this 
brings up the following question: Would the tragedy have 
occurred if the division's political organs had objectively 
dealt with the conflict? 
  And so, by the beginning of the cruise, the crew consisted 
of 
64 persons: 30 officers, 22 warrant officers, and 12 compulsory- 
service petty officers and seamen. In this case eight of the 
officers were lieutenants--that is, 25 percent of the officers 
had served aboard a submarine for about a year after graduating 
from school, and their rank (and consequently their level of 
occupational training) did not correspond to the approved table. 
It should also be noted that damage control division commander 
Captain 3d Rank V. A. Yudin possessed the specialty of a turbine 
engineer--in no way corresponding to the position he 
occupied--and served in this position for only about a year, 
while the division's second officer was a lieutenant and also 
lacked sufficient experience. Moreover one of the two warrant 
officers in the division (Warrant Officer Yu. P. Podgornov) was 
unable to pass the tests, and he was not certified for 
independent control, while two of the three seamen were in their 
first year of naval service. 
  It is clear from this that prior to the ship's departure for 
sea, the crew lacked a damage control division as a full-fledged 
combat unit. And thus the requirements of the ``Manual of 
Submarine Damage Control'' (RBZh-PL-82) were violated. 
  RBZh-PL-82, Article 173: ``Departure for sea is 
prohibited...when a full complement of trained personnel is 
lacking.'' 
  The fact that the requirements of the ``Manual'' were 
violated was not reflected in the materials of the government 
commission. 
  Due to objective causes the submarine crew could not have 
possessed high professional skill and experience in operating 
the material, which ultimately affected the outcome of the 
crew's fight for the submarine's survival. And this was not so 
much the fault as the misfortune of the crew. 
  How are submarine crews trained in training centers? The 
quality of the training is extremely unsatisfactory, because it 
is carried out sporadically, with emphasis on theory, without 
relevance to a particular submarine, especially when it comes to 
carrying out general damage control exercises aboard ship. And 
the centers are poorly supplied even with trainers and training 
displays. 
  The navy also lacks a system of occupational selection of 
submarine crewmembers on the basis of psychological stability in 
extreme situations. ``We aren't cosmonauts,'' one highly placed 
official from the navy told me. Does he really feel that a 
combat patrol by a submarine under fully self-contained 
conditions is any less complex and dangerous a mission than a 
flight into space? 
  Submarine crews are perpetually diverted from combat 
training 
for garrison duty, for housekeeping work and for other 
incidental duties, and this occurs both during construction and 
testing of a submarine and during patrol duty. 
  Training complexes are absent from the permanent stations of 
submarines. And because submarines are provided an 
unsatisfactory supply of electric power and working power 
production units, it is impossible to organize high quality crew 
training aboard the submarine itself. 
  The prestige of serving aboard nuclear-powered submarines 
dropped dramatically in the last two decades because such 
service involved continual relocations, absence of housing, the 
unsettled daily life of the families of submariners, and the 
difficulty of the work itself. Nor are there any prospects for 
providing housing to them upon completion of service. The 
possibility for promotions in rank (and consequently pay raises) 
are limited when a submariner serves permanently in a single 
position. All of this results in high turnover of seagoing 
personnel and limits the possibilities for growth of 
professionalism. The second crews of submarines, which are 
deprived of the possibility for learning from the experience of 
qualified industrial specialists, and upon whom all of the 
listed factors act to a significantly greater degree, find 
themselves in an especially complex situation. Consequently it 
is no accident that most of the worst accidents aboard 
submarines happen with the second crews. 
<H5>  Preparations for the Cruise </H5>
  Routine inspection and maintenance and work to correct 
existing faults were carried out prior to the cruise of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'' in accordance with regulations. 
Considering the complexity and laboriousness of this work, 
according to the technical design documents it should have been 
carried out by a special technical crew with the help of highly 
qualified specialists from the navy's ship repair plants. The 
trial run of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' demonstrated the need 
for creating such a crew. But one was not created. 
  In order that the full volume of routine maintenance and 
inspection could be carried out within the established time 
aboard a ``Komsomolets'' class submarine, not less than 200-250 
highly qualified specialists must be brought in. The navy's 
repair bases do not have such a large number of specialists, and 
they do not participate in routine maintenance and inspection. 
The entire burden of this work is laid upon the submarine crews. 
  ``A ship's officer is responsible for the good working 
condition of his materiel, and must do everything to restore it 
in the event of breakdown,'' declared naval commander-in-chief 
V. N. Chernavin, obviously feeling that there are no problems in 
repairs and routine maintenance and inspection in the 
fleet.[.sup]14[/] 
  But in reality submarine crews are physically unable to 
carry 
out the full volume of routine maintenance and inspection with 
acceptable quality within the 40 days allowed to them. 
Consequently they are forced to compromise with their conscience 
and carry out routine maintenance and inspection basically only 
on equipment that failed or was placed on report during the last 
cruise. The submarine fleet has even evolved a system of 
``failure to failure'' equipment operation. Unsatisfactory 
maintenance of material, and late and poor quality maintenance 
and inspection, resulting from the absence of specially trained, 
highly qualified technical crews and from imperfections in the 
navy's repair service, are noted aboard all submarines of the 
navy, especially after expiration of the warranty period. 
  The supply of electric power and power generators of 
acceptable quality is unsatisfactorily organized at naval bases, 
as a result of which submarines standing at bases must expend 
the life of ship equipment (to avoid malfunction of electronic 
equipment). 
  A system for documenting and certifying completion of 
routine 
maintenance and inspection is absent from the navy, and 
therefore it is practically impossible to check the completeness 
and quality of such work. 
  Everything said here is completely valid in relation to the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'' as well. Moreover the difficulties of 
routine maintenance and inspection aboard this submarine were 
aggravated by the absence of a set of documents concerning 
refits between cruises. An order of the Main Naval Command 
placed the responsibility of drafting these documents on a 
specialized naval enterprise, but the order was not carried out. 
  None of these issues were reflected in the materials of the 
government commission, which is fully natural at least because 
Vice Admiral V. V. Zaytsev, who as the chief of the navy's Main 
Directorate for Operation and Repair was responsible for the 
unsatisfactory equipment of submarine bases and the quality of 
repairs and routine maintenance and inspection, was appointed 
chairman of the ``Operation and Damage Control'' section of this 
commission's working group. 
  Being aware that the situation concerning routine 
maintenance 
and inspection and repairs by navy personnel was so unfavorable, 
the workers of ship building industry suggested in their letter, 
cited above, to CPSU Central Committee Secretary O. D. Baklanov, 
that the industry's companies should service submarines over the 
course of their entire life. This proposal was shamelessly 
distorted in the 8 August 1989 edition of KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, in 
which the need for company service was explained by the low 
quality of submarine construction. 
  But let's return to the submarine ``Komsomolets''. As is 
confirmed in the joint act of two sections of the government 
commission's working group, ``Operation and Damage Control'' and 
``Ship Building,'' the ``Komsomolets''set out to sea for patrol 
duty in serviceable condition. 
  To what extent does this assertion correspond to reality? 
The 
work order for refitting of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' 
between cruises, which was signed off by division commander Rear 
Admiral O. T. Shkiryatov and approved by flotilla deputy 
commander Rear Admiral L. B. Nikitin, foresaw repair of 
television system equipment (one of the television cameras of 
this system was in compartment 7 of the submarine) and the 
oxygen gas analyzer for compartment 7 (items 7 and 71 of the 
work order). No documents attesting to completion of these 
repairs were presented. According to a statement by naval 
representatives the repairs were carried out by floating ship 
repair dry dock No 7, but they were unable to say who carried 
them out, and who accepted the equipment after repairs. Let's 
turn to the joint act of the two sections, mentioned above: 
``The sensor of the MN-5134 automatic oxygen gas analyzer of 
compartment 7 failed on the 10th day of the cruise,'' and ``The 
television system failed during the navigation period prior to 
the submarine's accident.'' 
  What is this, a chance occurrence or a definite pattern? 
There are full grounds for suggesting that the submarine set out 
on its cruise with a faulty gas analyzer and a faulty television 
system. In any case no measures were undertaken to clarify the 
circumstances associated with repair of this equipment. Neither 
the section chairman, Vice Admiral V. V. Zaytsev, nor members of 
the section representing the navy's Main Directorate for 
Operation and Repair were interested in clarifying this, because 
all of the shortcomings in the organization of ship repair, for 
which these people were personally responsible, would be 
revealed. 
  And this was apparently not the only equipment that was 
faulty prior to the cruise. During the work of the government 
commission in the city of Severomorsk, at my request Captain 1st 
Rank M. V. Petrovskiy, chief mechanical engineer of the Northern 
Fleet, telephoned the hospital and asked Lieutenant A. V. 
Zaytsev by specifically what means (batch [portsionnyy] or 
emergency) the end groups of ballast tanks were blown. 
Lieutenant Zaytsev replied that emergency blowing was carried 
out, because the batch blowing system was ``not in operation.'' 
It follows from this reply that the submarine went to sea with a 
faulty system of batch blowing of ballast tanks. 
  An examination of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' with 
deep-sea 
submersibles in August-September 1991 revealed that it lacked an 
aft outboard television camera. Review of video tape showing the 
location at which this camera is secured permits a categorical 
conclusion--the television camera had been removed from the 
submarine at the base, prior to its cruise. Such are the facts. 
  RBZh-PL-82, Article 173: ``Departure for sea is 
prohibited...in the presence of faults in the hull, technical 
equipment or rescue devices.'' 
  It is difficult to say how much a working television system 
could have helped the submarine's attack center to correctly 
estimate the situation in compartment 7 and adopt the necessary 
damage control decisions, but one thing is clear--there is no 
doubt that its breakdown played a negative role. As far as the 
oxygen gas analyzer is concerned, its role in creating the 
accident situation in compartment 7 will be discussed later. 
  Prior to the patrol the ``Komsomolets'' took aboard stores 
of 
provisions, bed linens, underwear, warm clothing and other gear 
and supplies for 69 persons intended for full self-sufficiency; 
in this case part of these provisions and supplies (including 
bread) were stored in compartment 7, even though their storage 
here is not foreseen by the design documents. And despite this, 
the government commission's working group failed to establish 
either the assortment or the quantity of provisions and gear in 
compartment 7. The joint act of the two sections simply states: 
``The following may be noted among conditions contributing to 
fire in compartment 7: ...presence of 500 kg of bread, for which 
alcohol is used as a preservative, during the cruise in 
compartment 7.'' We should add to this that in the initial stage 
of the commission's work the figure was 1,000 kilograms of 
bread. But by calculation, there should have been not less than 
2,000 kilograms of bread in compartment 7 at the moment of the 
accident. 
  It was revealed during investigation of the accident's 
circumstances that in accordance with a decision of the 
corresponding higher ``father-commanders,'' chocolate in the 
emergency rations was substituted by sugar. It was unpleasant to 
listen to the childish prattle of admirals attempting to justify 
this outrage by a chocolate shortage. It is true that our 
country is living through hard times. But there is no shortage 
of this kind, and there cannot be one, when the discussion turns 
to submariners, and all the more so to emergency rations for 
them. But the shortage of conscience and responsibility revealed 
itself fully. It is shameful to write about this, but I 
must--otherwise next time the ``geniuses'' in the navy will put 
sugar coupons in the emergency ration instead of chocolate, and 
will then justify this by the long lines at the stores. 
  Such was the ``readiness'' of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' 
for the difficult cruise. 
<H5>  The Cruise </H5>
  And so, on 28 February 1989 the submarine ``Komsomolets'' 
set 
off on its cruise. 
  On 8 August 1988 the naval command and the USSR Ministry of 
Ship Building Industry adopted a joint decision to use the 
``Komsomolets'' purposefully, in a special scientific research 
program. This program was developed and forwarded to the 
Northern Fleet and to the naval leadership for coordination and 
approval. But to satisfy its own internal plans the command of 
the Northern Fleet tasked the submarine for ordinary patrol 
duty, which could have been carried out by any of dozens of 
other submarines in the fleet. Thus highly scientific research, 
including research of a defensive nature, was interrupted in 
this way. When this question was brought up at a meeting of the 
government commission with the press on 28 December 1989, 
division deputy commander Captain 1st Rank B. G. Kolyada 
suddenly announced some sort of ``second program of all kinds of 
tests'' supposedly being carried out by the fleet since August 
1988.[.sup]15[/] Vice Admiral V. V. Zaytsev, the chief of the 
Naval Main Directorate for Operation and Repair, had something 
somewhat different to say about this in his conclusion to the 
``Analysis of the Personnel's Damage Control Actions Aboard the 
Submarine ``Komsomolets'', '' carried out by a group of 
specialists from the Naval Academy imeni N. G. Kuznetsov under 
the leadership of Vice Admiral Ye. D. Chernov: ''...the mission 
posed for this patrol duty (That is, the submarine's last 
cruise.--D.R.) was to carry out scientific research together 
with hydrographic research vessels from 14 April to the end of 
May 1989.'' In confirming this, Captain 1st Rank Kolyada and 
Vice Admiral Zaytsev apparently forgot, and perhaps did not even 
know, that official documents exist saying the reverse. 
Northern Fleet chief of staff Vice Admiral Yu. N. Patrushev 
communicated in letter No. 47/0220 dated 17 February 1989 that 
the scientific research program ``cannot be carried out in 1989 
because the plan for utilization of ships in 1989 approved by 
the naval commander-in-chief did not foresee use of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'' in a special program.'' Chief of the 
Main Naval Staff Fleet Admiral K. V. Makarov confirmed the 
decision of the command of the Northern Fleet to carry out 
scientific research beginning in 1990 in his directive No. 
725/559/KP dated 7 March 1989. Such are the myths and realities 
regarding the goals of the last cruise of the submarine 
``Komsomolets''. 
  According to division deputy commander Kolyada, during the 
cruise there had been no remarks regarding the condition of the 
materiel, with the exception of one breakdown of the rudder 
control system (the fuse burned out). This fault was quickly 
corrected. In addition the television system broke down on the 
13th-14th days of the cruise, and never was fixed. Crew members 
said nothing during their interrogation by the government 
commission about the fact and time of breakdown of the oxygen 
gas analyzer in compartment 7. This was revealed only during a 
visit to the hospital, but the date of its breakdown never was 
ascertained. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UST-003LC-08A>           The Submarine ``Komsomolets'' on Patrol </FIG>




  [Text] Seven April 1989 rolled around. 
The submarine was traveling at a depth of 386 meters at a speed 
of 8 knots, if we are to believe the ship's log, while if we 
believe what was said by division deputy commander B. G. Kolyada 
and remote control division commander Captain Lieutenant I. S. 
Orlov when they were interrogated by the government commission, 
at a speed of 6 knots. According to entries in the ship's log 
the compartments were inspected at 1100, and no remarks were 
entered. 
  In accordance with the Ship Regulations and RBZh-PL-82, 
compartments must be inspected during a cruise every half-hour, 
and the inspection results must be entered in the ship's log in 
the control room. 
  RBZh-PL-82, Article 183: ``During inspection of 
compartments the correspondence of the condition of the hull, 
weapons and technical resources to requirements of the 
guidelines must be meticulously verified, and the presence or 
absence of signs of emergency situations and conditions for them 
must be verified.'' 
  Watch duty is actually lax aboard many submarines, 
compartments and equipment are not inspected, and compartment 
and inspection reports are made only as a formality. The 
submarine command is fighting this attitude toward duty, but 
without results as yet. I am not going to assert that this was 
the way things were in Captain 1st Rank Ye. A. Vanin's crew 
also, but this cannot be excluded. 
  I can already hear the disdain of defenders of ``clean 
uniforms'' and the accusations of slander against the navy and 
of other mortal sins. This whole set of standard accusations has 
been voiced many, many times in our press. But I have something 
to respond with to this. 
  A so-called ``Compartment Readiness Command and Information 
System'' (KISGO) is installed in submarines built in recent 
years. In addition to other things, this system contains the 
following equipment: Buttons are installed in different places 
in each compartment. The number of buttons in a compartment is 
selected depending on the size of the compartments, and in order 
to ensure that the entire space of a compartment is covered by 
these buttons. The compartment inspection report is accepted by 
the watch mechanic only if the compartment watchstander first 
presses all of the buttons in succession. It is assumed that as 
he successively presses the buttons, the compartment 
watchstander will look around and thus ``carry out inspection of 
the compartment.'' That's how far our glorious navy has gone! 
  The submariners know this, and the command knows it, they 
know it, and are quiet about it, which is no less shameful than 
this fact itself. 
  Consequently it's not to them that I make my appeal. I am 
appealing to the mothers and fathers, to the wives and children, 
to the sisters and brothers of submariners. Ask your sons, 
husbands, fathers and brothers how they managed to get to a 
point in their lives where submarine designers are compelled to 
create an ``electronic cattle prod'' to force the submariner to 
do something upon which his life and the welfare of his 
relatives and family depend. 
<H5>  Fire! </H5>
  And so, an inspection of the compartments was conducted at 
1100. 
  From the ship's log: ``1100--rudder 5ë port. 
Course-- 222ë. Compartments inspected. No remarks. Oxygen 
concentration 0.2 percent. Battery ventilation system in 
'hydrogen combustion' mode. Vacuum equals 35 mm 
H[.sup]2[/]0.'' 
  And suddenly: 
  ``1103. Course--222ë. Deliver LOKh to compartment 
7!''[.sup]16[/] 
  What happened within these 3 minutes of ship's log time? How 
do they correlate with real events and temporal parameters? 
  I have before me the ``Extract From the Draft Ship's Log of 
the Nuclear-Powered Submarine ``Komsomolets'' '' authenticated 
by the Northern Fleet chief of staff Vice Admiral Yu. N. 
Patrushev. The first conclusion: Two types of ship's logs exist 
in the fleet-- draft and final. The successes of ship crews in 
combat and political training are evaluated on the basis of the 
final copy, while the draft copy reflects the actual level of 
these successes. This double ``bookkeeping'' does nothing to 
improve the discipline of the crew during watch duty, it doesn't 
nurture the personnel's ability to maintain the ship's log with 
the needed completeness and quality, and it doesn't raise the 
sense of responsibility of command personnel for their 
decisions. On the contrary it creates good soil for slovenliness 
and falsification. 
  So what are we told by the entries in the ship's log for 7 
April 1989 from midnight to the time when the command ``Deliver 
LOKh to compartment 7!'' resounded like a shot? There are no 
entries in the ship's log for compartment inspections at 0800 
and 1000. Signatures attesting to relief of the second watch 
section from watch and assumption of the watch by the third 
watch section are absent. The lack of information regarding the 
submarine's operation was already discussed. There are no 
entries in the control log for the main propulsion unit 
regarding the shaft RPM at the moment of the watch's relief at 
0800. 
  All of this gives no indication of a high level of 
professional training and work discipline in Captain 1st Rank 
Ye. A. Vanin's crew. 
  A system automatically documenting commands from the attack 
center and messages from the duty stations would have been a 
great help in clarifying the circumstances of the first minutes 
of the accident. Such a system is present aboard submarines, 
although it is very imperfect. There was one aboard the 
``Komsomolets'' as well. However, as a rule submarine crews do 
not make a practice of using this system in their day-to-day 
activities, and they do not use it at times of accidents. 
  So at what time was compartment 7 actually inspected, and 
was 
there a report of its inspection? It does not seem possible to 
answer this question categorically. During the interrogation by 
the government commission Captain Lieutenant S. A. Dvorov and 
Lieutenant K. A. Fedotko said that they had personally heard a 
report from the watchstander for compartment 7, Senior Seaman N. 
O. Bukhnikashvili, regarding inspection of the compartment, and 
they cite a time of 1058 and ``around 5 minutes before all of it 
began.'' Lieutenant A. V. Tretyakov believes that the report was 
at 1100. But all of this information is made doubtful by the 
following responses from the senior watch officer, Captain 
Lieutenant A. G. Verezgov, to questions of the government 
commission (interrogation tape recording): 
  Question: ``Did you hear the report from compartment 7 
that everything was well?'' 
  Answer: ``I didn't hear this report personally. The 
fact is that the watch officer's console or, more accurately, 
desk is located a slight distance away from the command post of 
BCh-5. Therefore when he receives reports, the watch mechanical 
engineer reports to me. He reported to me that the submarine had 
been inspected, without remarks, somewhere around 1100. As a 
rule the watchstanders make their reports (well, that's the way 
we did it) 5 minutes before the scheduled time.'' 
  Question: ``Are these messages transmitted by 
loudspeaker?'' 
  Answer: ``That's right, they're transmitted by the 
``Listvennitsa''[.sup]17[/], from the compartments.'' 
  Question: ``And you didn't hear a single report?'' 
  Answer: ``The fact is that he (The watch mechanical 
engineer.--D.R.) keeps the volume down a little. He makes it so 
that only he could hear, not so that it would be silent, but so 
that only the watch mechanic could hear, without distracting the 
rest of the personnel serving watch at other stations.'' 
  Captain Lieutenant Verezgov, who was the watch officer, was 
closest of all to Captain 3d Rank V. A. Yudin, who received the 
compartment inspection reports. Still, he did not hear the 
reports from the compartment watchstanders. Captain Lieutenant 
Dvorov and Lieutenant Fedotko heard these reports, although they 
were farther away from the watch mechanic. 
  Thus all that remains is to suppose that a report had been 
transmitted by the watchstander for compartment 7, and that the 
time of the report may have been 1055, and even earlier. 
  So when did the fire start? One thing is clear: This 
happened 
before 1103, when the command to deliver LOKh to compartment 7 
was given. 
  Here is what participants of the tragedy have to say about 
this (interrogation tape recording): 
  Warrant Officer V. V. Gerashchenko: ``Around 5 or 10 
minutes before 1100 the lights, especially the incandescent 
lamps, began blinking in the gyro-compass room. I went up to the 
monitoring equipment of the ``Mindal'' power supply system. It 
was my duty to check the power supply parameters once every 4 
hours. I checked them. All of the parameters seemed to be 
normal. The blinking lights were powered by the ship's general 
power network. My instruments have their own power supply.'' 
  This was apparently the first manifestation of the fire's 
start. The time was probably 1055. The fire continued to grow. 
  Captain Lieutenant V. A. Gregulev: ``The technician 
said that voltage drops had been observed before the accident, 
which was noticeable from the sound of the fan--that is, power 
was fluctuating 2 or 3 minutes before the alarm.'' 
  Lieutenant K. A. Fedotko: ``I was the engineer of the 
electronic navigation group. I was at my console, on watch in 
the control room. When Yudin said that the temperature in 
compartment 7 was over 70ëC...'' 
  Question: ``You heard that yourself?'' 
  Answer: ``Yes, I did. Senior Lieutenant Markov was 
sitting at the ``Onega'' console. He looked troubled. I used the 
``Listvennitsa'' system to report to the gyro-compass room that 
the electricians might be switching the systems. I told the 
warrant officer in the gyro-compass room to turn his attention 
to the work of the navigation system.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. V. Gerashchenko: ``This is when 
Lieutenant Fedotko, who was the watch navigator, said: 
``Vasiliy, how are things going? The electricians seem to be 
doing something there''. '' 
  All of this confirms that if a report had been made 
regarding 
inspection of compartment 7, it was made at 1055. 
  Was discovery of the fire reported to the attack center, and 
when? Let's listen to the crew members: 
  Lieutenant A. V. Zaytsev (explanatory report): ``When I 
heard the alarm signal I went from my cabin to the ``Molibden'' 
control console. I relieved Captain 3d Rank Yudin, the damage 
control division commander, at the console. I heard him say to 
Captain 2d Rank Babenko, BCh-5 commander: ``There's a fire in 
compartment 7.'' Bukhnikashvili reported the fire, after which 
two thuds could be heard, like the sound of air-lock doors 
closing.'' 
  Captain 1st Rank B. G. Kolyada (interrogation tape 
recording): ``I believe that at 1 minute before 1100 Seaman 
Bukhnikashvili reported that compartment 7 had been inspected, 
that there were no remarks, and that the gas composition of the 
air was 20 percent oxygen. And literally just a few minutes 
later a report was transmitted from compartment 7: ``Damage 
control alarm, fire in compartment 7,'' but none of the 
survivors heard this.'' 
  A few comments on Kolyada's statement. The captain 1st rank 
is the only surviving crew member who recalls information on the 
oxygen concentration in compartment 7 in the watchstander's 
report, even though he was not present in the attack center 
during the reports of the watchstanders concerning inspection of 
the compartments; moreover the figure he gives for the oxygen 
concentration in compartment 7 is significantly below the 
permissible norms (21.5-23 percent), and in practical terms this 
could not have been. There's an obvious discrepancy here, which 
makes us suppose that during his interrogation by the government 
commission, Kolyada concealed the possible cause of the fire. 
  Relying on the testimony of Lieutenant Zaytsev and Captain 
1st Rank Kolyada, we can assume that the watchstander for 
compartment 7 reported the fire before 1103. But this absolutely 
refutes the official version of the navy concerning the 
compartment fire, which was presented later on in a joint order 
of the USSR Minister of Defense and the USSR Minister of Ship 
Building Industry. And so a metamorphosis occurs: ``The fire in 
compartment 7 began with an explosion, and consequently it would 
be blasphemous to accuse deceased Senior Seaman N. 
Bukhnikashvili of acting in a manner different from his actions 
in training exercises. He was stunned, killed in the very first 
seconds of the accident,'' declared Kolyada in the 15 January 
1990 edition of IZVESTIYA. 
  As far as I know no one has ever accused Senior Seaman 
Bukhnikashvili. On the contrary his actions during the accident 
were apparently fully competent: He reported the fire, fought 
the flames using an air-foam fire extinguisher, and he perished 
in this fight. But then, we can ask the captain 1st rank an 
impartial question. When was he speaking the truth, before the 
government commission or when he was being interviewed by the 
writer N. Cherkashin? The answer to this question is clear. 
Kolyada's entire interview, beginning with incompetent notions 
regarding an ``experimental vessel'' and ending with the 
shameful assertions that the crew had dealt with the fire with 
minimum sacrifices (apparently the demise of a submarine and 42 
crewmembers is a minimum sacrifice!), was false and unobjective. 
  The joint order cited above states that ``at 1103 the 
compartment became fully involved with fire of great intensity, 
causing a leak in the high-pressure air system, which brought 
about a rapid increase in pressure and temperature in 
compartment 7.'' There are no grounds for such an assertion. As 
was mentioned earlier, a command to use the fire extinguishing 
system had already been given at 1103, meaning that the fire had 
started at this moment. Certain conditions had to exist in the 
compartment for it to become fully involved: Flammable materials 
had to be distributed throughout the entire compartment (spilled 
or sprayed oil, fuel etc.). Consequently the compartment could 
not have been a ``fully involved'' right from the start. It 
became fully involved later on. This logical conclusion is 
reinforced by entries in the ship's log and the testimony of 
surviving members of the submarine crew. Tentative calculations 
show that if compartment 7 had in fact become fully involved 
from the very beginning, the consequences of the accident would 
have been minimal. 
  Why did naval representatives find it necessary to 
``condense'' the initial stage of the fire's development, and 
invent a story about a fully involved compartment ``rapidly 
causing a leak in the high- pressure air lines''? There was but 
one goal--to justify the delay and the incompetent actions of 
the submarine's leadership in the initial period of the 
accident, and to prove that it was impossible to save the ship, 
and that the crew could not have taken any more- radical actions 
in the fight for the submarine's survival. This point of view 
was advantageous to the bureaucratic command system of the 
military-industrial complex. This deception was also aided by 
the unprincipled, conniving policy of the leadership of the 
design office. 
  Be that as it may, what might have caused the fire? The 
joint 
order cited above states that ``a fire in electrical equipment 
of the rudder hydraulic system pump starting station or in the 
oil separation system due to maladjustment of controlling 
devices and this equipment's safety system was the possible 
primary cause of the submarine's disaster.'' And as a reluctant 
concession to opponents, it was added that ``this may have been 
promoted by a possible increase in the oxygen concentration in 
the compartment's atmosphere above the permissible level.'' But 
in the government commission's report there is absolutely no 
mention of oxygen as one of the possible causes of the tragedy 
that occurred aboard the submarine. The ``royal host'' of the 
navy won the battle! 
  But why did the government commission select the versions 
mentioned above as the possible primary causes of the accident? 
According to these versions, it appears at first glance that 
there are no clear culprits for the fire, which suited the naval 
leadership and the party apparatus, and it didn't hurt the USSR 
Ministry of Ship Building Industry very much--that is, it suited 
everyone. 
  What was at the basis of the versions accepted by the 
government commission? 
  The ``pump'' version. It is assumed that as a 
result of breakdown of automatic system components, rapid 
spontaneous switching on and off of the starting stations of one 
of the hydraulic system pumps (a so-called ``bell'' effect) 
began, which caused burning of contacts, the appearance of an 
arc discharge, and ultimately a fire in the compartment. 
However, an experiment conducted by the government commission's 
working group on the work of a starting station in ``bell'' mode 
produced a negative result even when the oxygen concentration in 
the atmosphere was high. In real conditions, work of the 
starting station of the hydraulic system pump aboard the 
submarine in ``bell'' mode would have been noticed by the 
operator at the ``Molibden'' console, and the faulty pump would 
have been disconnected with no consequences to the compartment. 
Moreover the pump's malfunction would have also been detected by 
the watchstander for compartment 7, and it could have been 
contained here as well. 
  Crew testimony revealed that the warning signal 
``Temperature 
in compartment 7 above 70ëC'' lit up first, and only after 
that or simultaneously with it did the warning signal ``Low 
insulation resistance'' light up. This alone completely excludes 
the version suggesting that the fire in compartment 7 had an 
electrical cause. The government commission's working group 
established that it was most probable that the fire began in the 
fore section of compartment 7, on the port side--that is, away 
from the location of the hydraulic system pump starting 
stations. In short, the government commission's working group 
had no objective data of any kind to substantiate this version. 
  The ``separator'' version. The oil separation 
system contains an electric oil heater. It is suggested that oil 
overheated in the oil heater while the separator was not 
working, resulting in boiling of the oil, followed by a flash 
and a fire (oil in a working separator would not become 
overheated to the flash point). An experiment confirmed the 
possibility of such ignition of the oil heater over a period of 
around 15 minutes. The oil heater was located in the fore 
section of compartment 7, on the port side--that is, within the 
zone of the supposed initiation of the fire. However, the oil 
separation system was disconnected early in the morning on 7 
April, and it was not working before the accident. The oil 
heater connecting circuit is interlocked with the pressure relay 
(the oil heater can be switched on only when the separator is 
operating) and with the temperature relay, which turns off the 
oil heater when the oil temperature exceeds the permissible 
limit. 
  This version may be accepted if we allow the following 
assumptions: 
  1. The pressure relay and the temperature relay failed 
simultaneously (which is practically excluded), or they were 
deliberately blocked and were in the ``on'' position. 
  2. The watchstander for compartment 7 deliberately turned on 
the oil heater without turning on the separator, which is 
prohibited by the operating instructions. 
  3. The watchstander for compartment 7 left the compartment 
after turning on the oil heater (according to the experiment 
intensive production of smoke from the oil heater began in the 
8th-10th minute, which the watchstander would certainly have 
noticed, and he would have switched off the oil heater). 
  4. The operator at the console of the main propulsion unit 
paid no attention to unsanctioned engagement of the oil heater. 
  Thus if we assume that this version is possible, we would 
have to say that the fire in compartment 7 arose due to the 
personnel's grossest violations of instructions and manuals on 
equipment operation, or due to deliberate sabotage. But in 
promoting this version as the primary cause of the accident, the 
government commission's working group shamefully remains silent 
about its preconditions. 
  Neither of these versions explains the high intensity with 
which the fire developed in the initial stage, or all the more 
so, the fable that the compartment supposedly became fully 
involved right from the very beginning. And in order to end the 
analysis of these versions, we turn the floor over to Captain 
1st Rank Kolyada (interrogation tape recording): 
  ``A telegram reporting an accident aboard the submarine 
``B-354''--a distribution panel catching fire--was received on 
the fourth (The reference is to 4 April 1989, 3 days before the 
accident.--D.R.). The fleet commander ordered an inspection of 
all cable routes, and of the condition of distribution panels 
and electrical equipment. I gave the command to inspect all of 
the electrical equipment that day. On the fifth at 2100 the 
commanders of all departments reported that the electrical 
equipment had been inspected. There were no remarks.'' 
  Let's believe Kolyada in this matter, all the more so 
because 
there is not even a hint in all of his statements to the press 
that the submarine's electrical equipment may have been the 
cause of the fire. 
Second, no ``fundamentally conflicting actions'' were required 
of the crew. Under these circumstances compartment 7 should have 
been sealed off in order to preclude the spread of the fire and 
of smoke gases into other compartments, and simultaneously with 
this, there should have been controlled relief of excess 
pressure from the distressed compartment through one of the ship 
systems (preferably through the ship's pumping system) with the 
purpose of reducing the intensity of the fire and ensuring the 
strength of the bulkheads of the distressed compartment. None of 
this was done aboard the submarine. 
  Third, concealing the truth, the authors of this postulate 
unwittingly introduced the harmful and mistaken idea into the 
consciousness of submariners that when accidents occur, there 
may be circumstances which create dead-end, impossible 
situations--that is, they demoralize and disarm submariners 
regarding accidents before the fact. 
  But let's return to the submarine ``Komsomolets''. 
  The command to open the first and second shut-offs of the 
exhaust line of the fore and aft rings of the ship's ventilation 
system was given simultaneously. 
  As soon as the ``Korund'' console caught fire an 
announcement 
was transmitted through the ship: ``Damage control alarm! Fire 
in compartment 3!'' There are no entries to this effect in the 
ship's log. However, the testimony of crewmembers and the logic 
of the development of subsequent events permit the categorical 
assertion that an alarm signal was sounded after 1122. 
  Warrant Officer A. M. Kopeyka (explanatory report): ``A 
damage control alarm, a fire, was announced, the ``Korund'' 
control console was burning in compartment 3, this was 
communicated to us by BC-1 [navigation department] commander 
Captain Lieutenant Smirnov, because the loudspeaker 
communication alarm line failed, while communication with the 
navigator's console was still functioning.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. V. Gerashchenko (interrogation tape 
recording): ``Everything happened so fast. An order was given 
for everyone to connect up to the DA. A few minutes later the 
navigator told me over the ``Listvennitsa'': ``Fire in 
compartment 3,`` Korund'' (the rudder control console) 
burning.'' Ventilation and cooling were lost right away, and 
``Temperature exceeded'' warning lights appeared. I reported 
this to the navigator.'' 
  In response to the command ``Damage control alarm! Fire in 
compartment 3!'' personnel of compartment 2 deenergized the 
distribution panel No. 7 of compartment 3 in accordance with 
requirements of Article 91 of the RBZ-PL-82. 
  The command apparently also reached compartment 5, and 
complying with the requirements of Article 91 of the RBZ-PL-82, 
the personnel of this compartment deenergized distribution panel 
RShCHN No. 6 of compartment 3. 
  The fact of disconnection of distribution panels RShchN 
No. 7 and 6 is confirmed by Warrant Officer A. M. Kopeyka 
(explanatory report): ``...the second ventilation ring was 
working, but the temperature kept increasing, because it was not 
tied in (That is, not connected.--D.R.) to all instrument 
stands. When we requested power to RShchN No. 7/1 and RShchN No. 
6/1 in order to supply the main ventilation ring, no one could'' 
[do anything]. 
  Distribution panels RShchN No. 7/1 and 6/1 receive power 
from 
distribution panel RShchN No. 7 and 6 respectively. 
  Thus not only the electric fan of the first (main) ring of 
the navigation complex's cooling system but also the electric 
pump of the diesel generator's cooling system, the exhaust fans 
of the ship's general ventilation system, and the electric fan 
of the cooling system of the combat data processing and control 
system were left without electric power. This was one of the 
reasons why an order to stop the diesel generator was given at 
1145. Because of this, it was impossible to begin venting 
compartment 3 in time, and for a long time the control room 
personnel were forced to wear ShDA apparatus, which made 
submarine damage control difficult. Nor could venting of the aft 
compartments be started in time. 
  Concluding our examination of this issue, we should say that 
after the fire in the ``Korund'' console was put out, the attack 
center did not transmit the command ``All clear from the damage 
control alarm ``Fire in compartment 3!'','' and it did not order 
delivery of power to distribution panels RShchN No. 7 and 6, 
which was another mistake by the submarine's leadership. 
  Testimony by Warrant Officer Kopeyka regarding the work of 
the second cooling ring of the navigation system needs to be 
clarified. The electric fan of the second cooling ring is 
supplied from sections of the disconnectable load of the main 
distribution panels; it was deenergized immediately after the 
reactor's emergency shielding was activated. Considering that 
instruments of the navigation system connected to the second 
ring were cooled by means of an open ventilation cycle, the 
temperature conditions of these instruments were ``milder'' 
during the accident because of natural air circulation, than 
those experienced by instruments which were connected to the 
first ring and which were cooled by means of a closed 
ventilation cycle. This apparently created the illusion in the 
warrant officer that the second ring of the navigation system 
instrument cooling system was working. 
  Pressure began to rise in compartment 5. 
  Lieutenant A. V. Zaytsev (supplement to explanatory 
report): ``Monitoring air pressure in the submarine's 
compartments, at the moment the fire began at the ``Korund'' 
control console I noticed an insignificant rise in pressure in 
compartment 5, on the order of 0.5 kg/cm[.sup]2[/].'' 
  Captain Lieutenant S. A. Dvorov (interrogation tape 
recording): ``I was in constant communication, and I gave the 
command for all of the men to stay in the central passage. It 
was very steamy in the vicinity of the turbopump circulating 
units, and my glasses were fogging over. The temperature grew. 
All of the men were connected up to IPs.[.sup]32[/] The 
pressure began increasing to 2.5 kilograms. We switched over to 
IDA-59 equipment. The pressure continued to rise.'' 
  A clarification is needed here. In his explanatory report 
Captain Lieutenant Dvorov made reference to pressure in 
compartment 5 equal not to 2.5 kg/cm[.sup]2[/] but only 0.5, 
and this was apparently the case. In addition according to the 
RBZh-PL-82, IP-6 self- contained breathing protective masks may 
be used only to an excess pressure of not more than 0.2 
kg/cm[.sup]2[/] in compartments. When the personnel put on 
the face masks of the IDA-59 self- contained breathing 
apparatus, two of them were torn, which is why Seaman V. Yu. 
Kulanin and Warrant Officer S. S. Bondar were forced to hook up 
to ShDA apparatus, which predetermined their subsequent fate. 
<H5>  Who Discharged the VPL System? </H5>
[.sup]33[/] 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1123--``Bukhta'' operating 10 minutes without 
cooling. Deenergize ``Sinus.'' Deenergize ``Korund''.'' 
  The ``Bukhta'' radar station was working without cooling. In 
a little while it would be disconnected as well. From this 
moment on, the submarine would be left without electronic 
observation resources. 
  The command was given to deenergize the ``Sinus''--the power 
supply system of the submarine's automatic equipment control 
system. There was no need to deenergize the entire power supply 
system of the automatic equipment control system in order to put 
out the fire in the ``Korund'' console. For this, it would have 
been enough to deenergize the ``Korund'' system. When the 
``Sinus'' system is deenergized, remote control and monitoring 
of all of the submarine's technical resources is lost, with the 
exception of the reactor's emergency shielding and certain 
especially important ship systems supporting ship damage control 
efforts (such as the emergency main ballast tank blowing 
system). It is not known if this command was carried out. The 
entry ``Deenergize ``Korund'' '' should be understood, due to 
the illegibly written suffix, as `` ``Korund'' deenergized.'' 
The command to deenergize the ``Korund'' system had been given 
at 1122. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1127--VPL delivered to ``Korund.'' Shut-offs 1 and 2 
opened. Fire extinguisher brought to TsP. Open flames have 
appeared on the ``Korund.'' Gas concentration and visibility in 
TsP rising ((Sic).-- D.R.). VPL recharging in first. Out of the 
TsVK.[.sup]34[/] Burning in vicinity of 7th.'' 
  Lieutenant A. V. Tretyakov (supplement to explanatory 
report): ``The fire in compartment 3 was put out as follows: 
Captain 1st Rank Burkulakov noticed smoke coming from the 
``Korund.'' Then came the command ``Everyone connect up to 
personal protective equipment! Begin fighting the fire with the 
VPL!'' Taking a socket wrench, Captain Lieutenant Naumenko 
unfastened the lid from the console, where he saw flames licking 
out. The VPL dispenser and hose were carried over.'' 
  They were unable to put out the console fire. It turns out 
that the VPL system was discharged. 
  Lieutenant A. V. Zaytsev (interrogation tape 
recording): ``We tried to use fire extinguishers. The first 
produced a little foam, and then went dead. If it had produced 
normal foam, the fire would have been put out completely.'' 
  We don't know if other fire extinguishers were used as well, 
but one thing is clear--it cannot be said that the quality of 
the submarine crew's preparation for the cruise was high. 
Because there turned out to be nothing with which to put out the 
``Korund'' console fire, a command was given to recharge the VPL 
station in compartment 1. 
  According to Article 91 of RBZh-PL-82, in case of fire the 
personnel must monitor the status of the VPL station and 
recharge it promptly without orders from the attack center. 
However, personnel of compartment 1 did not monitor the status 
of the VPL station, and did not recharge it promptly, which made 
it impossible to immediately put out the fire in the console of 
the ``Korund'' rudder control system. 
  Warrant Officer S. R. Grigoryan (supplement to 
explanatory report): ``VPL was recharged in compartment 1 in 
response to a command from the TsP. During recharging I noticed 
that the VPL pressure was 15 kg/cm[.sup]2[/], while before 
the regulator it was 150 kg/cm[.sup]2[/]. And the pressure 
steadily decreased.'' 
  The fire in compartment 7 continued. Air from the 
medium-pressure air line, and possibly from the outboard air 
line, continued to feed it. No one took any steps to stop the 
bleeding of air into the distressed compartment. At this time a 
report of steam build- up in the vicinity of compartment 7 was 
transmitted from the bridge at this time--this is the only 
possible interpretation of the ship's log entry presented above. 
Lining plates began separating away from the right side of the 
submarine's outer hull, in the vicinity of main ballast tank No. 
10, which was noted by Captain Lieutenant Verezgov. It may be 
supposed that entry of smoke from the digital computer complex 
was discovered at this time. 
  And while they are recharging the VPL system in compartment 
1, let's analyze why the system was uncharged. There was no 
unanimous opinion in this regard in the government commission's 
working group. Industrial representatives felt that the VPL 
system had been discharged by the watchstander for compartment 7 
as he fought the fire. Naval representatives asserted that the 
VPL system was discharged in compartment 5 after combustible 
gases ignited within it. The ship's log has no entry regarding 
such a deflagration in compartment 5. Nor was the time of this 
deflagration noted in Captain Lieutenant Dvorov's testimony. 
When questioned by the government commission he reported that 
the deflagration occurred 10-15 minutes before normalization of 
pressure in compartment 5-- that is, in the period from 1151 to 
1156, since according to the ship's log, pressure was cut off 
from compartments 4 and 5 from 1206 to 1218. It is stated in an 
explanatory report written later on that the deflagration 
occurred 10-15 minutes after the alarm-- that is, in the period 
from 1116 to 1121. 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (explanatory report): 
``While the temperature of the bulkhead between compartments 5 
and 6 was being measured, the VPL reel was unwound in the 
central passage of compartment 5. There was a puddle of brown 
water beside the bell mouth, and air was hissing out from it. It 
was the same with the reel in the enclosure of the 
turbocirculation pump unit. I shut the valves.'' 
  It follows from Warrant Officer Kadantsev's report that the 
VPL line was leaking in compartment 7, and that air was passing 
from it into compartment 5. Moreover the last time the VPL 
system was used was in compartment 5--otherwise foam would have 
streamed out of the open hoses after the VPL system was 
recharged, and personnel in compartment 5 would have noticed 
this, and shut the ``Korund''. Consequently the VPL system in 
compartment 5 had already been used prior to this time. We 
should add to this that because of high pressure in compartment 
7 (around 10-12 kg/cm[.sup]2[/], practically no foam was 
expended in it during this period. 
  Captain Lieutenant S. A. Dvorov (supplement to 
explanatory report): ``When the fire started in compartment 5, I 
personally reported the fire in the compartment to the TsP on 
the damage control telephone, but I got no answer from the GKP.'' 
  Lieutenant A. V. Zaytsev (explanatory report): 
``Immediately after surfacing, the ``Korund'' console began 
smoking in the control room. Captain Lieutenant Naumenko and I 
started putting it out. It was reported from compartment 5 that 
there was a fire in compartment 5. After VPL station No. 1 was 
recharged, the fire in the ``Korund'' control console was put 
out.'' 
  Lieutenant A. V. Zaytsev (supplement to explanatory 
report): ``Fires were reported from compartments 4 and 5 almost 
simultaneously with putting out the fire in the ``Korund'' 
console. The report from compartment 4 indicated the specific 
place of the fire. Information regarding the fire in compartment 
5 was provided by the executive officer and the BCh-5 
commander.'' 
  Captain 1st Rank B. G. Kolyada (interrogation tape 
recording): ``There was no communication with compartment 5, and 
we did not learn of the fire in it until the compartment was 
opened. The commander of compartment 5 reported that they had a 
fully involved fire.'' 
  How do we reconcile the contradictory reports by Lieutenant 
Zaytsev and Captain 1st Rank Kolyada? Especially if we consider 
that in the supplement to his explanatory report, Lieutenant 
Zaytsev clearly ``tried harder'' to please the naval leadership. 
During the time that the fire in the ``Korund'' console was 
being put out, it could not have been that ``Fires were reported 
from compartments 4 and 5 almost simultaneously,'' since the 
report of fire in the starting station of the first loop pump in 
compartment 4 was received by the attack center before the fire 
started in the ``Korund'' console, which is documented in the 
ship's log. This fact casts doubt upon Zaytsev's testimony 
regarding a fire in compartment 5. Still, the submarine command 
did apparently receive the report of a deflagration in 
compartment 5. 
  Was information on the fire in compartment 5 reflected in 
the 
actions of the submarine command? Let's look at the ship's log: 
  ``1146--Report temperature in compartment 5. 
  1147--Lines of defense in compartment 4--fore and aft 
bulkheads, in 3--the aft bulkhead.'' 
  These entries in the ship's log are nothing other than a 
reaction by the submarine command to the report they received of 
a deflagration in compartment 5. We can categorically assume 
from these entries that the deflagration occurred in compartment 
5 at around 1146. Thus Senior Seaman N. O. Bukhnikashvili, the 
watchstander for compartment 7, not only reported the fire but 
also fought it using the VPL system, as a result of which the 
system was discharged. 
  It is necessary to go on at such length about all of this 
simply because the naval members of the government commission's 
working group, who ignored the facts, insisted upon the legend 
of a ``fully involved fire'' from the very beginning of the 
accident, and asserted that the VPL system had been discharged 
by personnel of compartment 5. 
<H5>  List Control </H5>
  RBZh-PL-82, Article 84: ``When the main ballast tanks 
are damaged but water does not enter the pressure hull of a 
surfaced submarine, right the submarine in accordance with 
documents on keeping a damaged submarine afloat and the RBITS, 
and monitor the submarine's attitude more closely, blowing as 
necessary the undamaged main ballast tanks not equipped with 
kingston valves as they fill.'' 
  As was mentioned earlier, the ``Manual on Combat Use of 
Technical Resources'' (RBITS) had not been written by Naval 
Institute No. 1 for the submarine ``Komsomolets''. The 
submarine's attitude was not monitored during the entire 
accident. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1134--List to port increasing. Main ballast tank 
blown, list 8ë.'' 
  Another mistake by the attack center. Pressure in 
compartment 
7 was growing due to entry of air into it from the 
medium-pressure air (VSD), outboard air (VZU) and 200 
kg/cm[.sup]2[/] high- pressure air (VVD-200) lines. Hot air 
entered the right main ballast tank No. 10 together with 
combustion products through the damaged emergency blowing line, 
and purged it. This caused the list to port to grow. The 
submarine command did not even try to determine the reason for 
the increasing list. No one checked the status of the ballast 
tanks. Instead of this they repeatedly blew the end groups of 
the main ballast tanks. They uselessly expended the 
high-pressure air reserve and added fresh air to compartment 7, 
which intensified the fire. There are no grounds for asserting 
that even after this, the valves of the emergency blowing system 
of the aft group of main ballast tanks, located on air cofferdam 
No. 4 in compartment 7, worked spontaneously, because the watch 
officer at the bridge did not note spontaneous blowing of these 
tanks. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1136--VPL delivered a second time to ``Korund''. '' 
  1137--Transmit damage control signal. ``Korund'' fire 
put out. Damage control signal transmitted. Open supply line's 
clack valve.'' 
  The VPL system was recharged, and the fire in the ``Korund'' 
console was put out with it. The damage control signal was 
prepared for transmission 19 minutes previously, but it was not 
until this time that it was first transmitted. The consequences 
of this delay have already been discussed. There was a great 
deal of smoke in the attack center and all of compartment 3. It 
was impossible to start up the exhaust fan of the forward ring 
of the ship ventilation system because of the absence of power 
at distribution panel RShchN No. 7. Because of the absence of 
cooling, the diesel generator was working at low rpm, and it was 
unable to remove smoke gases from compartment 3. Under these 
conditions the submarine's leadership apparently decided to 
start up the electric supply fan of the forward ring of the ship 
ventilation system, and gave the command to open the outer clack 
valve on the ventilation supply line. 
  Lieutenant A. V. Zaytsev (explanatory note): ``It was 
impossible to start up the supply fans.'' 
  The electric supply fans of the ship ventilation system 
received electric power from disconnectable load sections of the 
main distribution panels; they were deenergized after the 
reactor's emergency shielding was activated. 
  The command to open the clack valves was apparently not 
carried out. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1142--No communication with 6. Command to open clack 
valve transmitted from 3 to 4 by tapping on wall. 
  1143--Clack valve opened on exhaust...4 and 5. List 
correcting itself.'' 
  The attack center is still unaware of the fire in 
compartment 
6. This is the only way that the entry regarding absence of 
communication with it can be interpreted. It is unclear in this 
case how Captain Lieutenant Dvorov could be so certain that he 
reported the fire in compartment 6 to the command. 
  At the same time the command to open the clack valve of the 
exhaust ventilation system between compartments 4 and 5 was 
transmitted to compartment 4 by tapping on the wall, apparently 
to reduce pressure from compartment 5 through the exhaust line 
of the forward ring of the ship ventilation system. But there 
was no one to carry out this command, because Lieutenant Makhota 
and Warrant Officer Valyavin were helpless in the instrument 
enclosure. 
  How do we interpret the two conflicting entries differing by 
2 minutes: ``List increasing'' and ``List correcting itself''? 
What was done by the personnel to correct the list? The ship's 
log is silent about this. Lieutenant Zaytsev, the operator of 
the ``Molibden'' console, is also silent. And what do the other 
participants of the tragedy have to say? Here are two 
explanatory reports: 
  Captain Lieutenant I. S. Orlov: ``There was a report 
``No. 1 TsNPK station is burning'' from compartment 4, after 
which there was no more communication. My subsequent actions 
were as follows: While monitoring the cooling process, in 
response to a command from BCh-5 commander Captain Lieutenant 
Nezhutin and I, the commander of the remote control division, 
opened and closed the vent valves of the right main ballast tank 
No. 5 to correct the list manually.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev: ``When the submarine 
surfaced, it was listing to port. To right it, the right main 
ballast tank No. 5 and the right main ballast tank No. 7 were 
filled.'' 
  Flooding of the right main ballast tank No. 7 will be 
discussed later on; for now let's analyze the matter of the 
right main ballast tank No. 5. The hydraulic drives of the vent 
valves of this tank (shut-offs 1 and 2) are located practically 
beneath the chair of the operator of the main propulsion unit 
console; quite naturally, therefore, console operator Captain 
Lieutenant Orlov should have helped to open the tank vent 
valves. At the end of the tragedy warrant officer Kadantsev 
personally blew the right main ballast tank No. 5 on orders from 
the BCh-5 commander. In this connection there are no grounds for 
believing the testimony of Orlov and Kadantsev. 
  And so, in order to correct the list to port the decision to 
flood the right main ballast tank No. 5 was made in the attack 
center. What can be said about this decision? First of all, a 
list of even 8ë is not dangerous from the standpoint of 
maintaining the submarine's transverse equilibrium, and 
sacrificing buoyancy reserve on it is highly unsuitable. Second, 
before the submarine's list was corrected, the reason for it 
should have been clarified, which was not done. Third, neither 
the instructions nor the training manual recommend correcting 
list by flooding the ballast tank in the middle group. In this 
case if the decision had been made to correct the ship's list, 
the ballast tank of the forward group should have been flooded. 
This would have made it possible not only to correct the list 
but also to trim the submarine. The main danger to a submarine 
is the loss not of transverse but of longitudinal equilibrium. 
Such that on the whole, the decision of the submarine command to 
flood the right main ballast tank No. 5 was incompetent. 
  Nonetheless, the right main ballast tank No. 5 was flooded, 
but the list was not corrected--on the contrary, it increased 
somewhat. That should be the interpretation of the entries in 
the ship's log for the period from 1141 to 1143. 
  Why did this happen? Prior to the accident the submarine was 
at a depth of 386 meters. At this depth the main ballast tank 5 
should have been connected for blowing by powder gas generators. 
During emergency surfacing, in all probability ``Molibden'' 
console operator Lieutenant Zaytsev did not connect the tank to 
the high-pressure air blowing line, and the submarine surfaced 
with main ballast tank No. 5 unblown. When the vent valves were 
opened, water from the tanks on the right side drained off down 
to the water line, which resulted in a certain increase in list 
to port. This was apparently so much of a surprise to the attack 
center that it tempered its eagerness to fight listing for a 
long time. In addition the carelessness in blowing the tank is 
in all probability the main reason why Lieutenant Zaytsev 
concealed the fact of flooding of the right main ballast tank 
No. 5. 
<H5>  Fire in Compartment 5 </H5>
  What happened in compartment 5 after pressure in it 
increased 
to 0.5 kg/cm[.sup]2[/] and continued to increase? Let's 
listen to tape recordings of the interrogation. 
  Captain Lieutenant S. A. Dvorov: ``At this moment a 
major explosion or fully developed fire--I don't know what to 
call it-- arose in compartment 5. Blue flames shot along the 
entire passage from the fore to the aft bulkhead like from a 
flamethrower from a height of 1 meter above the deck all the way 
up to the ceiling. The sheaf of flame passed by, clothing and 
hair caught fire, and a minute later it was gone. The people put 
out the burning clothing. Serious burns were suffered by Volkov 
(his hands) and others. The fire traveled from bow to stern 
along the central passage. I believe that this was oil vapor, 
possibly from oil tanks of the TTsNA [not further identified] 
turbopump units. That's what I think.'' 
  Question: ``Where did the oil vapor come from?'' 
  Answer: ``I think through the oil tank venting system. 
Nothing was switched.'' 
  Question: ``What do you estimate the temperature to 
have been prior to that major explosion?'' 
  Answer: ``At first it was not very high, not less than 
50ëC, but after the deflagration Kolya Volkov's mask melted. 
There was no smoldering or fire below. After the explosion we 
were in the central passage. I believe that the explosion 
occurred when I switched off the turbopump unit's oil pump.... 
Pressure dropped after the explosion, coming to normal 10-15 
minutes after the explosion. Visibility in the smoke was 1-1.5 
meters.'' 
  Seaman Yu. V. Kozlov: ``There was no fire. There was no 
intense flame. It was like a deflagration. I can't explain this. 
Lying on my right side, I could see from the corner of my eye 
that something passed by, there was a bluish deflagration. It 
took about a second. It burned my hand.'' 
  What was the cause of the deflagration in compartment 5? 
There are two versions regarding this question. In one, oil 
vapor caught fire. This is possible only if hot gases entered 
one of the oil tanks of the TTsNA turbopump units from 
compartment 7 through the oil separation line, which may not 
have been reset in its initial position after work (before the 
accident). These gases may have heated the oil, and its vapor 
may have been carried through ventilation pipes into the central 
passage of compartment 5. According to the other version, 
ignition of incomplete combustion products passing from 
compartment 5 to compartment 6 occurred. Naval representatives 
in the government commission's working group believe in this 
case that incomplete combustion products entered through the 
suction system's line and through seals in the TTsNA turbopump 
units, and lay responsibility for this ignition upon the 
designer, because this line cannot be shut off from the 
direction of compartment 5 (this design error was discussed 
earlier). 
  It is true that this pipeline, which has a diameter of 50 
millimeters, cannot be shut from the direction of compartment 5. 
It can be shut only from the direction of compartment 6. But 
300- millimeter diameter lines carrying spent steam from the 
TTsNA turbopump units could have been shut both from the 
direction of compartment 6 and from the direction of compartment 
5, but this was not done. And most of the incomplete combustion 
products may have traveled from compartment 6 through a system 
of seals into compartment 5 via the spent steam line, and not 
the suction system line. In addition calculations showed that it 
would have been impossible for the pressure in compartment 5 to 
increase to 0.5 kg/cm[.sup]2[/] as a result of entry of gases 
through the system of seals on the TTsNA turbopump units in the 
time from 1118 (the moment supply of steam to the units stopped 
due to activation of the reactor's emergency shielding) to 1122. 
This would have required not less than 30 minutes. Consequently 
if we accept this version, then we would have to agree that the 
incomplete combustion products entered compartment 5 chiefly 
through another system, and particularly the pressure equalizing 
line between compartments 5 and 6. The valve of this line is 
always open under normal operating conditions, and it may have 
been closed after some delay during the accident. The 
deflagration itself passed through the central passage of 
compartment 5--that is, near the location of the outlet of the 
pressure equalizing line, and not along the sides where the 
turbopump units were located. 
  Which of these versions is plausible? 
  In order to establish this, we need to return to Captain 
Lieutenant Dvorov's testimony: 
  ``Compartment 5 was sealed off. Considerable steaming 
was observed in the vicinity of TTsNA units No. 1 and 2. They 
were stopped, which was checked by tachometers'' (explanatory 
report). 
  ``The compartment was sealed off, the TTsNA turbopump 
units were already idle at this moment. I think that the 
reactor's emergency shielding had activated'' (interrogation 
tape recording). 
  It follows from this that the personnel had not stopped the 
TTsNA units themselves. Nor were they stopped by the main 
propulsion unit console operator, because they could be stopped 
only after the main turbogear unit and the turbogenerators went 
off line. Nor could the TTsNA units have been stopped after 
activation of the reactor's emergency shielding, as Captain 
Lieutenant Dvorov proposes, because after cessation of steam 
delivery, the units would be driven by an electric drive 
supplied from distribution panels RShchN No. 8 and RShchN No. 9 
of the nondisconnectable load sections of the main distribution 
panels. 
  The units can be stopped only by their own safety system 
(their stopping as a result of closing of the circulating line's 
clack valves is not an issue, because closure of the clack 
valves did not occur). Of the factors to which the response of 
the safety system of TTsNA units is foreseen (excessive rpm and 
temperature of the electric drive, oil system pressure), only a 
pressure drop in the oil system could have led to complete 
stoppage of the units. Establishment of this fact permits the 
assertion that the oil separation system was not set in its 
initial position, and gases passing through the oil tanks of the 
TTsNA from damaged compartment 7 caused foaming of the oil, 
which resulted in a pressure drop in the oil system's pressure 
line and activation of the emergency safety system of the units. 
Simultaneously, smoke gases carried oil vapor into the central 
passage of compartment 5, which was the cause of the 
deflagration within it. 
  However, there is one other side of the problem regarding 
the 
designer's mistake: Had the first and second crews of the 
submarine practiced damage control problems well, this design 
error would have been revealed right away, and corrected. 
  Analyzing the fire in compartment 5, we can make the 
following conclusions. 
  1. The color of the deflagration was bluish, which is a sign 
of an elevated oxygen concentration in the compartment. 
  2. The deflagration did not start a fire in the compartment, 
which says something about the rather high fire resistance of 
the ``Komsomolets'' submarine. 
  3. After their use, the hoses of the air-foam fire 
extinguishing system were left with open valves, which in the 
absence of people in compartment 5 led for practical purposes to 
this system's failure. 
<H5>  ``Shut Subgroup Valves!'' </H5>
  The fire in compartment 7, which was fed by air from 
high-pressure air cofferdams No. 1, 3 and 4, continued. The 
quantity of air entering compartment 7 exceeded the quantity of 
air bled overboard, and pressure in compartments 6 and 7 
continued to grow. Leaking of hydraulic pipes in compartment 7 
led to loss of fluid from the ship hydraulic system. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1145--Three distress signals transmitted. No 
acknowledgement.[.sup]35[/] Diesel cooling system not 
working. Shut off diesel. Establish communication with chemical 
service chief. 
  1146--Report temperature in compartment 5. 
  1147--Diesel stopped. Lines of defense in compartment 
4-- fore, aft bulkheads. In 3--fore bulkhead.'' 
  As was said above, Captain Lieutenant Dvorov's report of the 
deflagration in compartment 5 was received. The submarine 
command designated new lines of defense. In this case an order 
was apparently given from the attack center to compartment 5 
personnel to move to compartment 5. This can be the only 
explanation for designating the lines of defense in compartment 
4 and for the next entry in the ship's log: 
  ``1158--No communication with 4. Approximately nine men 
in 4.'' 
  This order to personnel of compartment 5 was not received, 
or 
it could not be carried out because the airlock door was jammed. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1150--Find what's wrong with the diesel's cooling 
system! Order from the commander: Summon the ship's surgeon to 
the control room, and calculate the time of relief of pressure 
from compartment 6. 13 atmospheres in compartment 6. 
  1153--Markov to find out what's wrong with the diesel's 
cooling pump power supply.'' 
  At 1150 the pressure in compartments 6 and 7 was equal to 13 
kg/cm[.sup]2[/], compared to a 10 kg/cm[.sup]2[/] design 
strength of the bulkheads. This was the first and last entry 
concerning pressure in the compartments in which specific values 
were indicated. The pressure probably continued to grow for some 
time more in the compartments. The decision to calculate the 
time of relief of pressure in the distressed compartments sounds 
very strange. A process of change in pressure in the distressed 
compartments was proceeding out of the control of the attack 
center. The attack center did nothing to contain and stop this 
process, but it did perform calculations having no practical 
value. In addition it would have been naive to suppose that the 
watchstander for compartment 6 might still have been alive at 
this time. 
  Lieutenant A. V. Zaytsev (explanatory note): ``The 
BCh-5 commander suggested relieving pressure through the salvage 
line. But it was already too late for me to do this, because the 
systems controlling and monitoring the positions of fittings in 
compartments 6 and 7 were out.'' 
  One could have tried to relieve pressure from compartments 6 
and 7 (with regard for possible loss of air-tightness of the 
rubber-coated metal branch nozzle in compartment 7) through the 
pipeline through successive work of the main bilge pumps by 
opening the valve and kingston valve in compartment 3 manually. 
But in order to make this decision, one had to have a good 
knowledge of the ship's pumping and salvage systems. In this 
particular situation of inactivity, forcing reduction of 
pressure in compartments 6 and 7 would have led to the earlier 
demise of the submarine. 
  The command to prepare for start-up of the diesel generator 
was given at 1117. Thirty-six minutes went by, and the personnel 
were unable to start the diesel generator's cooling pump. The 
reason is simple: The diesel generator's distribution panel 
receives power from distribution panel RShchN No 7, which was 
deenergized by personnel of compartment 2 in response to the 
command ``Damage control alarm! Fire in compartment 3!''. Under 
these conditions it would have been sufficient to awaken the 
generator, and the cooling pump would have been started off of 
the diesel generator itself. The crew's poor knowledge of the 
material was the reason why the diesel generator was stopped. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1156--Pressure concentration in compartment 6 being 
relieved. VII. (Sic.--D.R.). No information on pressure, 
temperature in 7, no communication. 
  1157--Seaman Filippov feeling poorly. Sent up. 
  1158--All who have communication, contact the control 
room. Air bleeding in compartment 3. The reason, oh boy, not yet 
determined (Sic.--D.R.). Shut down cofferdam high-pressure air 
valves, close subgroup valves in 1. No communication with 4. 
Approximately nine men in 4.'' 
  Thus the start of the decline in pressure in compartments 6 
and 7 was recorded at 1156. The maximum pressure they 
experienced is unknown. 
  Captain Lieutenant A. G. Verezgov (interrogation tape 
recording): ``...Dvorov told me as he was going up that the 
pressure in compartment 6 was 15 kilograms.'' 
  It is fully possible that the pressure in the distressed 
compartments attained 15 kg/cm[.sup]2[/]. As a result of the 
inactivity of the attack center, according to tentative 
calculations around 6,500 kilograms of air entered compartment 7 
from the high-pressure air system in the time from 1106 to 
1158-- that is, in 52 minutes. This was 20 times greater than 
the volume of the compartment. A kind of ``blast furnace'' was 
created in the compartment--30 to 40 times more powerful than 
the maximum possible fire under ordinary conditions. Tentative 
calculations show that the average temperature within the volume 
of compartment 7 may have been around 800-900ëC. This means 
that in the upper part of compartment 7, where the cable 
lead-ins are located, the temperature was high enough to melt 
aluminum and copper alloys, while in certain places the pressure 
hull's metal may have heated to the recrystalization point. Hot 
gases from the starboard main ballast tank No. 10 and from the 
fire in compartment 7 caused leaking through the cable lead-ins 
of the starboard reserve propulsion system. 
  Where did the pressure from compartment 6 and 7 go? As was 
said earlier, the pressure was bled into other compartments of 
the submarine through the oxygen dispensing and carbon dioxide 
removing lines of the air regenerating system, through the air 
line of the trim system, through the high-pressure air fitting 
remote control pipeline, through the drain line of the hydraulic 
system, and through the system of seals on the TTsNA turbopump 
unit. In addition hot gases escaped through the emergency 
blowing pipe into the starboard main ballast tank No. 10. At 
this time new pathways for gas to escape from compartment 7 
appeared. The operator of the main propulsion unit console had 
not closed the kingston valve of the cooling system of the 
stern-tube gland (when reactor power is limited to 30 percent, 
the cooling system does not influence the submarine's power, and 
in accordance with Article 91 of the RBZh- PL-82 it should have 
been inactivated without orders). The fire caused leaking and 
burning of the rubberized metal nozzle of the stern-tube gland's 
cooling system. Gases began passing from compartment 7 into the 
heated nozzle, and escaped overboard through the open kingston 
valve and the coil of the stern-tube gland's cooling system. The 
hot gases ``eroded'' the gasket on the cable lead-ins of the 
starboard reserve propulsion system, and began escaping into the 
starboard main ballast tank No. 10. The port cable lead-ins did 
not lose their airtightness, because the port ballast tank No. 
10 was filled with water, which provided for intensive cooling 
of the gasket. 
  At this moment another incompetent decision is made in the 
attack center. Rather than shutting the 200 kg/cm[.sup]2[/] 
air pressure line, the outboard air line and the medium-pressure 
air line passing into the aft compartments (three valves had to 
be shut in compartment 3), the command was given to close the 
subgroup valves at high-pressure air cofferdam No. 1, located in 
compartment 1, and at high-pressure air cofferdam No. 3, located 
in compartment 3. This is the only interpretation that can be 
given to the entry in the ship's log: ``Shut down cofferdam 
high-pressure air valves, close subgroup valves in 1.'' 
  In this case they apparently wanted to write the amount of 
air remaining in these cofferdams in the ship's log, but for 
some reason they were unable to do so. From the explanatory 
reports: 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev: ``I shut the subgroup 
valves of cofferdam 3 on orders from the BCh-5 commander.'' 
  Warrant Officer Yu. N. Anisimov: ``The sound of 
high-pressure air bleeding could be heard during the alarm, the 
subgroup valves of cofferdams 1, 2 and 3 were shut on orders 
from the TsP.'' 
  And once again Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev 
(interrogation tape recording): ``In closing the valves of 
cofferdam 3, I discovered that the pipelines from high-pressure 
air to medium- pressure air and from the VZU regulator were 
frosted over. Air was bleeding into the stern from the VVD-400 
system through the regulator. I shut the subgroup valves at 
cofferdam 3, and pressure in it remained at 80 kilograms.'' 
  After fulfilling the command of the attack center to close 
the high-pressure air subgroup valves, the submarine was left 
without air, and for practical purposes without damage control 
resources. 
  Warrant Officer A. P. Kozhanov (explanatory report): 
``You could hear the ballast being blown, and we realized that 
the submarine had surfaced (we understood this from the depth 
gauge and from the rocking), after that the whistling of air 
could be heard for some time longer, after which we could see 
from the pressure gauges that high-pressure air cofferdams 1, 3 
and 4 were completely discharged. In response to a command from 
the TsP we attempted to recharge the fore VPL station, but we 
were unable to do this because of the absence of air in the 
system.'' 
  And that's not all. Personnel of compartments 2 and 3 as 
well 
as two persons in compartment 5 were connected up to ShDA 
apparatus of the stationary breathing system. The attack center 
had to know this, and when it gave the order to shut the 
high-pressure air subgroup valves, the submarine's leadership 
was cutting off, in the direct meaning of this word, oxygen to 
people connected to ShDA apparatus. And it was not long before 
this mistake was paid for. 
<H5>  Reconnaissance </H5>
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1206--Captain 3d Rank Yudin and Lieutenant Tretyakov 
are in compartment 4. Yudin connected up to an IP-6 at 1200. 
Lieutenant Tretyakov connected up to an IP-6 at 1206.'' 
  Forty-five minutes had passed after the last message was 
received from compartment 4, and not less than 20 minutes after 
the report from compartment 5 on the deflagration, but a group 
of scouts was not sent to compartment 4 until 1206. An 
unforgivable delay! After all, the command to prepare the damage 
control party was given back at 1110. Apparently the fight to 
correct the listing swallowed up the time and all of the crew's 
efforts. The damage control division commander went on 
reconnaissance, as if he had no other duties. The cause of the 
submarine's listing to port seemed completely clear, there were 
no problems with main ballast tank No. 5, the sources of smoke 
entering compartments 2 and 3 were determined and shut, steps 
were taken to replenish the high- pressure air reserves, the 
cause of the pressure drop in the distressed compartments had 
been clarified, the draft, trim and longitudinal stability of 
the submarine had been determined, the damage control plan was 
ready, and all tasks facing the damage control division 
commander regarding the accident, as prescribed to him by 
Article 45 of the RBZh-PL-82, had been carried out. But an order 
had been given, and had to be carried out. Captain 3d Rank Yudin 
went on reconnaissance. Obviously this was the sole person in 
the crew who knew the submarine well. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1207--Communication established with compartment 2. 6 
gm/liter in 2--14 men. Connected to SIZ (ShDA),[.sup]36[/] 
feeling satisfactory.'' 
  The carbon monoxide concentration in compartment 2 was 6 
gm/m[.sup]3[/] (there is an error in the ship's log). The 
personnel were connected up to ShDA apparatus. And although they 
were feeling satisfactory for the moment, they were already 
breathing poisoned air from compartment 7. They knew in the 
control room that people in compartment 2 were connected up to 
the system, to which no air was being supplied, but they didn't 
give the order to switch to other individual protective 
equipment. The same thing was also happening with the people in 
compartment 3, who were wearing ShDA apparatus. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1210--Eight distress signals transmitted, no 
acknowledgements. 
  With what words can we comment on this entry, so full of 
tragedy? The situation was desperate. The raging firestorm had 
engulfed four of seven compartments. There had been no 
communication with them for as much as around an hour, and what 
was going on in the compartments was unknown. The level of smoke 
in two of the three remaining compartments was at its maximum. 
It was impossible to start the electric exhaust fan and vent 
compartments 2 and 3. The diesel generator had still not been 
started, and it had not taken on a load. The electric capacity 
of the batteries is not infinite. It would not be long before 
the submarine would find itself without electric power, and 
consequently without communication with the outside world. 
Practically the entire reserve of high-pressure air--the 
principal means of damage control and of maintaining the 
submarine's stability--was gone. Because of the absence of high- 
pressure air, the air-foam fire extinguishing system was 
inactive. It was time to transmit an SOS signal. Had it been 
transmitted at this time, the tender ``Aleksey Khlobystov'' 
could have reached the site of the accident before the 
submarine's demise, and most of the crew would have been saved. 
  But the submarine's leadership apparently did not have 
enough 
courage to adopt an untraditional decision, and radio the 
distress signal in uncoded text. And this is understandable--we 
fear our leadership more than any accident. For such initiative, 
the submarine command would have received harsh treatment, 
despite the fact that there's no official prohibition on 
transmitting an SOS. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ital&gt; 1210--Oil spots on starboard side in vicinity of 7, air 
being bled (from bridge).'' 
  Pressure was dropping in compartments 6 and 7. Air escaped 
from them together with combustion products through the 
starboard main ballast tank No. 10 and the cooling kingston 
valve of the stern-tube gland, which is confirmed by the report 
from the fore bridge. 
  Captain Lieutenant A. G. Verezgov (interrogation tape 
recording): ``And then air started coming out, as if they were 
blowing No. 10 on the starboard side. A large bubble came up 
from starboard.'' 
  Question: ``At what time?'' 
  Answer: ``It's hard to say. My impression is that this 
was happening the whole time. A bubble would escape periodically 
over the course of 2-3 hours.'' 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1211--Situation normal in 1. Hydrogen, oxygen and 
carbon dioxide normal, condition of personnel good. 
  1212--Golovchenko, Krasnov lost consciousness in 
compartment 2. Switch them to IDA,[.sup]37[/] turn on oxygen 
bottle (order from TsP). Open intake in 3. 
  1215--Move unconscious personnel of compartment 2 up. 
VSK[.sup]38[/] ready to take on four men.'' 
  The poisoned air in compartment 7 did its deed: People 
connected up to the ShDA apparatus began losing consciousness. A 
general command to use other breathing equipment in place of the 
ShDA apparatus was not forthcoming. An attempt was made to 
prepare compartment 2 for venting, for which purpose an order 
was given to shut the clack valves controlling intake 
ventilation between compartments 2 and 3. A command to prepare 
the rescue chamber for oxygen decompression treatment was given 
in this same period. 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev: ``Before leaving for 
compartment 4 as ordered by the attack center, I prepared the 
rescue chamber for oxygen decompression treatment'' (explanatory 
report). 
  ``The two bottles in the rescue chamber are not enough 
for oxygen decompression treatment. To do this, we connect a 
rubberized metal hose from the 200-kilogram pressure air line 
through the shaft nozzle. After I did this, I was in the TsP'' 
(interrogation tape recording). 
  The submarine had a single free exit up through the hatch of 
the rescue chamber. Under these conditions the decision to 
prepare the rescue chamber for oxygen decompression treatment 
within it was absolutely wrong. Things did not go farther than 
the preparations. Apparently the submarine's leadership itself 
came to understand the absurdity of this undertaking. But 
preparation of the chamber for oxygen decompression treatment in 
it had further consequences. 
  A report came in from compartment 1. How sharply it 
contrasts 
with the situation in the other compartments! 
  Warrant Officer Yu. N. Anisimov (explanatory report): 
``I heard the damage control alarm while in the washroom in 
compartment 2. In an instant I was in compartment 1, as per the 
emergency bill. I closed the starboard valve supplying oxygen to 
the compartment, and the carbon dioxide valve, sealed off the 
carbon dioxide absorption apparatus, and stopped the fans of the 
battery venting system. Captain Lieutenant Speranskiy used a 
hydroelectric manipulator to close the bulkhead clack valves, 
and Warrant Officer Kozhanov began preparing the ShDA apparatus 
and deenergized electrical equipment not affecting the 
submarine's power and control.'' 
  No more need be said. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1218--Personnel in instrument enclosure of 
compartment 4 kor. R. [transliteration] Personnel can't get out 
of instrument enclosure. Yudin, Tretyakov got out. Men in 
airlock in compartment 5 can't open doors. Krasnov, Golovchenko 
raised to VSK. Grundul came up on his own. Measure gas 
composition in 2, 3. Pressure measured in 4, 5, get personnel 
out. Warrant Officer Kadantsev...connected to IDA 20 minutes. 
Open hatches of compartments 4 and 5. Udovl. 
[transliteration]'' 
  Lieutenant A. V. Tretyakov (interrogation tape 
recording): ``Went with Yudin to scout compartment 4. The status 
of compartment 4: high level of smoke and gas, moved around by 
touch. Pressure was high in the instrument enclosure of 
compartment 4 and in compartment 5, and the doors would not 
open.'' 
  Apparently compartment 4 was under some pressure, which was 
relieved as the scouts entered. This can be the only explanation 
for the higher pressure in the instrument enclosure as compared 
to atmospheric pressure, and for the high gas level in the 
compartment. After pressure was relieved from the compartment, 
the instrument enclosure's evacuating compressor turned on 
automatically, and it was impossible to enter the enclosure 
until this pressure was relieved. The scouts also relieved 
pressure from compartment 5. The bulkhead door into compartment 
5 was closed, but the door to the airlock of this compartment 
could not be opened because it was stuck as a result of the 
deflagration that occurred in the compartment. 
  Three men who had been poisoned by carbon monoxide in 
compartment 2 were delivered to the rescue chamber. 
  Pressure was relieved from compartments 4 and 5, and Yudin, 
Tretyakov and Kadantsev were ordered to get the people out of 
them. The abbreviation ``kor. R.'' apparently means ``on the 
reactor shell,'' and ``Udovl.'' refers to the satisfactory 
condition of the members of the damage control party. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1225--Acknowledgement to distress signal received. 
Get thermal underwear topside.'' 
  A message that the distress signal had been received and 
decoded was finally received! Sixty-seven minutes had passed 
after the distress signal was ready for transmission and 48 
minutes after it was transmitted the first time. 
  Such is the efficiency of the work of the navy's 
communication structures. 
  Poisoned crewmembers were taken to the conning tower 
superstructure, and thermal underwear was brought up for them. 
<H5>  Secret Documents--To the Rescue Chamber! </H5>
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1230--Seaman Filippov connected up to IDA-59. Check 
out compartment 3.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. F. Slyusarenko (explanatory report): 
``Then I saw Seaman Filippov, who ran over carrying an IDA-59. 
He was connected up to a PDU,[.sup]39[/] and he tried to 
switch over to the IDA-59, but his hands were shaking, and he 
didn't know what to do to put it on. I helped him switch over 
from the PDU to the IDA-59. After this he hurried over to 
prepare the diesel generator for starting in the hold of 
compartment 3.'' 
  Such was Seaman Filippov's effort in putting on the IDA-59. 
Who was supposed to be responsible for such crew training? 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1233--Two men transferred from compartment 4: 
Makhota, Valyavin. Went topside.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (explanatory report): 
``After the fire in compartment 4, the personnel of this 
compartment took shelter in the instrument enclosure. A damage 
control party consisting of damage control division commander 
Captain 3d Rank Yudin, me and Lieutenant Tretyakov was created 
for their evacuation. We put on our IP-6's and left for 
compartment 4. The compartment was extremely smoky. The damage 
control division commander opened the airlock to the instrument 
enclosure and went in, closing the door behind him. At this time 
I checked the compartment's readiness for venting into the 
atmosphere. Rapping could be heard from compartment 5. Opening 
the bulkhead door leading to compartment 5, I entered the 
compartment 5 airlock, but I couldn't open the airlock door. I 
couldn't do it together with the damage control division 
commander either.'' 
  Lieutenant A. V. Makhota (interrogation tape 
recording): ``The first party of scouts couldn't open us up. The 
second party did, obviously because the evacuating compressors 
were working (they were relieving pressure). We donned our PDU's 
and left compartment 3, and we were led up to the 
superstructure.'' 
  Owing to the aggressive actions taken by Captain 3d Rank 
Yudin, it was possible to lead the personnel of compartment 4 
out of the radio room. At this time the readiness of the fourth 
compartment for venting into the atmosphere was checked. But 
another 2 hours 24 minutes passed before venting of the 
compartment was started. There is no justification for the delay. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1235--Smoky in VTsK. Filippov. Report gas composition 
of 2. Take SPS[.sup]40[/] documents up to VSK (commander's 
order). Entry of smoke into compartment 3 stopped. 3 
gm/m[.sup]3[/] in compartment 2 (initially through the ShDA). 
Compartment 3 inspected. High smoke content in TsVK, no open 
flames.'' 
  By this time the fire in compartments 6 and 7 had apparently 
gone out. The pressure in them continued to fall, and by 1235 it 
decreased to 3 kg/cm[.sup]2[/]. The safety valves of the trim 
system's air line stopped bleeding air together with combustion 
products out of compartment 7 into compartment 3. Entry of smoke 
into compartment 3 diminished abruptly, which is noted in the 
ship's log. Still, air continued to enter compartment 3 through 
other unclosed pipelines, albeit in small quantities. Poisoned 
air was entering from the air console [?; vozdushnyy pult] of 
the high- pressure air fitting control system, located in the 
TsVK compartment. 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (interrogation tape 
recording): ``The smoke level in the aft section was very high, 
and a large amount of air was being bled (from the far left 
manipulator) from the main air console. The entire interior of 
the air console, where all of the pipes connect to 45 
kg/cm[.sup]2[/], and all of the pipes were sprayed with dirty 
soot.'' 
  Once again Seaman Filippov! 
  Lieutenant A. V. Tretyakov (explanatory report): ``In 
compartment 3, the executive officer gave orders to inspect the 
hold, and to find seamen Mikhalev and Filippov. We checked the 
hold, and reported through Lieutenant Fedotko that neither was 
there.'' 
  At this moment Seaman Filippov, who had donned his IDA-59, 
returned to the hold of compartment 3 and was helping to start 
the diesel generator. 
  The attack center's supposition that fires were burning in 
compartment 3 was not confirmed. Venting of compartments 2 and 3 
had not yet been started because of the absence of power at 
distribution panel RShchN No 7, which is why the amount of smoke 
in the compartments remained high. The carbon monoxide 
concentration in air of compartment 2 exceeded the maximum 
permissible concentration by over 600 times. The concentration 
of carbon monoxide in compartment 3 could not be measured 
because of the absence of measuring equipment. 
  Warrant Officer V. F. Slyusarenko (explanatory report): 
``The submarine commander gave orders to measure the CO 
concentration in the compartment. I took the measurements with a 
PGA- VPM[.sup]41[/] for low concentrations, because I 
couldn't find any indicator tubes for high concentrations; the 
limit for low concentrations was 50 mg/m[.sup]3[/], and the 
tube showed much more. I reported this.'' 
  What was the estimate of the accident situation during this 
period by the submarine's leadership? 
  Captain 1st Rank B. G. Kolyada (interrogation tape 
recording): ``According to the BCh-5 commander's calculations, 
in the worst-case scenario--flooding of the aft 
compartments--the submarine would lose stability by 1500. The 
command ``Prepare for evacuation to approaching vessels'' was 
given.'' 
  Nothing was known about how things stood with evacuation of 
people, but at this time the submarine commander gave orders to 
evacuate secret business documents, which was documented in the 
ship's log. 
  Warrant Officer E. D. Kononov (explanatory report): 
``In response to a command from the control room I went to the 
control room, and then took the documents up into the rescue 
chamber on the commander's orders.'' 
  Later on Captain 1st Rank Kolyada talked long and often 
about 
the submarine's demise being a surprise to the crew, which is 
why the personnel were unable to make full use of rescue 
resources. The ship's demise was in fact a surprise to most of 
the crew. On the other hand the leadership was excellently aware 
of the impending danger, and it was only its indecision that led 
to numerous sacrifices. 
  Such are the facts. 
<H5>  The First Victims </H5>
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1241--Yudin, Kadantsev, Tretyakov came out. High 
smoke level in compartment 4. 
  1245--Exhaust system clack valves opened between 
compartments 2 and 3. Ventilation clack valves of intake system 
between compartments 2 and 3 opened.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. F. Slyusarenko (interrogation tape 
recording): ``I handed the wrench to the executive officer to 
open the vent between compartments 2 and 3. The executive 
officer opened them himself, and I was ordered to open the 
intake ventilation system. I opened it.'' 
  Thirty minutes had passed from the moment the command to 
open 
the clack valves was given. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1248--In 1: hydrogen--0.4, oxygen--23 percent. 
Situation normal. Radio room inspected. No remarks. VVD-200 
disconnect closed in 1. No information from 5. 
  1253--VVD-200 disconnected at stern and at bow. 
  1255--Makhota connected up to IP-6. Valyavin in IDA-59, 
going to 4, 5. Warrant Officer Gerashchenko feels poorly in VSK. 
Airlock window broken to equalize pressure with compartment 5. 
  1300--Count all men. VVD-200 regulator charged. Diesel 
ready for starting.'' 
  Everything was in order in compartment 1. The concentration 
of hydrogen and oxygen was within normal. Prior to loading, the 
200 kg/cm[.sup]2[/] air main was cut off at the stern to 
avoid bleeding of air into compartment 7, and at the same time 
it was cut off at the bow as well. A necessary measure, but a 
little too late. 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (explanatory report): 
``On orders from the BCh-5 commander, I cut off the subgroup 
valves of cofferdam 3 and closed the disconnect valves for the 
VVD-200 system in compartment 3 and in compartment 2. After this 
I charged the regulator for the VVD-200 system from cofferdam 2, 
and supplied air to the VVD-200 system. The diesel generator 
started right away.'' 
  This is the explanation given by Warrant Officer Kadantsev, 
the chief of mechanics, for all of the manipulations with the 
200 kg/cm[.sup]2[/] air main. And we could have agreed with 
this, if this main were used to start the diesel generator. But 
actually the diesel generator is started by self-contained 
bottles or by the 400 kg/cm[.sup]2[/] main. And as we can 
see, all of the entries in the ship's log regarding VVD-200 
confirm in writing the submarine personnel's poor knowledge of 
its material. 
  Lieutenant A. V. Makhota (explanatory report): ``Then 
the two of us were summoned to the control room, and we were 
ordered to connect up to IP-6's, leave for compartment 4 and 
help the personnel in compartment 5. On reaching compartment 4 
we entered the airlock between compartments 4 and 5. The airlock 
door would not open, it was stuck. Then we kicked it open and 
helped six men get out.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (interrogation tape 
recording): ``The BCh-5 commander sent two new scouts there and 
told them to break the glass in the airlock door to compartment 
5 in any way possible (perhaps there was pressure in there). 
When they broke the glass, this didn't do anything to make it 
easier to open the door--that is, there was no pressure in 
compartment 5. The door was kicked in.'' 
  Because the power supply to the fan of the main ventilation 
ring was switched off, instruments of the navigation system 
began failing due to overheating. 
  Warrant Officer A. M. Kopeyka (interrogation tape 
recording): ``There was no smoke in the gyro-compass room. 
Everything was working normally. I checked all of the units and 
went to report to the team chief that we were not going to have 
any problems with the power supply. The second ventilation ring 
was working poorly. We requested power several times from 
compartment 2, but the BCh-5 commander said that they couldn't 
deal with this now, and to do everything we could. It was after 
I dragged the team chief up after he started feeling poorly that 
the command to measure CO in the compartments was 
transmitted.'' 
  The electrical navigation group tried to do everything 
possible to prolong the work of the navigation system with the 
ventilation system not working. In order to improve cooling the 
panels were removed from their pedestals, but it was all in 
vain. It would have been much easier to supply power to the 
electric fan of the cooling system, or to shut off the system 
right away. 
  Warrant Officer V. V. Gerashchenko (interrogation tape 
recording): ``I disconnected the ``Magistral'' system. I was 
feeling bad, I began to see brown spots before my eyes, my 
vision began to go dark, and I had an intense headache. Warrant 
Officer Kopeyka noted this, tore the ShDA mask off of me, and 
helped me topside.... I began to feel better after 40-50 
minutes, and I asked to be allowed to go back down.... I looked 
over the gyro-compass room and concluded that we had to shut 
everything down, because the instruments and the internal 
cabling could catch fire.'' 
  The navigation system was soon shut down. 
  After Warrant Officer Gerashchenko was poisoned a command 
was 
given to personnel in compartment 3 to switch from the ShDA to 
other individual protective equipment. 
  It is hard to understand the entry in the ship's log that 
there was no information from compartment 5. The control room 
knew that people were in there, and that they could not open the 
airlock door. To get the door open, a command to break the glass 
in the airlock to equalize pressure in compartment 5 was given, 
despite the fact that there was ``No information from 
compartment 5.'' Lieutenant Makhota and Warrant Officer Valyavin 
were sent to compartment 5 without spare individual protective 
equipment. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1305--Diesel water drain working. Taken out of 
compartment 5: Volkov--1, Tkachev--2, Kozlov--3, Dvorov--4, 
Zamogilnyy--5, Shostak--6. Kulapin in 5 connected up to ShDA. He 
has no IDA. Alive. 
  1308--Connected up to ShDA in compartment 5--Bondar on 
port side. Six men from 5--topside. Pered. [?; probably an 
abbreviation]. 
  1307--Dvorov, Makhota--to 5 after Kulapin and Bondar. 
Connected up to IP-6's. Valyavin arrived from 5, carried Bondar 
and Kulapin to airlock. Moderate smoke level in compartment 5. 
Valyavin went topside.'' 
  Six men were taken out of compartment 5; the numbers after 
their names indicate the order in which the people were taken 
out of the compartment. It is not entirely clear why the entry 
in the ship's log for 1308 was ahead of the entry for 1307. 
  Warrant Officer Bondar and Seaman Kulapin, who were 
connected 
up to ShDA equipment, remained in compartment 5. 
  There is an inaccuracy in the ship's log: Warrant Officer 
Valyavin only tried to carry Kulapin over, but he was unable to 
do this. 
  Lieutenant A. V. Tretyakov (explanatory report): 
``Warrant Officer Valyavin reported that he had tried to drag 
Seaman Kulapin out of the compartment, but he was so heavy and 
Valyavin was feeling so poorly that he was unable to do this 
alone.'' 
  Captain Lieutenant S. A. Dvorov (explanatory report): 
``About 1.5 hours later the airlock door was opened from 
compartment 4, and we were taken into compartment 3. I put on a 
new IP-6 and once again left for compartment 5 with two IP-6s to 
evacuate Seaman Kulapin and Warrant Officer Bondar, who were 
connected to the ShDA. They were found unconscious in 
compartment 5. Warrant Officer Valyavin and I carried them into 
compartment 3.'' 
  The impression is created that in his position as 
compartment 
commander, during his presence in compartment 5 Captain 
Lieutenant Dvorov had not monitored the condition of people 
connected to ShDA apparatus. It is unclear from his explanations 
whether attempts were made to put IP-6 face masks on Warrant 
Officer Bondar and Seaman Kulapin. In addition, not only Captain 
Lieutenant Dvorov and Warrant Officer Valyavin but also Captain 
3d Rank Yudin, lieutenants Tretyakov, Makhota and Fedotko, 
Warrant Officer Slyusarenko and Senior Seaman Vershilo helped to 
evacuate these people. It should be noted in this case that the 
submarine command, which knew that there were still two people 
connected up to ShDA apparatus in compartment 5, was unable to 
organize a larger damage control party for simultaneous 
evacuation of the victims. The two persons sent to compartment 5 
were unable to carry two out right away. 
  Electric power to the diesel generator's cooling pump was 
sorted out over an hour after the order was given. Power was 
supplied to distribution panel RShchN No. 7 from the 
unconnectable load section of the main distribution panel No. 1, 
located in compartment 2, and the electric cooling pump was 
started. Venting of compartment 3 with the exhaust fan of the 
forward ring of the general ship ventilation system was started 
simultaneously, although there are no entries to this effect in 
the ship's log. 
  Lieutenant A. V. Zaytsev (interrogation tape 
recording): ''Then we turned on the diesel engine and exhaust 
fans--air began flowing into the submarine.'' 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1319--RDO[.sup]42[/] No. 12 transmitted. 
  1325--Definite acknowledgement to RDO No. 12 received. 
No information on Kolotilin, Bukhnikashvili, tentatively in 
compartment 6. 
  1327--Kulapin led out (Sic--D.R.) of 5. Communication 
session initiated. Personally addressed to us. No pulse felt on 
Kulapin, raised topside. 
  1333--Slyusarenko, Fedotko, Dvorov, Valyavin gone to 
stern. Load picked up by DG. 
  1339--Status of GEU: reactor stopped with all 
absorbers, AZ, KR, at lower limit switches. Loop 1 temperature 
75ëC, loop 1 pressure 105 kg/cm[.sup]2[/], level in KO 
3--19 percent, cooling proceeding through BBR system, 2 TsNPK 
working. GEU control totally absent. Kulapin has no pulse. 
  1340--Dvorov lost consciousness in compartment 3. 
Bondar in compartment 3 in airlock. 
  1341--No people in compartment 5. Compartment 5 
inspected. Valyavin, Slyusarenko, Fedotko, Vershilo came out. In 
compartment 1: Grigoryan, Anisimov, Kozhanov, Speranskiy. In 
compartment 2: Markov, Gregulev. Bondar came up (sick--D.R.) 
(unconscious).'' 
  The diesel generator (DG) picked up the load 2 hours 16 
minutes after the command was given. The reactor had been 
stopped with all absorbers (safety rods AZ and shim rods KR), 
which were resting on the lower limit switches, back at 1123; 
however, an entry to this effect was not made in the ship's log 
until 1339. According to the control log control of the main 
propulsion unit (GEU) was lost at 1119, with the exception of 
control over mechanisms and units of the reactor compartment. 
The ``Shtil'' system, which supported the reactor's emergency 
shielding, was working. The entry to this effect in the ship's 
log is imprecise. Accelerated cooling of the submarine's nuclear 
reactor by way of the battery-less cooling system (the BBR 
system) was proceeding with forced circulation of water in loop 
1 by the loop 1 circulating pumps (TsNPK). The ship's log 
entries regarding the loop 1 temperature and the water level in 
the volume compensator (KO), equal to 19 percent, indicate a 
high degree of reactor cooling. 
  The automatic system and equipment of the reactor 
compartment 
activated the emergency shielding, managed the reactor's steady 
cooling and monitored all of its parameters until the submarine 
went down. Evacuation of personnel from compartment 5 was 
completed. It took 36 minutes to evacuate two persons from 
compartment 5. Seaman Kulapin was raised up in 20 minutes. It 
took a larger damage control party only 8 minutes to evacuate 
Warrant Officer Bondar. There are full grounds for believing 
that the submarine command was unable to man large damage 
control parties. They were made up of only 11 men out of a crew 
of 69; in this case damage control division commander Captain 3d 
Rank Yudin was forced to go to the aft compartments eight times 
as a member of damage control parties. 
  Despite all of the efforts by Senior Lieutenant of Medical 
Service L. A. Zayts, Seaman Kulapin and Warrant Officer Bondar 
could not be saved. The possibility is not excluded that the 
mistakes made by the commander of compartment 5 and the delay of 
evacuation led to the tragic outcome. 
<H5>  Fight Against Listing Continues </H5>
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1344--Open valve to equalize pressure between 5 and 
6.'' 
  It should be noted that the term ``open valve'' could also 
be 
read as ``valve opened.'' Analysis of preceding and subsequent 
events permits us to assume that this was a command, but its 
execution was not documented. 
  Captain Lieutenant S. A. Dvorov (interrogation tape 
recording): ``Then I went back to compartment 5 and took another 
man with me--Warrant Officer Valyavin. The BCh-5 commander gave 
the command to open the bulkhead clack valves between 
compartments 5 and 4, and to seal off compartment 5 in order to 
relieve pressure from compartment 6. I was unable to open the 
bulkhead clack valves, because the bulkhead was very hot, and 
the high level of smoke was a hindrance. We found Bondar in a 
dead-end corridor on the left side at the bow. He was connected 
up to the ShDA and unconscious.'' 
  This was in the period between 1333 and 1340. Then the 
command to open the pressure equalizing valve was given. The 
command remained unexecuted. What was happening at this time in 
the submarine? Pressure was falling in compartments 6 and 7. 
Because of leaks in the pipelines, when the pressure dropped 
below 2 kg/cm[.sup]2[/] water began leaking from the air 
conditioning and cooling systems of ship power consumers. 
Apparently at around 1330 the operator of the ``Molibden'' 
console was forced to stop the pumps of the cooling system 
supporting ship power consumers (Lieutenant Zaytsev gives a time 
of 1230 in his explanatory report, which is not very probable). 
  A decision was made to relieve pressure from the distressed 
compartments by way of the exhaust main of the aft ventilation 
ring. This is the only interpretation that can be given to the 
command received by Captain Lieutenant Dvorov. How do we 
evaluate this decision? Pressure was falling in the distressed 
compartments. There was a report from the bridge that bleeding 
of air was observed from the right side in the vicinity of 
compartment 7. It may be concluded with certainty that the 
pressure hull of compartment 7 was no longer airtight. 
Consequently as soon as the pressure fell below a certain value, 
water would rush into the distressed compartment. And rather 
than implementing all measures to seal the bulkhead between 
compartments 5 and 6 (or between 4 and 5) and prepare to charge 
the distressed compartments, an attempt was undertaken to 
relieve pressure in them. A decision equivalent to suicide. 
Luckily it was impossible to carry it out--otherwise the 
submarine may have sunk an hour earlier, and no one would have 
been saved. 
  By 1200 the entire reserve of high-pressure air was 
exhausted, with the exception of the reserve in the commander's 
tank group, but no actions were taken to replenish it. Nor were 
any attempts made to find out what was happening in the aft part 
of the submarine, and what sort of change was occurring in draft 
and trim. 
  Senior Watch Officer Captain Lieutenant A. G. Verezgov 
(interrogation tape recording): 
  Question: ``And couldn't you have gone aft?'' 
  Answer: ``I thought about it, but no one went 
there.'' 
  RBZh-PL-82, Article 42: ``In case of accident the 
submarine senior watch officer is obligated: ...to directly lead 
the personnel's damage control efforts on the upper deck and in 
the superstructure when the submarine is on the surface.'' 
  More interrogation tape recordings: 
  Electrical navigation group engineer Lieutenant K. A. 
Fedotko: 
  Question: ``Was listing documented?'' 
  Answer: ``We had bigger problems--the ship was out of 
trim.'' 
  Damage control division engineer Lieutenant A. V. 
Zaytsev: ``According to the pressure gauges the pressure in 
compartments 6 and 7 reached zero. I reported this to the 
commander. It took a long time to relieve the pressure. I don't 
remember when pressure was bled from compartments 6 and 7, but I 
do remember that our trim was 1ë aft at around 1300.'' 
  A correction needs to be made in Lieutenant Zaytsev's 
statement. The submarine had a zero trim by the stern as of 
1300. The trim appeared later. Here is how the fourth and 
seventh sections of the government commission's working group 
evaluated change in the submarine's draft and trim over time, on 
the basis of an analysis of photographs taken from an airplane: 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Time                     |Draft in Meters          |Trim by Stern in Degrees | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1500                     |7.5-8.5                  |1.5-2.0                  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1600                     |8.5-9.0                  |2.0-2.5                  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1630                     |9.0-9.5                  |2.5-3.0                  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|1645                     |9.5-10.0                 |3.0-3.5                  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  We can see that change in draft and trim occurred gradually, 
and it could have been predicted beforehand. Therefore all of 
the assertions that appeared later in the press regarding the 
alleged unexpected demise of the submarine, which hindered 
preparation of rescue equipment, are inconsistent with reality, 
and have the goal of covering up the inactivity of the ship's 
leadership in rescuing the crew. 
  At this time events developed ashore in the following way. 
At 
1219 (and possibly even at 1141) the distress signal was 
decoded. At 1239 an IL-38 airplane was dispatched to the 
accident location, for some reason without a submarine 
specialist aboard. As a result the headquarters of the Northern 
Fleet was deprived of objective information up until the end of 
the tragedy, while the submarine was perhaps deprived of good 
recommendations that may have dramatically altered the 
subsequent progress of accident recovery efforts. 
  At 1250 the headquarters of the Northern Fleet transmitted a 
radio message to the ``Komsomolets'' forbidding the ship's 
submergence and suggesting it remain adrift. It was also 
communicated that an airplane was en route to the submarine with 
an estimated time of arrival of 1400. 
  Unfortunately the headquarters of the Northern Fleet did not 
furnish documents to the government commission's working group 
regarding communication exchanges between the distressed 
submarine and the fleet command post. The message cited above 
and subsequent ones are from a document of the fourth section of 
the government commission's working group, signed by Vice 
Admiral Zaytsev--the naval deputy commander-in-chief and the 
chairman of this section. 
  It may be concluded from the radio messages that the 
submarine command concealed the true scale of the accident from 
the headquarters of the Northern Fleet from the very beginning. 
For practical purposes there was no reserve of high-pressure air 
aboard the ship (except for the commander's tank group), it was 
dead in the water, and pressure in the distressed compartments 
was close to 13 kg/cm[.sup]2[/]. How could there be any talk 
of submerging the submarine in a disaster of such a scale? 
Apparently the command of the ``Komsomolets'' lacked not only 
the ability to organize ship damage control efforts but also the 
courage to report the status of the submarine objectively and 
promptly. 
  Twenty-three minutes (and possible even 61) had passed after 
the distress signal was decoded, and it was not until then that 
it came to the headquarters of the Northern Fleet to ask the 
Sevryba Association to report the location of its vessels. The 
time was 1242. A reply was received in the same minute. Another 
8 minutes went by, and finally at 1250 the headquarters of the 
Northern Fleet made the decision to send the tender ``Aleksey 
Khlobystov'' to the place of the accident. As a result the 
tender was unable to begin traveling to the coordinates 
indicated by the Northern Fleet headquarters until 1320. 
  The list to port was a constant concern to the submarine 
command. And as soon as rescue of people from compartments 4 and 
5 was finished, it set to correcting the list. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1354--Kadantsev--open vent valve of TsGB No. 7.'' 
  The side on which the vent valve had to be opened and the 
tank had to be filled was not indicated in the ship's log. But 
the reference is to the starboard main ballast tank No. 7. 
  Lieutenant A. V. Zaytsev (explanatory report): ``On 
orders from the BCh-5 commander Warrant Officer Kadantsev bled 
air out of the starboard main ballast tank No. 7. After this the 
list became 0ë.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (interrogation tape 
recording): ``The BCh-5 commander ordered me to open the vent 
valve of number 7 on the right side in order to correct the 
list. I donned an IDA-59 and went to the aft ventilation 
enclosure of compartment 3, where I delivered (Kadantsev meant 
to say ``bled.''-- D.R.) batches of air. The list was corrected. 
The smoke level in the aft section was very high, and a great 
deal of air was bleeding out of the main air console (out of the 
far left manipulator).'' 
  Two and a half hours had gone by after the submarine 
surfaced. During this time the attack center could have 
ascertained that a list of 6-8 degrees is not dangerous to a 
submarine, and that it would make no sense to waste time and 
resources correcting it. Contrary to this, the submarine command 
stubbornly tried to correct the list, and in doing so, it used 
the most irrational method. Rather than filling one of the 
starboard bow tanks, a stern tank was filled. This diminished 
the buoyancy reserve, and did not improve the parameters of the 
ship's longitudinal stability. 
  The impression is created that the principle followed in 
flooding the main ballast tanks (first starboard No. 5 and then 
No. 7 on the same side) was not that of the greatest expediency 
but that of the possibility of subsequently blowing them with 
air reserves remaining in high-pressure air cofferdam No. 3. 
Bleeding of smoke gases from distressed compartments into 
compartments 2, 3 and 5 continued, and nothing was done to stop 
it. Despite the fact that ventilation was working in 
compartments 2 and 3, the carbon monoxide concentration in them 
exceeded the maximum permissible concentration by several times. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1355--Yudin, Apanasyevich, Tretyakov, Slyusarenko 
connected up to IP-6s. 
  1356--Slyusarenko, Tretyakov--safeties, Yudin, 
Apanasyevich-- damage control party in compartment 6. RDO No. 13 
transmitted.'' 
  A damage control party was sent to compartment 6. The goal 
of 
the patrol, as was said earlier, was to deliver fire 
extinguisher into compartment 7. But the reference is to 
something else. Sending the damage control party to compartment 
6 meant that in the opinion of the submarine command the fire 
had gone out in it, and pressure in the distressed compartments 
had fallen to a value close to 0. If we consider that pressure 
was measured with a pressure gauge having a scale reading from 0 
to 16 kg/cm[.sup]2[/] with a precision class of 2.5, then at 
1355 the pressure in the distressed compartments was close to 
0.5 kg/cm[.sup]2[/]. A qualitatively new stage had started. 
Bleeding of air out of the starboard main ballast tank No. 10 
was coming to an end. By this time, taking the actual draft of 
the submarine into account, the scupper grates of this tank were 
at a depth of 4.5-5 meters--that is, pressure in the distressed 
compartments was equal to the pressure in the main ballast tank. 
Soon air would begin passing from the starboard tank No. 10 
through the burnt-out cable lead-ins into compartment 7, and 
then from it into compartments 2, 3 and 5, and partially 
overboard through the cooling kingston valve and pipeline of the 
stern-tube gland. 
  The fire in the distressed compartment had gone out by this 
time. As was said earlier, around 6,500 kg of air had passed 
into the distressed compartments out of the high-pressure air 
system. Not more than 700 kg of fuel, expressed in units of 
carbon, could have burned in this quantity of air. Three hours 
would have been more than sufficient to burn this quantity of 
fuel in two fully involved compartments. 
  The organizational side of the preparation of the damage 
control party for its mission is astounding. The pressure in the 
distressed compartments was around 0.5 kg/cm[.sup]2[/], and 
it was pressing against the bulkhead door into compartment 6 
with a force of over 2,000 kilograms. The door opens into 
compartment 5. Had the damage control party been able to turn 
the rack-and-pinion and released the latch, this damage control 
party and its safeties would also have been killed by the door 
or by the air flow in fractions of a second. And it is difficult 
to say what other misfortunes would have come upon the submarine 
and its crew. But this is just one side of the issue. 
  Now let's imagine the compartment in which a fire of great 
intensity had just gone out. Everything was red hot. Nothing in 
it could be handled. Total darkness. A poisoned atmosphere. Each 
step is dangerous--the flooring could collapse, if it's still 
there. And here was the damage control party, without heat 
resistant overalls, wearing only IP-6 gas masks, making ready to 
enter this hell. Had the ship's leadership considered that by 
sending people into compartment 6 it was sending them to certain 
death? Quite clearly compartment 5 should have been sealed off 
and pressure in it should have been increased to that in the 
distressed compartments first, and only after this should the 
bulkhead door between compartments 5 and 6 been opened, and 
people dressed in heat resistant overalls and IDA-59s been sent 
into the distressed compartment. And four men were clearly not 
enough for this work. Moreover, whatever the case, there were no 
guarantees that the damage control party could fulfill its task. 
At this moment only one goal could have justified the risk of 
sending a damage control party into the distressed compartments: 
closing the cooling kingston valve of the stern-tube gland and 
opening the emergency pumping valve in compartment 6 or 7. It 
would have been much simpler and easier to seal off the aft 
compartments and maintain excess pressure in them. Unfortunately 
no one thought of this throughout the entire accident. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1357--Warrant Officer Kadantsev filled TsGB No. 7, 
closed vent valve. 
  1402--Kulapin and Bondar dead, doctor's conclusion. 
  1407--RDO No. 13 transmitted repeatedly. From moment of 
RDO No. 13 from first time. CO in hold of 2 5.6 
gm/m[.sup]3[/]. Smoke to starboard, at location of reversible 
VPR, visibility better to port. CO on middle deck 2-3 
gm/m[.sup]3[/].'' 
  The starboard main ballast tank No. 7 was flooded. The list 
was corrected, although this was not reflected in the ship's 
log. There is an oxygen dispenser near the location of the 400 
Hz converter (VPR) and the reversible converter. Smoke gases 
were passing from it into compartment 2. This entry in the 
ship's log is nothing other than written confirmation of the 
oxygen version of the cause of the fire. The oxygen delivery 
line in compartment 7 was open before the accident, and during 
the fire smoke gases entered through it into the oxygen header 
of the electrolytic unit, and then through the manually opened 
oxygen delivery line into compartment 2. In the meantime it is 
asserted in the explanatory reports submitted by Captain 
Lieutenant V. A. Gregulev 5 days after the interrogation that 
the oxygen delivery valves were closed at the header in 
compartment 2, and that the carbon dioxide main was shut. This 
is clearly inconsistent with reality. The region where smoke 
gases were bleeding was known, and still, nothing was done to 
stop the leaks. Hence the extremely high concentration of carbon 
monoxide in compartment 2, despite its continuing ventilation. 
  And what was meant by the unfinished phrase in the ship's 
log 
``From the moment of RDO No. 13 from first time'' is unclear. 
<H5>  ``No Water Entering!'' </H5>
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1412--Yudin, Fedotko, Slyusarenko, Apanasyevich 
arrived. Compartment 6 bulkhead temperature over 70ëC, entry 
impossible. 
  1415--IP-6s recharged, Yudin, Apanasyevich, Slyusarenko 
left for 5 to deliver LOKh into compartment 6. 
  1418--UKV [ultrashort-wave?] communication established 
with airplane. 
  1420--LOKh delivered to compartment 6 from 5. Captain 
3d Rank Yudin, Seaman Apanasyevich arrived, Warrant Officer 
Slyusarenko didn't go.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. F. Slyusarenko (interrogation tape 
recording): ``Then the executive officer ordered Yudin to 
deliver LOKh from compartment 5 into compartment 6. And he 
ordered me to go as a safety. They couldn't find anyone else, 
because practically the entire crew was topside. Warrant Officer 
Valyavin, who knows compartment 5 well, went below. Valyavin 
couldn't go because he had breathed in a lot of CO. He was 
forbidden to go. While they were searching for another man, 
Yudin had already gone down to compartment 5 and returned. I 
don't know whether or not Yudin delivered LOKh into compartment 
6 from compartment 5.'' 
  I have no desire to comment on the way the damage control 
parties were manned. Everything is clear without my saying 
anything. 
  Let's turn attention to the temperature of the fore bulkhead 
of compartment 6, and the time. At 1412 the bulkhead temperature 
was over 70ëC. It had to be estimated subjectively because 
the damage control party did not have any measuring instruments. 
It was said earlier that the fire was no longer burning in 
compartment 6, and delivery of LOKh into it made no practical 
sense. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1426--On the bridge: Move away from ``Ivolga'' for 
radio transmission. 
  1427--RDO No. 13 transmitted third time. Six RSP-30 
mm[.sup]43[/] handed up to bridge: 2 red, 2 green, 2 white. 
  1432--Av. stop. UKV [transliteration] ``Komar'' set at 
``beacon.'' 
  1440--Airplane sighted visually. Smoking, coming in 
from port, marking its location, four-engined. 
  1441--``Komar'' ``beacon'' switched on. 
IL-38--classified.'' 
  The airplane arrived in the accident region and established 
communication with the submarine, and the first photographs were 
taken. It was communicated from the airplane that surface ships 
would reach the submarine by 1800. At this time a query was 
transmitted to the submarine from Northern Fleet headquarters by 
way of the airplane regarding entry of water into the pressure 
hull and regarding the fire. The attention of the submarine 
command was simultaneously turned to the need for utilizing all 
possibilities of the LOKh system to deliver freon into 
compartments 6 and 7, to sealing off the aft compartments, to 
preventing gas contamination of the other compartments of the 
submarine, to continually monitoring the gas composition in the 
compartments and to making economical use of individual 
protective equipment. Having no information about the accident's 
development and the course of damage control measures, the 
Northern Fleet's command post was forced to transmit the set of 
typical recommendations known even to young seamen. 
  In the meantime the submarine began tipping to starboard as 
the starboard main ballast tank No. 10 filled. All of the effort 
to correct the listing to port turned out to be not only useless 
but even harmful. The buoyancy reserve was lost purposelessly. 
Water began entering compartment 7 through the cooling kingston 
valve of the stern-tube gland. A small patch of roiling water on 
the starboard side in the vicinity of the indicated kingston 
valve could be seen distinctly on a photograph taken from the 
airplane at 1440--this was air ``gurgling'' up from compartment 
7. There are no precise references to the time when the list 
began shifting to starboard and when filling of the starboard 
main ballast tank No. 10 finished. The testimony of the crew 
members is contradictory. 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (explanatory report): 
``In order to measure the temperature of the bulkhead between 
compartments 5 and 6, after compartments 4 and 5 were vented I 
left for compartment 5 and set a thermometer reading to 
100ëC on the aft bulkhead of compartment 5. The thermometer 
read a temperature above 100ëC--approximately 115-119ëC. 
At this time the trim was 1.5ë by the stern. The list began 
changing to starboard.'' 
  According to the ship's log the time the temperature was 
measured was 1539. 
  Lieutenant A. V. Zaytsev (explanatory report): ``On 
orders from the BCh-5 commander Warrant Officer Kadantsev bled 
air out of the starboard TsGB No 7. After this the list became 
0ë, and then shifted over to starboard, becoming 4-5ë to 
starboard.... At around 1400 the starboard main ballast tank No. 
7 was blown with air remaining in high-pressure air cofferdam 
No. 3. The list became equal to 0ë.'' 
  It may be surmised from Lieutenant Zaytsev's explanatory 
report that listing had shifted to starboard back before 1400. 
But this could not have been, because the starboard main ballast 
tank No. 7 was not flooded until 1357, and it could not have 
been blown at 1400. Analysis of photographs taken from the 
airplane permits the assertion that the starboard tank No. 10 
was flooded at around 1500, and water rushed into compartment 7 
through the cable lead-ins. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1442--Yudin, Ispenkov connected up to IP-6. Going to 
compartment 5 to stop reversible, check temperature of 
compartment 6 fore bulkhead. 
  1445--Reversible of 5 stopped. Airplane dropped a buoy. 
  1449--CO at bulkhead at aft end of compartment 3--5 
mg/m[.sup]3[/]. IP recharging station deployed. Spent PDUs, 
IPs tossed overboard (regenerating cartridges).'' 
  The diesel generator had now been carrying a load for over 
an 
hour. Two reversible converters were working, which was 
redundant to a certain degree. With the automatic controls of 
the electric power system working, the reversible converter 
could have been stopped from the control console, while when the 
``Sinus'' system was deenergized, it could be stopped only from 
the local control post in compartment 5. Sending a special 
damage control party to compartment 5 for this purpose is 
unconvincing, because there was no urgent need to stop it, and 
moreover, under these circumstances this would reduce the 
electric power system's reliability. Apparently the main goal of 
the patrol was to get power to distribution panel RShchN No. 6 
so that the electric exhaust fan of the aft ring of the general 
ship ventilation system could be started. But there is no one to 
check this with, because the entire BCh-5 electrical engineering 
division perished. 
  The damage control party took no instruments with it as it 
set off to check the temperature of the fore bulkhead of 
compartment 6. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1457--Venting of compartment 4 with compartment 4's 
exhaust fan started. 
  1502--RDO No. 14 transmitted. 
  1512--Exhaust clack valves of compartment 4 closed. 
Venting of compartment 5 through hatch of compartments 3 and 4 
using exhaust fan of aft unit started.'' 
  The readiness of compartment 4 for venting was verified from 
1218 to 1233, but because of the absence of power to 
distribution panel RShchN No. 6, this venting was not started 
until something over 2 hours later. 
  RBZh-PL-82, Article 98: ``To maintain permissible 
concentrations of gases (toxic substances) in the atmosphere of 
compartments adjacent to distressed compartments, after the 
submarine rises to the surface these compartments must be vented 
into the atmosphere to the extent possible.'' 
  This possibility was not utilized for more than 2 hours. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1518--Transmitted to airplane: No water entering. 
Fire being put out by sealing off compartments. Air only in one 
VVD group.'' 
  The message received by the Northern Fleet's command post at 
1535 reads: ``Fire still burning in compartments 6, 7. Seaman 
Kulapin, Senior Seaman Bukhnikashvili died, need a tow. VVD 
remaining only in commander's group. Can no longer use the LOKh 
system. Monitoring pressure and temperature.'' 
  It is hard to say what there is more of in these 
messages--half- truths or deliberate disinformation. The 
submarine's leadership had no basis for asserting that the fire 
was still burning in the distressed compartments. Over 30 
percent of the ship's reserves of high-pressure air had been 
delivered into them. During the accident, gases flowed 
unhindered from the distressed compartments into compartments 5, 
3 and 2. How can there be any talk of putting out the fire by 
sealing off the compartments? The temperature of the bulkhead 
between compartments 5 and 6 was not measured. 
  High-pressure air did in fact remain only in one commander's 
tank group, but this happened over 3 hours previously, and since 
that time there was no air in the submarine's mains, and the 
air-foam fire extinguishing system was not working. By this time 
four persons had already died aboard the ship, but the death of 
only two was reported. The submarine needed a tow as of 1123, 
when according to the entry in the control log for the main 
propulsion unit the emergency safety rods and shim rods of the 
reactor were rested against their lower limit switches. The 
assertion of the submarine command that water was not entering 
the pressure hull was also groundless. At the moment the message 
was transmitted, the ship's situation was catastrophic, which is 
confirmed by the photographs taken from the airplane. Listing of 
the submarine had shifted to starboard. Trim rose to 1.5-2ë 
by the stern. It was time to shout ``Help, we're sinking!''. 
Processes that were not controlled and not thought out by the 
leadership were occurring aboard the submarine: surfacing with a 
list, growth of pressure in distressed compartments, dropping of 
this pressure, shifting of listing to the other side, increasing 
trim by the stern. How can there be any talk of monitoring 
pressure and temperature when even simple recording of the 
events was not provided for? On the whole these messages did not 
reflect the actual state of the distressed submarine, and 
disoriented the Northern Fleet's command post. 
  The government commission's working group felt that entry of 
water into the submarine's pressure hull began after 1400, and 
by 1500 the quantity of water that had entered compartment 7 was 
20 tonnes, which was reflected in the joint act of sections 4 
and 7 of this working group. 
<H5>  `` ``Explosions'' Observed!'' </H5>
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1521--Moved away from ``Ivolga''. RDO No. 14 
transmitted. Repeatedly. 
  1527--Transfer diving clothing to compartment 3. 
  1529--Compartment 6 bulkhead temperature over 100ëC. 
  1532--Definite acknowledgement of RDO No. 14 received. 
  1537--Communication session begins. 
  1538--Message received: A submarine is 100 km away, 
moving toward us at 14 knots. 
  1539--New personal RDO transmitted to us. Kadantsev, 
Yudin connected up to IP-6, left for compartment 5 to measure CO 
in 5.'' 
  The bulkhead temperature data were entered into the ship's 
log on the basis of the results of Yudin's and Ispenkov's 
patrol, which ended 40 minutes earlier. The temperature was once 
again estimated, without using thermometers. 
  A Soviet submarine was traveling toward the accident 
location. It was not moving fast. This is apparently the result 
of the ``Komsomolets'' leadership misinforming the Northern 
Fleet command. 
  After the message was received from the submarine at 1535, 
the commander of the Northern Fleet gave orders to prepare freon 
in canisters and 10 sets of air-dropped rescue containers 
(KAS-150) to be delivered to the accident location by an Il-38 
airplane. The absence of complete information on exchanges 
between the distressed submarine and the Northern Fleet's 
command post makes it impossible to determine what the grounds 
were for dispatching the KAS-150 (did the ``Komsomolets'' ask 
for them, or was this the initiative of the command post?). It 
is unclear how the freon canisters were to be transferred from 
the airplane to the submarine. 
  There are no special rescue detachments in the navy that 
could have been delivered to the accident region by air, and 
which could have dropped down together with rescue equipment to 
provide assistance to the crew. Had such detachments existed, 
their help would have been invaluable in this case. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1557--Kadantsev, Yudin returned from 5. Compartment 6 
bulkhead temperature 115ëC. CO measured--7 
mg/m[.sup]3[/].'' 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (interrogation tape 
recording): ``We got a 100-degree alcohol thermometer from the 
gyro-compass room. I went alone. The 3d division commander 
remained behind at the aft bulkhead of compartment 4. I inserted 
the thermometer into the cable lead-in from the direction of 
compartment 5, and the temperature climbed instantaneously to 
over 100ëC (somewhere around 115ëC). I came out and 
reported.'' 
  The RBZh-PL-82 requires that the temperature of a distressed 
compartment's bulkheads be checked; however, there are no 
recommendations as to how this is to be done. The standard 
submarine supply table lacks special instruments with which to 
check bulkhead temperature. 
  Despite the fact that the gas composition in compartment 5 
was practically normal as a result of venting and reduction of 
the amount of entering gas, the personnel never did return from 
either compartment 4 or compartment 5. It was clear that 
submarine damage control efforts were gradually shutting down. 
Subsequently only damage control division commander Captain 3d 
Rank Yudin and mechanics' crew chief Warrant Officer Kadantsev 
continued this struggle. The rest of the crewmembers (with the 
exception of compartment 1, the watchstander at the diesel 
generator and the signalmen) were in the conning tower 
superstructure or were providing ``overall leadership.'' 
  From the ship's log: 
  1612--``Kadantsev, Yudin connected up to IP-6. Went to 
compartment 5 to measure temperature of aft bulkhead of 
compartment 5. 
  1624--Yudin, Kadantsev returned. Temperature of aft 
bulkhead of compartment 5 111ëC. Shocks reminiscent of 
explosions in vicinity of compartments 6 and 7 observed. 
Believed to be regenerating cartridges.[.sup]44[/] Ten cans 
in compartment 6, 11 cans in 7. 
  1625--In 1, hydrogen--1 percent, oxygen--23.5 percent, 
personnel feeling satisfactory.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (interrogation tape 
recording): Five minutes later the BCh-5 commander sent us back 
there again to shut the bulkhead clack valve (it was supposed 
that it was open, which is why the temperature was not falling 
and the fire continued to burn). When we looked, the clack valve 
was in its normal closed position, and the pressure equalizing 
valve was closed. We tried to open it--the temperature climbed 
instantaneously, you couldn't keep your hand on it, there was a 
whistling sound. We closed it. There was pressure in compartment 
6 after all. Not much, but it was there.'' 
  In the meantime outboard water was entering compartment 7 
with high intensity, compressing the air in the distressed 
compartments. This explains the continued presence of pressure 
in compartments 6 and 7. 
  Much was written in the press about ``explosions,'' after 
which the submarine quickly sank. They were written about not 
only by ``armchair'' captains of various ranks and other 
``specialists'' like them. People who knew what they were 
writing about also wrote. 
  Thus, Vice Admiral V. V. Zaytsev stated: ``Explosions were 
heard aboard the submarine in the aft compartments at 1624. The 
situation worsened dramatically at 1640. The submarine acquired 
a trim by the stern, which attested to entry of water into the 
pressure hull and a danger of flooding.''[.sup]45[/] A clear 
cause-and-effect relationship is drawn here between the 
``explosions'' on one hand and abrupt worsening of the situation 
and the submarine's demise on the other. 
  Captain 1st Rank B. G. Kolyada (interrogation tape 
recording): ``Explosions began at the stern, explosions that 
shook the submarine. It was decided that these were possibly the 
regenerating system exploding.'' Kolyada did of course make the 
qualification on the spot: ''No, I'm not suggesting that the 
hull was ruptured by the explosion. The submarine was jarred, 
but not strongly enough to rupture the pressure hull.'' 
  Nonetheless, these ``shocks reminiscent of explosions'' 
wound 
up in the ship's log, and were transmitted as ``explosions'' in 
a message to the Northern Fleet's command post. 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (interrogation tape 
recording): ``When we entered compartment 5, we heard two 
shocks-- ``babakh-babakh''--at the stern, before the enclosure 
of the turbo- circulating pumps (the officers heard more). We 
measured the gas composition in the compartment. This was an 
hour before the submarine sank. We had not heard shocks before 
this.'' 
  None of the other surviving crewmembers said anything about 
``shocks'' or about ``shocks reminiscent of explosions,'' or 
simply about ``explosions.'' 
  Captain Lieutenant S. A. Dvorov (interrogation tape 
recording): 
  Question: ``In what compartments are spent regenerating 
cartridges stored?'' 
  Answer: ``We did not use them, because they were in 
reserve. I didn't hear any explosions.'' 
  Apparently only Yudin and Kadantsev heard these shocks while 
they were in compartment 5. It may be understood from Warrant 
Officer Kadantsev's statement that they heard them while 
measuring the gas composition of air in compartment 5--that is, 
in the period from 1539 to 1557. The entry was made in the 
ship's log at 1624. 
  Thus there is also doubt regarding the time when these 
shocks 
were heard. And more likely the ``explosions'' that were 
``heard'' by Captain 1st Rank Kolyada in the conning tower 
superstructure and by Vice Admiral Zaytsev in Moscow have no 
relationship to actual events aboard the distressed submarine. 
  Nonetheless, Captain 1st Rank Kolyada is very reluctant to 
reject the desirable version of the sudden entry of water into 
the distressed compartments. Here is his reply to a question 
from the writer N. Cherkashin concerning ``what served as the 
cause of such a powerful and unexpected rush of water into the 
pressure hull'': ``First, the metal of the hull may have cracked 
due to the enormous temperature differential: It was thousands 
of degrees inside, and plus three outside.... Second, at high 
temperatures and high pressure, titanium can burn. The hull may 
have burned through at the border between compartments. Several 
other probable causes could be named.''[.sup]46[/] The writer 
and the captain 1st rank firmly decided that ``such a powerful 
and unexpected rush of water'' did occur, and that all that 
remained to do was to find a plausible story. But such a story 
does not exist, and any such story would not fit in with the 
chronology and with the actual circumstances of the accident. 
  Several words should be said about the jarring of the 
submarine observed during the time of the accident. 
  Captain Lieutenant A. G. Verezgov (interrogation tape 
recording): ``And now, the hull shuddered violently, 
periodically seven or eight times. In all probability VVD was 
flowing somewhere, because a wave couldn't do that.... The 
episodes of shaking were long-lasting. Each about 30-40 seconds. 
They began 30 minutes after surfacing, and they went on 
throughout the entire time the submarine was on the 
surface.'' 
  It is obvious from this statement that the submarine's 
shaking had nothing in common with ``explosions,'' and it was 
associated with entry of air into the distressed compartments 
from the high- pressure air system, blowing and flooding of main 
ballast tanks, escape of gases from the distressed compartments 
and entry of water into the pressure hull. 
<H5>  ``Prepare for Evacuation!'' </H5>
  What was the crew's assessment of the status of the 
distressed submarine at 1624, when information concerning 
``explosions'' was entered into the ship's log? Let's see what 
Captain 1st Rank Kolyada, the principal author of the open 
letter carried by the journal MORSKOY SBORNIK (No. 2, 1990), has 
to say. ``Yes, we were all truly certain until the last minutes 
that we would be able to save the submarine. Maximum possible 
sealing off of compartments 6 and 7, delivery of fire 
extinguisher into these compartments, and the decreasing 
temperature in the fore bulkhead of compartment 6 raised the 
hope that the fire would go out. The submarine's trim did not 
change until 1620, and there were no signs of water entering the 
pressure hull.'' 
  Such was the captain 1st rank's description of the last 
minutes of the tragedy in the open letter. But what was he 
reporting about these same minutes to the command post of the 
Northern Fleet? The report was received from the submarine at 
1635: ``The fire is intensifying. The temperature of the aft 
bulkhead of compartment 5 grew in 15 minutes from 70 to 
110ëC. Explosions could be heard from the regenerating 
system in compartments 6 and 7. The personnel need to be 
evacuated.'' 
  It would not be worth commenting on the above passage from 
the open letter--its falsehood is obvious. Let's look at the 
message. 
  Clear disinformation can be discerned in this message. There 
was no 15 minutes, and there was no intensification of the fire. 
The data (115ëC at 1557, and 111ëC at 1624) tell the 
opposite-- there was no fire, and the pressure hull was cooling 
down. But because of the large mass of metal, it was proceeding 
slowly. The``explosions'' fit in quite well with the message. It 
was apparently due to them that the personnel had to be 
evacuated. And although nothing is said about water entering the 
pressure hull, it is supposed that this was the case. Just 6 
minutes later, at 1641, a new message was received: ``The lines 
of defense are at the aft bulkhead of compartment 5. List 6ë 
to starboard, trim 3 meters (that corresponds to 1.5ë) by 
the stern due to entry of water into the pressure hull. 
Personnel ready for evacuation.'' 
  The ``explosions'' occurred, and ``such a powerful and 
unexpected rush of water into the pressure hull'' came about. 
There is also more than enough disinformation in this message. 
Lines of defense had not been organized at the aft bulkhead of 
compartment 5. The personnel were not ready for evacuation. The 
command to prepare for evacuation had not yet been given. The 
trim indicated in the message was different from the actual 
figure. 
  As was noted above, sections 4 and 7 of the government 
commission's working group established from an analysis of 
photographs taken from the airplane that trim gradually 
increased, and that by 1630 it was 2.5-3ë by the stern. The 
buoyancy reserve was lost gradually as well, due to filling of 
the ballast tanks and entry of water into the pressure hull. The 
loss of buoyancy reserve within the time indicated above was 
estimated by the working group at 760 tons; in this case the 
quantity of water that entered the pressure hull was estimated 
at 120 tons. 
  The members of the government commission's working group 
representing industry feel that given a 760 ton loss of total 
buoyancy reserve, as much as over 200 tons of water had entered 
into the pressure hull by this time. The loss of buoyancy 
reserve and the decrease in longitudinal stability of the 
submarine may have been determined by measuring its draft, and 
with a few simple computations. But this was not done. 
  In sending the message cited here, as early as before 1635 
the submarine leadership already believed that the ship was 
destined to sink. And even in these last minutes of the tragedy, 
the leadership of the ``Komsomolets'' lacked the courage to 
communicate the whole truth to the Northern Fleet's command post. 
  However, naval deputy commander-in-chief Vice Admiral V. V. 
Zaytsev disagrees with this conclusion. He stated the following 
opinion for the journal MORSKOY SBORNIK (No. 6, 1989): 
``Confident reports prior to 1635 indicate that ship damage 
control efforts were proceeding according to plan, that the 
situation aboard the submarine was being monitored, and that 
entry of water into the pressure hull was not noted.'' The 
conclusion--the most important thing is that these were 
``confident reports.'' 
  After such statements by the vice admiral you can't help 
becoming confused, and you don't know whom to believe: Vice 
Admiral V. V. Zaytsev as the naval deputy commander-in-chief, or 
Vice Admiral V. V. Zaytsev as the chairman of section 4 of the 
government commission's working group, who signed the joint act 
of sections 4 and 7. 
  How do we explain such an abrupt change in the nature of 
messages from the distressed submarine? There can only be one 
explanation. 
  After returning from compartment 5 (at 1624), Warrant 
Officer 
Kadantsev was ordered to blow the starboard main ballast tanks 
No. 5 and 7. 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (explanatory report): 
``On orders from the BCh-5 commander I shut the onboard valve of 
the starboard TsGB No. 7, and blew the starboard TsGB No. 7 and 
the starboard main ballast tank No. 5. Listing corrected to 
zero. The damage control division engineer reported that trim 
was growing, and that it was already 4ë by the stern.'' 
  When interrogated by the government commission, Warrant 
Officer Kadantsev clarified that he blew the main ballast tanks 
with air remaining in high-pressure air bottles in cofferdam No. 
3. 
  There are no entries in the ship's log regarding the blowing 
of the indicated tanks. Lieutenant Zaytsev also makes reference 
to the blowing of the starboard main ballast tank No. 7. There 
is no basis for disbelieving Warrant Officer Kadantsev and 
Lieutenant Zaytsev. 
  To equalize trim, it would have been sufficient to blow one 
main ballast tank. However, they decided blow two tanks. How 
suitable was this decision, and how did it affect the stability 
and unsinkability of the submarine? Main ballast tanks No. 5 and 
7 are situated forward of the submarine's center of gravity. 
When they are blown, in addition to an increase in buoyancy 
reserve the submarine's trim by the stern increases. 
  The next mistake is obvious. The attitude of the submarine 
worsened, and remaining high-pressure air was expended 
purposelessly, even though it could have been used with great 
benefit to blow main ballast tank No. 10 through the air line 
servicing the outboard devices. 
  When two main ballast tanks on one side were blown 
simultaneously, the submarine was shaken severely, and it tilted 
abruptly toward the stern. The tail plane disappeared beneath 
the water. This abrupt change in the submarine's attitude was 
the cause of change in the nature of accident reports. 
  At 1630 the magnitude of longitudinal stability reached such 
low values that rapid growth of trim and the tragic outcome of 
the events may have been also seen by the ``unaided eye'' of a 
nonspecialist, and the submarine's possible sinking raised 
alarm, without a single ray of hope. This is confirmed by 
photographs taken from the airplane and by crew testimony. 
  Lieutenant A. V. Zaytsev (interrogation tape recording): 
  Question: ``How do you correlate growth of trim with 
time?'' 
  Answer: ``1ë by the stern at approximately 1300, 
and 3ë until 1600. At around 1700 trim was 6.2ë.... Trim 
began rising abruptly from 1630 to 1700.'' 
  Senior Lieutenant of Medical Service L. A. Zayats 
(explanatory report): ``Somewhere around 1630-1340 I went up out 
of the submarine for the last time. The trim by the stern was 
already sizable, and it continued to grow quickly.'' 
  Captain 1st Rank B. G. Kolyada (interrogation tape 
recording): ``Trim began to grow after 1600, with the rate of 
increase of the trim being high.'' 
  It would be pertinent to recall here the previously cited 
assertion by Captain 1st Rank Kolyada that the submarine's trim 
did not change before 1620. 
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1640--List 6ë to starboard, trim 1.5ë by the 
stern.'' 
  The trim value written in the ship's log does not correspond 
to the actual value, which is confirmed by the testimony cited 
above and by an analysis of photographs taken from the airplane 
at this time. The list data raise doubts as well. 
  Messages received from the submarine at 1635 and 1641 were 
like a bolt out of the blue to the naval command. The commander 
of the Northern Fleet transmitted the following order through 
the fleet aviation command post: ``Prepare rescue chamber,'' and 
he asked the tender ``Aleksey Khlobystov'': ``Report the 
situation in compartment 5, was the reactor shut down, were gas 
generators used, is the main bilge pump being used to drain the 
distressed compartments, report pressure in the distressed 
compartments, be ready to evacuate personnel.'' It is clear from 
this request that for practical purposes the Northern Fleet's 
command post had extremely scanty information about the accident 
and the fight against it. And a cheerful report was received in 
response to this query (1650): ``Situation in compartment 5 
normal, gas generators were not used, damage control efforts 
continuing.'' What would you expect the Northern Fleet commander 
to think upon receiving such a confident report which, Vice 
Admiral V. V. Zaytsev feels, ``indicates that ship damage 
control efforts were proceeding according to plan, that the 
situation aboard the submarine was being monitored etc.'' 
  And at the same time: 
  From the ship's log: 
  1642--``Prepare for evacuation. Surrender secret 
literature to executives. Prepare secret literature for 
evacuation.'' 
  Think about this phrase. It doesn't say evacuate casualties 
or patients to approaching vessels. It says evacuate the entire 
submarine crew. Thus when it sent the message that the Northern 
Fleet's command post received at 1635, the submarine's 
leadership already believed that the ship was doomed. At 1642 an 
order was given to prepare the crew for evacuation from the 
doomed ship. 
  The evacuation order was given, but nothing was said about 
where to evacuate to. It is one thing to evacuate to approaching 
vessels, and another thing into the waters of the Norwegian Sea. 
So where did they intend to evacuate the submariners? From the 
interrogation tape recordings: 
  Lieutenant A. L. Stepanov: ``After this I went below to 
prepare the secret literature for evacuation, because the 
commander said that ships would be approaching now, and only a 
mooring party would remain aboard the submarine.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. V. Gerashchenko: ``I thought that a 
vessel had approached and that we were being taken off. I asked: 
``But who is going to stay here?'' BCh-1 commander: ``Don't 
worry, someone will stay.... Let's go topside quickly. We'll 
sort it out there''. '' 
  How were the submarine personnel prepared for evacuation. 
And 
where did the ``father-commanders'' intend to evacuate them to? 
  Captain 1st Rank B. G. Kolyada: ``And finally, the most 
important thing: We went topside not to jump into the water. 
There was one goal--to get some fresh air and meet the tender, 
which was approaching.''[.sup]47[/] 
  Now there's that famous fleet hospitality for you! Over an 
hour would pass before the tender would arrive, and they're 
already going topside to meet it! And not a word about 
evacuation. Such was the explanation given by the captain 1st 
rank to the wide masses of laborers to his egress topside from 
the submarine. But here is the way things really happened: 
  Captain 1st Rank B. G. Kolyada (report to the Northern 
Fleet commander): ``An Il-38 airplane arrived in the area at 
1445, it reported that three surface ships would reach us by 
1800.... We realized from the dynamics of increasing list to 
starboard and trim by the stern that the submarine would not be 
able to remain afloat until 1800, and so the personnel were 
given the command to ``go topside'' at 1650.'' 
  Thus the crew of the submarine was preparing for evacuation 
to approaching vessels, although its leadership already knew at 
this time that they would have to evacuate into the water, into 
the Norwegian Sea. This was the first reason why the personnel 
wound up without rescue equipment. 
  How much time did the crew need to prepare for evacuation, 
to 
don thermal underwear and survival suits, or to grab life 
jackets and safety vests? 
  Warrant Officer Yu. N. Anisimov: ``All of the diving 
gear was ready in our compartment. Had we been given the command 
to put it on, we would have been able to dress each other in 5 
minutes.''[.sup]48[/] 
  At the same time the Northern Fleet's command post 
transmitted the following command to the ``Komsomolets'' by way 
of the tender ``Aleksey Khlobystov'': ``Use the commander's VVD 
group to blow the aft group of ballast tanks. Report change in 
list and trim.'' 
  Use of the high-pressure air reserve in the commander's tank 
group for damage control would have radically altered the 
situation aboard the submarine even in the last stage of the 
accident. Given all of the conditions, this would have kept the 
submarine afloat until the arrival of the tender ``Aleksey 
Khlobystov''. 
  However, the personnel could not use this reserve of 
high-pressure air because it did not know how to do this. Nor 
did a diagram of the high-pressure air system, which was used in 
an attempt to sort things out, provide any help. The absence of 
the RBITS had its effect. 
  ``We went through the entire combat training course, we 
prepared for several years for our independent ``great'' cruise, 
we studied at the training center, we worked out the course 
problems with grades of good and excellent, and we finished our 
combat exercises. The training went on in full correspondence 
with the guidelines. And naturally we worked on damage control 
problems,'' said Captain 1st Rank Kolyada in a letter published 
in the journal MORSKOY SBORNIK (No. 2, 1990). 
  And so, a command to prepare for evacuation was given at 
1642. Why were the personnel unable to make adequate 
preparations for this? 
  ``None of us expected such a huge inrush of water into the 
aft compartments, when the ship's fate was decided in a matter 
of minutes. This was clearly not enough time to go below into 
the compartments and bring up over 50 sets of individual 
equipment''-- such was the explanation of this given by Captain 
1st Rank Kolyada in the newspaper IZVESTIYA (15 January 1990), 
and there isn't a single word of truth in this explanation. 
  Rather than quickly preparing rescue equipment, the 
personnel 
were occupied in the hasty evacuation of secret documents. There 
was enough time to go below and gather together the secret 
documents. These bits of paper turned out to be more precious to 
the submarine's leadership than the lives of the people. 
  Lieutenant A. L. Stepanov (explanatory report): 
``Everyone in the submarine was preparing for evacuation to a 
vessel. The submarine commander gave orders to prepare secret 
documents for evacuation. The BCh-1 commander and I began 
gathering documents. The trim began growing abruptly. The 
executive officer ordered us to take our vests and go topside. 
We continued to gather secret documents. Lieutenant Zaytsev ran 
up and said that the trim was 4- 5ë, and we had to go 
topside quickly. We left the secrets in the submarine and raced 
topside.'' 
  Interrogation tape recordings: 
  Captain Lieutenant S. A. Dvorov: ``A very great amount 
of time was lost evacuating secret documents.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. V. Gerashchenko: ``Everyone was 
running topside, and we got stuck with the box of secret 
documents. This created a small traffic jam.'' 
  Lieutenant A. V. Zaytsev: ``We exited mostly without 
vests, because there was no time, and it was dark.'' 
  Lieutenant Zaytsev's assertion that it was dark at this 
moment in the submarine is inconsistent with reality, and is not 
confirmed by a single participant of the tragedy. 
  Who can explain why boxes and bags of secret documents had 
to 
be gathered together and carried topside more than an hour 
before the expected arrival of vessels? If they were so 
concerned about preserving state secrecy, then: 
  Warrant Officer E. D. Kononov (explanatory report): 
``Carrying documents, I went topside, where I was washed 
overboard by a wave. I lost sight of the safe containing secret 
documents. One box containing documents was raised up to the 
tender. The second wasn't found.'' 
  Can any navy staffer guarantee that the contents of this 
box, 
as well as of the other boxes and bags, are lying at the bottom 
of the Norwegian Sea, and not being studied in other countries? 
  But high-placed representatives of the navy decided to 
forestall the ``probable adversary'' and publish most of the 
secret data on the submarine ``Komsomolets'' in the open press, 
and the initiative in this belongs to commander-in-chief Fleet 
Admiral V. N. Chernavin in the 13 May 1989 edition of the 
newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA. 
  The WALL STREET JOURNAL cites the following statement by the 
U.S. Navy chief of intelligence, Rear Admiral Thomas Brooks: 
``Glasnost made it possible for us to obtain the kind of 
invaluable information...on the Soviet Union for the collection 
of which we would have had to spend millions of dollars and 
waste many long years (using traditional intelligence gathering 
methods).'' As an example he cited the accident aboard the 
submarine ``Komsomolets''. Permit me, Comrade 
Commander-in-Chief, to congratulate you and your closest 
assistants, and offer a high evaluation of your efforts in 
behalf of U.S. naval intelligence! 
  Thus the senseless, or more accurately criminal, order to 
evacuate secret documents was the second reason why the 
personnel were unable to prepare for evacuation. Just due to 
this, members of the ``Komsomolets'' crew failed to put on 
survival suits, and did not take their safety vests and life 
jackets. The submarine's leadership failed to give the order to 
prepare the LAS-5M rescue boat located in compartment 1, and it 
did not give the command in time to prepare rafts and the rescue 
chamber for separation from the submarine. The one thing that 
the leadership of the ``Komsomolets'' did manage to do was to 
report to the Northern Fleet's command post back at 1641 that 
the personnel were ready for evacuation. 
<H5>  The Rescue Rafts </H5>
  From the ship's log: 
  ``1645--Compartment 1 unsealed. Prepare battery tank 
for venting.'' 
  This was the last entry in the ship's log. 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (explanatory report): 
``The mechanic ordered me to close the bulkhead door between 
compartments 4 and 5, shut shut-off 1 of the aft block's exhaust 
ventilation system, and shut the bulkhead door between 
compartments 4 and 3. Before shutting the bulkheads between 
compartments 4 and 5 I walked back to the stern and checked the 
temperature of the compartment 6 bulkhead. It was exactly 
100ëC. I closed the bulkhead and started shutting shut-off 1 
of the exhaust ventilation system, but I could not shut it 
completely, because air began entering the ventilation 
shaft.'' 
  This is one more confirmation that there was no fire in the 
distressed compartments, and that the pressure hull was cooling 
down. 
  Fulfilling the incompetent order to close shut-off 1 of the 
exhaust ventilation system, Warrant Officer Kadantsev 
simultaneously opened the exhaust ventilation shaft flooding 
valve--that is, he unwittingly promoted faster flooding of the 
submarine. Another indication of the personnel's poor knowledge 
of the materiel. 
  The rescue vessels were still far away, while the cold 
waters 
of the Norwegian Sea were right there. Now came the time to put 
rescue equipment to use. We've already talked about the survival 
suits, the thermal underwear and the safety vests and life 
jackets. Because of the poor administrative skills of the 
submarine's leadership, most of the crew was without them. Nor 
was the LAS-5M boat deployed. 
  Immediately after the submarine surfaced, the personnel 
began 
preparing the PSN-20 rescue rafts for launching. This required 
from one (Lieutenant Stepanov) to two (Captain Lieutenant 
Paramonov) hours. The crew voiced complaints in this connection 
regarding the long time it took to prepare the rafts for use. It 
is hard to say how justified these complaints were. The 
``Komsomolets'' is the only submarine in the navy that carries 
rafts outside the pressure hull. It may be said without 
exaggeration that this location of the rafts saved the lives of 
most of the surviving crewmembers. And it is no accident that 
one of the measures for raising the survivability of submarines 
foresees studying the possibilities of locating rafts outside 
the pressure hull. As for the time it takes to prepare the rafts 
for use, the designer placed his priority (in the absence of any 
requirements and standards) on the reliability with which the 
raft containers were secured to the rescue chamber. 
  And so, the raft containers were prepared for launching. 
What 
has to be done to launch the rafts? In order for everyone to 
understand this, I should first say a few words about the 
structure of the raft launcher. The rafts of the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' were in hard containers, each with two 
rack-and-pinion releases. The upper release and lid were 
intended for extraction of the raft at a naval base for 
certification purposes, while the lower release is used to drop 
the raft on the water. When the lower rack-and- pinion is 
turned, the lower part of the hard container falls into the 
water together with the raft and sinks, while the raft remains 
on the water surface. The raft inflating system is activated by 
two tugs on a line. Thus 1 minute is enough to deploy rafts 
ready for launching. Instead of this, they began pulling the 
rafts out through the top, lowering them by hand to the deck of 
the superstructure, and activating the inflating system there. 
Considering the great weight of a raft (around 90 kilograms) and 
the position of the containers when they are moved out of their 
recesses, one can imagine how much effort it took for the people 
to launch a single raft. Not enough time was left to extract the 
second raft from its container. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UST-003LC-36A>           Location of Rescue Rafts and the Stages of Their Preparation for Use: </FIG>




   [Text] Why did this happen? Did Captain 1st Rank Vanin's 
crew know how to deploy the rafts? 
  Submarine Senior Watch Officer Captain Lieutenant A. G. 
Verezgov (interrogation tape recording): ``All I had were two 
log books for the rafts and some brief written instructions. But 
I never read about or saw how to use the rafts in the rescue 
chamber's recesses. Twice I inspected the rafts on the rescue 
station, removing the upper lid and pulling the rafts out from 
the top by hand.'' 
  But it would be wrong to assert on the basis of this 
statement by Captain Lieutenant Verezgov that no one in the crew 
knew how to deploy the rafts. Who was the first to begin pulling 
the rafts out from the top, thus guiding the actions of the 
personnel in the wrong direction? 
  Warrant Officer S. R. Grigoryan (explanatory report): 
``There were already many people topside.... Captain 1st Rank 
Kolyada tried to pull out the rescue raft, but he wasn't strong 
enough. I helped him extract the raft. Then I began pulling out 
the second raft.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. V. Gerashchenko (interrogation tape 
recording): ``We pulled out the raft on the left, and tried to 
open it up. Political affairs chief Burkulakov and Warrant 
Officer Grigoryan were standing on the right side. They were 
trying to pull the second raft out. I started helping them drag 
it up. The joke was on us. There's supposed to be a pedal there. 
You press it, and the raft falls down and opens up. But here we 
were dragging it up.'' 
  So there you have it. The technical ignorance of the 
``father- commanders'' aggravated the tragedy. Much time has 
passed since the accident, but Captain 1st Rank Kolyada still 
believes that the rafts had to be pulled out through the top. 
``Using the rafts was the only correct decision in that 
situation. But the design of the rafts turned out to be so 
imperfect that it was extremely difficult to extract them from 
the sealed containers, and beyond that, they were very easily 
upset by a wave,'' he said in the newspaper IZVESTIYA (15 
January 1990). The tragedy had not taught the captain 1st rank 
anything. 
  How did events develop subsequently? Let's look at the 
explanatory reports: 
  Warrant Officer V. V. Gerashchenko: ``People on the 
port side of the upper deck were trying to deploy the raft, but 
they were washed over the starboard side by a wave. It was 
impossible to pull the raft on the right side out of its 
container, and the water level rose over my legs, I swam over to 
the raft, on which people were already gathering.'' 
  Warrant Officer S. R. Grigoryan: ``I couldn't pull the 
second raft out by myself; I called out to Captain Lieutenant A. 
G. Verezgov, and he began helping me. Suddenly I found myself 
pulling on the raft alone--Verezgov, it turns out, jumped 
overboard. I looked at the bow of the ship, it was up rather 
high, but people and hats were already floating near the ship. I 
never did realize that the submarine was sinking, and so I 
continued pulling at the raft. Suddenly the water went over my 
head as the submarine rose to vertical and the impact of the 
water. (Sic.--D.R.). Even so, I was able to extract the raft, 
but I let go of it as it pulled me down.'' 
  As the submarine sank further, the positive buoyancy of the 
raft caused the line by which it was secured to the railing on 
the conning tower superstructure to break, and it rose to the 
surface. 
  What assessment did the crewmembers give to the raft? 
  Captain Lieutenant S. A. Dvorov (interrogation tape 
recording): ``The rafts are good-for-nothing, and their design 
is a disgrace. If we had other rafts, we could have saved some 
people....'' 
  Question: ``Did you practice launching the rafts in 
your daily life over the last 5 years?'' 
  Answer: ``Never in our lives. In the navy we spent our 
time scribbling on paper, rather than practicing damage control. 
Never in all of my career of 12 years had anyone ever deployed 
the life rafts. We never practiced egress through the torpedo 
tubes either. We studied this at the training station, but it 
wasn't hands-on. We don't know how to open up the aircraft 
rafts. I never saw the aircraft rafts.'' 
  Such is the assessment, which is very full of emotion and 
very lacking in practical knowledge. But this didn't keep 
Captain Lieutenant Dvorov from subsequently continuing his 
bemoaning of the rescue equipment and talking about the crew's 
high combat proficiency. ``Armchair-seamen'' journalists began a 
campaign bemoaning and deriding Russian equipment and seeking 
its mythical inadequacies on the basis of statements by such 
``experts'' in the press, but more about that later. For the 
moment, let's listen to a specialist. 
  Chief designer B. Z. Taubin:[.sup]49[/] ``Inflatable 
life rafts (PSN) are a group rescue resource used by navies of 
all the world. Owing to the speed of their automatic deployment, 
their invulnerability to blows against the side of a vessel, and 
other positive qualities, rafts are commonly considered to be 
the most effective modern rescue craft. In combination with 
competent use of rescue rafts and training of all seamen in 
their use, equipping vessels of the country's fishing fleet with 
them had completely excluded the loss of human lives in ship 
accidents and sinkings resulting from imperfections of rescue 
equipment.... In the accident aboard the submarine 
``Komsomolets'', rather than dropping the inflatable raft onto 
the water in its container, and then activating the gas 
inflating system by tugging the inflating line, the personnel, 
who were not trained in the rules of using such a raft, undid 
the lacing and extracted the raft from its container. This 
defeated the raft deployment design, and the raft filled with 
gas while upside down, which resulted in the deaths of many 
people. The lack of training of the crews of warships and naval 
auxiliary vessels practically cancels out the reliability of 
inflatable rafts and promises bitter consequences. Nor does the 
navy have stations at which inflatable rafts could undergo 
annual certification, which is contradictory to the technical 
conditions governing their use. For your information: There are 
around 50 such stations working in contact with the 
manufacturing plant within the Ministry of Fish Industry, the 
Ministry of Maritime Fleet and some other civilian departments 
of the country.'' 
  We should add to this that violation of the rules of using 
rafts caused the upper floats and awning supports to be 
underinflated, and this prevented the personnel from turning the 
raft over in the water, reduced its buoyancy, and sharply 
worsened the conditions of the people inside it. And the 
submariners paid for these mistakes with their lives. 
  It was precisely at this time that the last message was 
received from the submarine: ``Trim increasing abruptly. All 
personnel are topside.'' 
<H5>  The Rescue Chamber </H5>
  Much was written in the press about why submarine commander 
Captain 1st Rank Ye. A. Vanin went back down into the submarine. 
In the opinion of the authors of such articles, while topside 
the commander learned that there were still people down below, 
and this motivated him to go back inside the submarine. Much was 
said in this case about old naval traditions and about heroic 
deeds. It seems that all of these authors were paying a dubious 
service to the commander, at least because according to old 
naval tradition, before abandoning ship the commander must make 
sure that he is in fact the last to leave. But tradition does 
not foresee departure of the commander from a ship followed by 
his subsequent return. So why did the commander, who was 
topside, go back inside the submarine? 
  Let's back-track a little. At 1645 the Northern Fleet 
commander ordered the commander of the ``Komsomolets'' to 
prepare the rescue chamber (VSK) for separation from the 
submarine. 
  Warrant Officer S. R. Grigoryan (explanatory report): 
``...after which I began pulling out the second raft. At this 
time the commander gave orders to prepare the VSK for release, 
and crawled into the VSK.'' 
  Apparently the submarine commander went topside in order to 
estimate the situation and to give the order to prepare the 
rescue chamber for separation from the ship, because at this 
time all the personnel were topside. This can be the only 
explanation why Captain 3d Rank V. A. Yudin, Warrant Officer A. 
V. Krasnobayev and Warrant Officer S. I. Chernikov were in the 
chamber in addition to the commander and Warrant Officer 
Slyusarenko. 
  Warrant Officer V. F. Slyusarenko (interrogation tape 
recording): ``I took the secret file the BCh-1 commander gave 
me, and went over to the security officers, to whom I turned 
over the file, because the evacuation was starting. There was no 
one in the gyro-compass room, so I grabbed two vests (I couldn't 
find any more) and ran to the exit. I could see the commander 
standing with one leg on the ladder beneath the hatch. He asked 
me: ``Are you the last?'' I replied: 'Yes,' because I hadn't 
seen anyone else. It was then that Yudin shouted from above that 
Captain 3d Rank Ispenkov was still back there--he was attending 
to the diesel generator, having replaced Seaman Filippov when 
the latter became too weak. I ran back for Ispenkov, and at that 
moment the submarine tilted severely to the stern. I went down 
the ladder and shouted to Ispenkov, who dropped everything and 
ran topside. He was wearing ear muffs. At he was climbing up he 
shouted that water was entering compartment 3. A jet of water 
was beating against the right side from the back of compartment 
2.'' 
  It follows from Warrant Officer Slyusarenko's statement that 
Captain 3d Rank Ispenkov had not been informed of the 
evacuation. It was asserted later on in the press[.sup]50[/] 
that Ispenkov ``probably didn't hear the often-repeated command 
to evacuate.'' Even the novice submariner knows that next to a 
working diesel generator the human voice cannot be heard beyond 
just 1 or 2 meters away, and no voice commands can reach the 
action station beside the diesel generator. Captain 3d Rank 
Ispenkov should have been informed of the evacuation by a 
special messenger, but this was not done. 
  In addition Slyusarenko's statement confirms that the 
lighting was functioning in the submarine's compartments until 
the very last moment, and Lieutenant Zaytsev's assertion of the 
reverse is inconsistent with reality. 
  How suitable was the order to prepare the rescue chamber for 
separation from the ship? Under certain conditions the chamber 
could have become a very great aid in survival of people in the 
frigid waters of the Norwegian Sea. Meaning that the order was 
suitable. Unfortunately it was given too late. But even so, all 
was not yet lost. 
  Much has been written about the rescue chamber. Most 
authors, 
who won't make the effort to even try to understand what this 
thing is, condemn the rescue chamber, calling it the ``chamber 
of death.''[.sup]51[/] The impression is created that even 
special articles devoted to rescue chambers are written by 
dilettantes.[.sup]52[/] Something needs to be said about the 
rescue chamber in this connection. 
  As is the case aboard other submarines, the rescue chamber 
of 
the ``Komsomolets'' is intended for the rescue of the entire 
crew when the submarine is on the bottom. It should be stated 
that the question of the possibility of detaching the surface 
chamber from the submarine when the latter collapses at depth 
(known as damage control problem No 4) was examined in the 
planning process, but work on this variant produced a negative 
result. 
  The rescue chamber is secured at its coaming by a 
rack-and-pinion release to the coaming of the submarine, such 
that a waterproof space (the fore chamber) is created between it 
and the ship's hull. Detaching the rescue chamber after its 
occupation by the crew requires: closing and locking the lower 
conning tower hatch and the lower hatch of the rescue chamber; 
setting the catch manually; turning the rack-and-pinion ring 
pneumatically or by hand; filling the fore chamber with water 
and equalizing its pressure with the outside water pressure; 
when necessary, feeding air to the pneumatic pusher for initial 
separation of the rescue chamber from the submarine. 
  That's all that needs to be said about the rescue chamber. 
  The submarine ``Komsomolets'' began sinking with a trim of 
around 80ë by the stern. 
  Warrant Officer A. M. Kopeyka (interrogation tape 
recording): ``The mechanic shouted: ``Close the hatch--there are 
people in there!'' The submarine was already going down, but I 
managed to force the upper conning tower hatch down with my 
legs.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. F. Slyusarenko (explanatory report): 
``I ran to the exit, to the VSK, and started climbing up, but 
the water falling from above washed me away. I got rid of the 
life jackets and started climbing again, but the water swept me 
away again.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (the newspaper 
PODVODNIK ZAPOLYARYA, 20 April 1989): ``They were in the VSK. 
Kopeyka used his leg--slam! And the catch on the hatch cover 
engaged. Had those who remained in the chamber battened it down, 
everything would have been all right.'' 
  And so, the upper hatch of the rescue chamber was held in 
place only by its catch. Water entered the chamber. Calculations 
show that the water that entered the chamber reduced its 
positive buoyancy to the minimum, equal to around 1-1.5 tonnes. 
  There is no need to discuss the difficulty with which 
Warrant 
Officer Slyusarenko managed to get inside the rescue chamber. It 
was not until the submarine's trim equalized that Captain 3d 
Rank Yudin and Warrant Officer Chernikov were able to drag 
Warrant Officer Slyusarenko into the chamber. A great deal of 
effort had to be expended to close and batten down its lower 
hatch. 
  Warrant Officer V. F. Slyusarenko (interrogation tape 
recording): ``I was pulled by my arms into the VSK on the 
commander's orders, and they began closing the hatch right away. 
Krasnobayev and I held onto the lower hatch of the VSK by a rope 
tied to the handle.... Then water started coming in from above, 
completely flooding the fore chamber--dirty liquid. (He is 
referring to the coaming of the lower hatch of the VSK, and not 
the fore chamber.--D.R.). The commander gave the order to batten 
down the hatch in the fore chamber. Using a monkey wrench, Yudin 
and Chernikov managed to close the hatch. Before the hatch was 
closed we heard noise recalling boiling water--obviously air was 
escaping from the sinking submarine.'' 
  As we can see from this, air entered the chamber from the 
submarine at the moment the lower hatch of the rescue chamber 
was being battened down, creating an elevated pressure within 
it. Unfortunately, no one who remained in the chamber attached 
the proper significance to this, because toxic gases entered the 
chamber together with the air. It is hard to estimate the depth 
at which the lower hatch of the rescue chamber was closed, and 
how high the pressure rose within it. We can assume that the 
depth was 300-400 meters, and the pressure was 1-2 
kg/cm[.sup]2[/]. 
  And what about the lower conning tower hatch, which should 
have been closed first? 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev (interrogation tape 
recording): 
  Question: ``Had the fore chamber hatch been battened 
down? (The reference is to the lower conning tower 
hatch.--D.R.).'' 
  Answer: ``No. Because the ladder had to be dropped. 
There wasn't enough time.'' 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UST-003LC-40A>           Rescue Chamber: 1--catch setting mechanism; 2--manual rack-and-pinion turning mechanism; </FIG>




  [Text] But the ladder was not the only thing that prevented 
closure of the lower conning tower hatch. The air hose that had 
been installed for oxygen decompression treatment would also 
have been an obstacle to closing it. In addition the rescue 
chamber was ``tethered'' by this hose to the submarine's 
pressure hull. This meant that the rescue chamber could surface 
only after the submarine compartments were completely flooded 
and the pressure within it was equalized with outside pressure, 
on the condition that the chamber's buoyancy would be sufficient 
to break the air hose. But the men who remained in the chamber 
didn't think of this. 
  Warrant Officer V. F. Slyusarenko (explanatory report): 
``At this moment we heard a rapping from below. In all 
probability this was Ispenkov. The commander began shouting: 
``Come on, open the hatch, they might still be alive there!'' He 
obviously didn't know that Ispenkov was alone.'' 
  But it was already too late. Soon after, there were several 
shocks--the transverse bulkheads were obviously breaking. Then 
the noise stopped. 
  Warrant Officer Slyusarenko (interrogation tape 
recording): ``The commander said: ``Hurry and release the VSK.'' 
You could hear the bulkheads cracking. I asked: ``How deep is 
the sea?'' They told me: ``1500. Hurry, or we'll be crushed.'' 
The depth gauge read 400 meters, and the pointer was no longer 
moving--it had gone off the scale. Yudin started releasing the 
valves. One was used to flood the fore chamber, and the other 
was for emergency release of the VSK. Yudin opened the VSK 
release valve, but nothing happened. The commander said: 
``What's this, have you forgotten how to release the VSK? Come 
on, remember!'' Chernikov began reading the instructions on 
releasing the VSK. Following the instructions, Yudin began 
turning the VSK's rack-and-pinion. The three of us started 
turning the rack-and-pinion with a wrench, but we were 
unsuccessful. The commander said that if we reach bottom, the 
VSK would collapse, when suddenly there was a shock beneath us, 
like a bomb exploding, followed by intense vibration.'' 
  The sequence of the personnel's actions following separation 
of the rescue chamber from the submarine was presented somewhat 
differently in Warrant Officer Slyusarenko's explanatory report. 
In particular, it may be surmised from the report that first 
they tried to turn the rack-and-pinion by hand, using a wrench, 
and only after that did they try to do it by opening the valves. 
But that's not the point. We cannot be fully certain that the 
personnel had carried out all of the operation to separate the 
rescue chamber from the submarine correctly, even with the help 
of the posted instructions. This is despite the fact that the 
crew is supposed to know how to do this even in the absence of 
light. The ignorance of the personnel of the ``Komsomolets'' of 
the physical laws and principles of action of the rescue chamber 
releasing devices can be clearly discerned in this episode. With 
the lower conning tower hatch open, the crew could not have done 
anything to separate the rescue chamber from the submarine until 
pressure within the submarine equalized with the outside water 
pressure. 
  Nor was Captain 1st Rank Kolyada able to sort this out. With 
the aplomb of that ``scholar who lived next door'' in that 
Chekhov story, he discusses the ``reasons'' why they were unable 
to disconnect the rescue chamber in time, and he believes that 
it separated by chance.[.sup]53[/] 
  What actually happened? Apparently after the latch securing 
the rescue chamber was released, the pneumatic system was used 
to turn the rack-and-pinion to the position permitting 
separation of the chamber. An attempt to once again turn the 
rack-and-pinion manually with a wrench was unsuccessful under 
these conditions. Opening of the fore chamber flooding valve 
produced no results because the lower conning tower hatch was 
open, and outside pressure continued to press the rescue chamber 
against the coaming of the submarine's pressure hull with great 
force. 
  At what depth was the ship when that shock recalling an 
explosion occurred, and how many shocks of this kind were there? 
Captain 1st Rank Kolyada and warrant officers Slyusarenko, 
Kopeyka and Grigoryan heard one shock. Captain Lieutenant Orlov 
believes that there were two shocks. What could have caused the 
explosion-like shocks? 
  A review of video tapes and photographs of the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' lying on the bottom revealed damage to the upper 
cover of compartment 1's entry hatch (the lower cover of the 
entry hatch was opened by the personnel during evacuation). The 
nature of the damage and the positions of the damaged structures 
clearly indicate that this damage occurred after the submarine 
struck bottom. Of all the possible causes of damage to the upper 
cover of the entry hatch (explosion of ammunition, explosion of 
gases released from the storage battery or torpedoes, a shock 
wave caused by elastic deformations of the pressure hull as the 
submarine struck bottom, and hydraulic shock occurring with 
rupture of the pressure tanks), hydraulic shock is the most 
probable cause. When the submarine struck bottom, the pressure 
tanks in compartments 2 and 3 ruptured, producing a hydraulic 
shock. It damaged the upper cover of the entry hatch of 
compartment 1, and helped the rescue chamber to separate from 
the submarine. This shock, which recalled an explosion, should 
have sounded like a double shock, and it was detected by the 
people in the rescue chamber and aboard the life raft. 

<FIG ID=JPRS-UST-003LC-41A>           Ship's Clock of the Submarine ``Komsomolets'' </FIG>




  [Text] This discussion of hydraulic shock is based on 
the practical experience of designing the submarine 
``Komsomolets''. In 1975, during strength trials on an 
experimental compartment of this submarine, the testing chamber 
was ruptured by a hydraulic shock. The conditions causing it 
were repeated in relation to many parameters during the 
submarine tragedy. 
  Warrant Officer V. F. Slyusarenko (explanatory report): 
``...but suddenly an explosion of terrible force occurred 
beneath us, and vibrations passed through the entire hull. I 
thought the VSK had been crushed, but no water came in. The 
commander asked: ``So tell me, has the VSK been released or 
not?'' Yudin said that we didn't know. Then someone shouted for 
everyone to connect up to their IDAs. Chernikov and I connected 
up, but Yudin and the others didn't. Yudin lost consciousness, 
he went into convulsions, and was snoring.... From the upper 
tier the commander began giving orders to connect Yudin up to an 
IDA, which Chernikov and I did with great difficulty, because 
the mask was tight, and it was very hard to put it on. After we 
connected Yudin up and placed him comfortably on a bench, he 
began taking infrequent but deep breaths; wondering how the 
commander was doing because I was no longer hearing any orders 
from him, I crawled up. The commander was sitting on a bench 
with his head lowered. He was snoring, and an IDA was lying near 
his legs. Krasnobayev was lying on his side, showing no signs of 
life. He never did manage to pull his IDA from its storage 
compartment.'' 
  The attempts by Slyusarenko and Chernikov to place the mask 
of the breathing apparatus over the submarine commander's head 
were unsuccessful. 
  This brings to mind the article in the newspaper KRASNAYA 
ZVEZDA (7 October 1989) in which Captain Lieutenant Verezgov 
discusses the political department chief, Captain 1st Rank T. A. 
Burkulakov: ``He was the one who came up with the contest for 
the best beard of the cruise.'' The degree to which this 
``contest'' is associated in this case with difficulties in 
donning IDA masks is unknown. In the ``good old days'' 
submariners were prohibited from growing beards on the basis of 
the need for using individual protective equipment. 
  In the words of Warrant Officer Slyusarenko, immediately 
after the ``explosion'' the air in the rescue chamber became 
filled with a dense mist, and it became much harder to hear. 
  The rest of the crew of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' was 
continuing its fight for its life during this time. 
  Warrant Officer A. M. Kopeyka (interrogation tape 
recording): ``People were floundering all around in the water, 
because they didn't know how to swim.... We were all without 
life jackets, no one had expected the submarine to disappear so 
quickly.'' 
  Captain 1st Rank B. G. Kolyada (report to the Northern 
Fleet commander): ``On finding themselves in the water, the 
personnel were forced to use just the one PSN-20 raft, the 
second had been swept about 100 meters away, and there was no 
swimming up to it.'' 
  And in the newspaper PODVODNIK ZAPOLYARYA (20 April 1989) 
the 
participants of the event shared their memories: 
  Captain Lieutenant V. A. Gregulev: ``And some didn't 
know how to swim. Seaman Mikhalev for example, a mechanic. A 
good seaman, conscientious. He went down so quietly, silently. 
Only because he didn't know how to swim.'' 
  Captain Lieutenant Yu. N. Paramonov: ``I was fully 
conscious the entire time, and I knew that it would be hard to 
make it on a single raft. But the second had drifted around 50 
meters away. I could see that this was a desperate situation, 
that we might all die, and so I decided to swim over to the 
second raft.'' 
  Unfortunately Captain Lieutenant Paramonov was unable to 
follow through with his intentions. 
  Warrant Officer V. V. Gerashchenko (interrogation tape 
recording): ``The raft was in the water. Waves broke over us 
head- high. Washing people off. Nothing could be done.'' 
  ``The rescued submariners said that fewer would have died, 
had the submariners had individual inflatable life rafts, like 
the kind naval pilots have. They would have been so useful to 
those jumping overboard into the frigid sea.''[.sup]54[/] 
  There was an LAS-5M aircraft emergency inflatable life raft 
of this kind, with a capacity of five men, in compartment 1. But 
the crew was so ``well'' trained that apparently it didn't even 
know of its existence. This life raft could have changed the 
situation in the most fundamental way: A possibility would have 
appeared for making use of the second PSN-20 raft and the rafts 
dropped from airplanes. And then all of the submariners could 
have accommodated themselves on the rafts, and even those who 
couldn't swim would have been saved. 
  Warrant Officer V. F. Slyusarenko (explanatory report): 
``Simultaneously with calling out to Chernikov for help I heard 
the noise of rushing water--this was the sound of the VSK rising 
to the surface, and the pointer of the depth gauge jerked and 
began dropping down abruptly from the 400 mark; the pointer on 
the pressure gauge also began crawling down. In 1-2 minutes the 
VSK surfaced. Chernikov had managed to come only half-way up. At 
this moment the pressure inside the VSK blew the catches on the 
upper hatch of the VSK, and Chernikov was ejected out like a 
cork. The force took me only half-way out, because I was a 
slight distance away from the hatch, beside the commander.... I 
saw Chernikov 20 meters away from the VSK, water rushed in 
through the open hatch from all directions, and in 5-7 seconds 
the VSK took on water and went down to the bottom like a rock. I 
stayed on the surface.'' 
  Given that the pressure in the rescue chamber was over 2 
kg/cm[.sup]2[/], the cover of the upper hatch may have been 
torn off from its catch, and the rush of air could have ejected 
Warrant Officer Chernikov out of the chamber. The possibility is 
not excluded that Chernikov himself released the catch on the 
hatch cover. Regardless of this, the carelessness of the 
submariners who remained in the rescue chamber (they hadn't 
battened down the chamber's upper hatch with its 
rack-and-pinion) resulted in its sinking and the demise of the 
people inside it. 
  The reactive force of the air jet forced the chamber below 
the surface, and ``swallowing'' water, it sank. Tentative 
calculations show that an initial chamber pressure of around 0.5 
kg/cm[.sup]2[/] would have been sufficient for this to occur. 
  How do we explain and tie together the ``explosion,'' the 
mist and the worsening of audibility coupled with the almost 
simultaneous loss of consciousness by three persons who had not 
put on the masks of their breathing apparatus? There are no 
sufficiently persuasive explanations for this. But all of this 
could be explained if we assume that the ``explosion'' and the 
vibration were separate in time from the rest of the events. 
Apparently right after the ``explosion'' the rescue chamber 
began surfacing, and as it approached the water surface the 
pressure inside the chamber unseated the upper cover of the 
chamber somewhat (this cover was held by a catch). The air in 
the chamber began bleeding overboard, and the pressure within it 
started falling swiftly. This caused the ears of the people to 
``plug up,'' and worsened their hearing. The drop in pressure 
caused cooling of the air remaining in the chamber, and when the 
``dew point'' was reached, a mist formed. Because the chamber 
was filled with air having a high concentration of carbon 
dioxide and carbon monoxide, and consequently a reduced oxygen 
concentration, the drop in pressure reduced the partial pressure 
of oxygen in it below permissible limits. As a result of this, 
three of the crewmembers who had not put on their IDA-59 
self-contained breathing apparatus lost consciousness due to 
oxygen starvation, and were poisoned by carbon dioxide and 
carbon monoxide. All of the subsequent actions by warrant 
officers Slyusarenko and Chernikov to put the IDA-59 masks over 
the faces of Yudin and submarine commander Vanin occurred while 
the rescue chamber was on the surface. It follows from this 
version that the cover of the upper hatch had not been torn from 
its catch by the inside pressure. Instead, it had been released 
from it by Warrant Officer Chernikov. 
  Looking at the video tapes and photographs taken from 
submersibles in summer 1989, one significant detail can be 
noted, one which would have been wrong to hide or discard as 
unimportant. On an image of the visible part of the 
rack-and-pinion ring securing the rescue chamber to the 
submarine hull, one section of this ring may be classified as a 
section with a broken tooth. In the meantime the neighboring 
teeth show no visible damage. The absence of imagery of the 
matching part of the release on the submarine's pressure hull 
does not permit any definite conclusion. This question could be 
clarified fully only by raising the rescue chamber or submarine. 
But it would be very important to clarify it. This would help 
reduce the following conflicting statements by the tragedy's 
participants to a common denominator. Interrogation tape 
recordings: 
  Warrant Officer V. F. Slyusarenko: ``We never were able 
to release the rack-and-pinion of the VSK. I feel that we were 
torn away from it, that we hadn't released it, because it was 
said that there was an additional fastening bolt.'' 
  Warrant Officer V. S. Kadantsev: 
  Question: ``What kept the rack-and-pinion of the VSK 
from turning? 
  Answer: ``A locking device. There was no additional 
bolt.'' 
  In August-September 1991 a deep-sea submersible inspected 
the 
matching part of the rack-and-pinion release on the submarine's 
pressure hull. All of the teeth on the rack-and-pinion ring on 
the ship's pressure hull are undamaged, which clearly indicates 
that the system for separating the rescue chamber had worked 
``by the book,'' and confirms the absence of any additional 
fastening bolt that supposedly hindered turning of the 
rack-and-pinion. 
  Concluding our discussion of the rescue chamber, we can say 
the following. It sank together with the commander of the 
submarine, Captain 1st Rank Ye. A. Vanin, Captain 3d Rank V. A. 
Yudin and Warrant Officer A. V. Krasnobayev, and it is now lying 
on the bottom of the Norwegian Sea with the upper hatch open, in 
ideal conditions for raising. The technical resources available 
to the navy can accomplish this raising in a short time without 
significant expense. But the commander-in-chief of the navy has 
nothing to say, his numerous admirals have nothing to say, and 
captains of all ranks have nothing to say. They have obviously 
exhausted the limit of their concern for the crew of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'', such that there was not enough left 
for giving three submariners a decent human burial in the 
ground. It might be said that raising the rescue chamber from a 
depth of around 1,600 meters is a complex engineering problem, 
and failure would be possible. I agree. But he who does nothing, 
gets nothing. Yes, we might even fail, but we still need to make 
the attempt to raise the chamber. 
  Concluding my narration of the actions of the crew of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'' during the accident, it would be wrong 
not to mention the heroic and self-sacrificing actions of 
certain members of the crew. And among them, Captain 3d Rank 
Anatoliy Matveyevich Ispenkov, who carried out his military duty 
to the end, should be named first. Nor can we forget Senior 
Seaman Nadari Otariyevich Bukhnikashvili and Warrant Officer 
Vladimir Vasilyevich Kolotilin, the first to meet the challenge 
of the situation, Captain 3d Rank Vyacheslav Aleksandrovich 
Yudin, who did much to save the crew, Captain 3d Rank Aleksandr 
Vasilyevich Volodin, Lieutenant Vadim Vladimirovich Zimin and 
Warrant Officer Gennadiy Vyacheslavovich Kovalev, who maintained 
communication until the last minutes of the tragedy, and Warrant 
Officer Yuriy Fedorovich Kapusta, who shared his rescue 
equipment with comrades. 
<H5>  The Results </H5>
  And so, we can make the following conclusions on the basis 
of 
the results of examining the circumstances of the accident: 
  1. Analysis of the crew's actions during the accident 
revealed its total inability to fight for the submarine's 
survival. Weak combat and occupational training of the crew led 
to the tragic outcome of the accident aboard the submarine 
``Komsomolets''. 
  2. Until the very last moment of the tragedy there was a 
possibility for radically changing the situation in the fight 
for the submarine's survival through active and competent 
actions, and in all cases, to keep it afloat until rescue 
vessels could arrive. The submarine sank with 25 percent of its 
reserve of high-pressure air unused, with the diesel generator 
operating, with an operating electric power system, with working 
damage control equipment, and with functioning electric 
lighting. The absence of the RBITS negatively affected both the 
crew's training in submarine damage control problems and its 
actions during the accident. 
  3. The delay of the submarine's attack center in 
transmitting 
the distress signal, the irresponsibility of the Northern 
Fleet's command post in organizing rescue operations, the lack 
of any leadership by the ship's command in evacuating the crew 
from the sinking submarine and the personnel's poor knowledge of 
the rules of using rescue equipment were the causes of the 
demise of the greater part of the crew. 
  4. There is no evidence that the submarine ``Komsomolets'' 
went to sea with a serviceable oxygen gas analyzer and with a 
serviceable television system. The faulty oxygen gas analyzer in 
compartment 7 and the grossest violations of the rules of 
operating the technical resources were the most probable causes 
of the fire in compartment 7. Absence of a technical crew aboard 
the submarine ``Komsomolets'' and, as a consequence of this, 
poor quality preparation of the ship for the cruise, were the 
preconditions for the accident. 
  5. No real or imaginary imperfections in equipment, systems 
and the submarine itself were the cause of the accident and the 
fire in compartment 7, or influenced the tragedy's outcome. 
  6. During the accident all equipment of the main propulsion 
unit operated trouble-free, blocking and safety systems foreseen 
by the design worked normally, ensuring timely deenergizing and 
accident-free inactivation of all equipment in distressed 
compartments. The reactor control system and emergency shielding 
reliably inactivated the reactor and cooled it down without 
mishap. 
  7. The conclusion reached by the government commission in 
the 
investigation of the circumstances and causes of the demise of 
the submarine ``Komsomolets'' is unobjective as regards 
establishing the probable cause of the accident, and as regards 
the evaluation given to the events that led to the accident's 
development and to its tragic outcome, and as a consequence of 
this, as regards the assessment of the fact itself of the 
accident and the causes bringing it about. 
  Looking at the accident of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' as 
an isolated case, and because the members of the commission 
belonged to the integral military-industrial complex, the 
government commission was incapable of objectively and 
faithfully revealing the real causes of the high accident rate 
in the navy, and of giving this the proper assessment. 
  Ending our analysis of the tragedy's development and of the 
actions of personnel of the submarine ``Komsomolets'', it should 
be said that the author does not claim to have the absolute 
truth in interpreting particular events and facts. He may err in 
some things, and he may understand other things the wrong way. 
But he is convinced of one thing: The tragedy of the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' was the result of its poor preparation for the 
cruise, and a consequence of the low combat and occupational 
training of the crew. 
  The responsibility for this must be borne by the navy's Main 
Directorate for Combat Training and the Main Directorate for 
Operation and Repair. 
  There still are numerous unanswered questions in the 
investigation of the circumstances of the accident of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets''. There wouldn't be any if the naval 
leadership hadn't done everything it could to hinder this 
investigation. 
<H5>  About ``Deficiencies'' and ``Technical Imperfections'' </H5>
  As the government commission's work proceeded, and as the 
causes of the accident and the real circumstances that led to 
the demise of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' became ever clearer, 
an extensive campaign to seek out all possible design 
deficiencies of the ship that had allegedly led to the tragedy 
was initiated in the press with the complicity of naval 
representatives. Let's examine the main ones. 
  1. In the 15 January 1990 edition of the newspaper IZVESTIYA 
and in the No. 2, 1990 edition of the journal MORSKOY SBORNIK, 
Captain 1st Rank Kolyada used the Soviet Military Encyclopedia 
in an attempt to persuade everyone that the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' was simply ``a vessel intended for 
experimentation, specially equipped and fitted out for various 
tests on new armament and hull structural units, and for 
experimental research on propulsion units, engines and other 
technical resources at sea.'' And that this submarine had 
supposedly been classified as ``nominally'' in the first 
line--that is, on the fighting team, with the ``grace'' of the 
navy. 
  The reader is supposed to make his own conclusion from 
this--that the demands put upon the submarine were too great, 
that there could be little talk of quality when what the 
designer created was not a submarine but something 
incomprehensible. No, this is not so. The ``Komsomolets'' was 
not ``a vessel intended for experimentation,'' but an 
experimental ship--that is, an experimental model of armament. 
And this, as they say in Odessa, is ``two large differences.'' 
The Soviet Military Encyclopedia states that experimental models 
of weapons (armament) are created ``for the purposes of testing 
new design (technological) ideas and solutions.'' 
  It was for these purposes that the submarine ``Komsomolets'' 
was created. But not only for them. This was a fighting 
submarine, and it was designed, built and transferred to the 
navy on the basis of standards and requirements imposed on a 
fighting submarine. High specifications and performance 
characteristics and the reliability of the technical resources, 
confirmed by experimental operation, made it possible for the 
first time in naval practice to adopt this submarine in 1988, to 
promote it up from the experimental category and award it the 
status of a fighting submarine. The government decree on 
adoption of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' by the navy was 
coordinated with many military leaders, including the naval 
commander-in-chief and the USSR minister of defense. In this 
respect, contrary to Captain 1st Rank Kolyada's opinion, the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'' did not require any additional 
certification. And the simple truth that submarines that are 
``nominally adopted into the first line'' do not go on patrol 
duty with a complete outfit of ammunition aboard, including 
nuclear devices, should have been explained to the captain 1st 
rank. All of these elementary truths should have been known to 
the deputy commander of the division to which the 
``Komsomolets'' belonged, and people should not have been misled 
with fables about ``a vessel intended for experimentation.'' 
  Unfortunately this has not ended the discussion of the 
experimental submarine. 
  2. The newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA (15 March 1990) carried an 
article by Captain 1st Rank S. I. Bystrov citing the following 
pronouncement by naval commander-in-chief V. N. Chernavin in his 
interview with Academician A. P. Aleksandrov: ``Evidently, 
Anatoliy Petrovich, you've introduced this term, ``into 
experimental operation,'' with good advantage. Such transfer of 
ships is still going on. This is the way the worst ships get 
accepted. When builders begin to feel the pressure of a 
deadline, they all return to this term.'' I don't know if the 
naval commander-in-chief really made such a statement, but a lie 
remains a lie, no matter who speaks it. The complaint made by 
the naval commander-in-chief against those who transfer ``the 
worst ships'' sounds strange, particularly when he says nothing 
about those who accept these ``worst ships.'' But that's not the 
point. 
  From the very beginning, with assignment of the preliminary 
specifications in 1966, the submarine ``Komsomolets'' was 
designed as an experimental ship as regards problems associated 
with diving depth, and as a fighting ship in all other 
parameters. Its experimental operation was foreseen from the 
very beginning as well. Moreover, for what sort of other 
operation can an experimental submarine be transferred besides 
experimental? 
  I will dare to assert that all experimental models of 
equipment (including experimental submarines) are distinguished 
as a rule by high quality of manufacture, and the new 
technological concepts employed in these models are worked out 
meticulously in the testing process. And in order to be 
persuaded of this, it would be sufficient to compare 
experimental models of Russian articles at exhibitions with the 
series-manufactured models of these same articles sold in stores. 
  But this lie was not born in a vacuum. It has its own 
history, one which has no relationship to the submarine 
``Komsomolets''. 
  In 1980-1981, adoption of third-generation prototype 
submarines was threatened by failure. For various reasons these 
submarines had not undergone their basic trials. And then 
someone came up with the idea of transferring the prototype 
submarines into ``intensive operation,'' during which the trials 
could be completed. So appeared a new term in ship 
building--``intensive operation.'' This is when the ``conspiracy 
of the century'' occurred. But this was not a conspiracy between 
``wolves from industry'' and ``naive and liberal sheep'' from 
the navy. The conspiracy was ``between equals,'' because the 
navy was the main culprit. The torpedoes they had adopted 
couldn't be fired and the missiles wouldn't fly because of the 
absence of these submarines. The USSR Council of Ministers and 
the CPSU Central Committee also participated in this conspiracy. 
A political behind-the-scenes contribution was made as well: The 
great marshal of ``Malaya Zemlya'' had already announced to all 
the world the USSR's creation of the ``Tayfun'' strategic 
sea-based system to spite the ``infamous'' American ``Trident'' 
system. Something had to be done to save the day. The prototype 
submarines were transferred to ``intensive operation,'' and the 
participants of the deal were generously decorated with orders, 
medals and the titles of Lenin and State prize laureates. I 
don't know how things are going at the Mint, but the Committee 
on Lenin and State Prizes in Science and Engineering had 
exhausted its appropriations for several years into the future. 
  And so this unseemly history culminated with slander 
directed 
at the submarine ``Komsomolets''. 
  3. We need not dwell on the numerous publications referring 
to many unspecified mistakes or imperfections of various kinds, 
because they were written by people who did not have adequate 
information or who were far from knowledgeable about the essence 
of the issue. But there is one article that needs to be 
discussed. The newspaper NA STRAZHE ZAPOLYARYA (30 November 
1990) carried an article titled ``Assigning Responsibility for 
the Tragedy'' by Vice Admiral V. S. Kalashnikov, the Naval 
Academy's deputy chief for training and scientific work. It 
reads: ``The ``Komsomolets'' was a unique submarine, and its 
design deficiencies were also unique in their own way. 
Professionals know that their presence in a submarine directly 
influences its survivability.'' And that's all that the vice 
admiral, a professional, and the navy's highest specialist in 
``training and scientific work'' could say about 
``deficiencies.'' The vice admiral's logic is astounding: If it 
is a unique submarine, then it must have unique design 
deficiencies. The vice admiral is not troubled by the fact that 
his article does not cite any specific ``unique design 
deficiencies,'' or that it contains no analysis of their 
influence upon the accident's development. He fouled someone 
else's doorstep and now feels his work to be done. 
  On the other hand there is more than enough specific forgery 
and slander in this article. One can see right away that the 
author is in his element. To prove my point, let me cite a few 
examples. Vice Admiral Kalashnikov asserts: ``And the conclusion 
of the commission, which contained representatives of the navy, 
the designer and industry, is categorical: ``In the situation as 
it was, it was impossible to save the ship''.'' This assertion 
by the vice admiral is a forgery. The statement by the 
government commission, published in the press on 6 September 
1990,[.sup]55[/] reads: ``In the fight to save the submarine, 
the crew displayed self-sacrifice and courage, but in the 
situation as it was, the submarine could not be saved.'' This 
wording differs fundamentally from Vice Admiral Kalashnikov's 
assertions. 
  Nor are there any assertions in the commission's conclusions 
that in the fight for survival, ``the crew did even more than it 
could have in that situation.'' Kalashnikov lifted these 
``conclusions of the commission'' out of the conclusions of the 
navy's Main Directorate for Operation and Repair on the 
``Analysis'' made by Vice Admiral Ye. D. Chernov. Moreover the 
thoughts of the admirals in the ``Combat Training'' section of 
the government commission's working group concerning the high 
proficiency of Captain 1st Rank Vanin's crew are claimed to be 
the opinion of the government commission, which is also a 
forgery. Also clearly slanderous is vice admiral Kalashnikov's 
assertion that ``Vice Admiral Chernov is principally at fault 
for the poor training of Vanin's crew,'' that ``a tendency to 
keep the second crew off of the ship could be distinctly 
discerned in its training schedule during the time that the 
flotilla was under Comrade Chernov's command. It was not until 
after his departure in summer 1987 that the attitude toward this 
crew, its training and time at sea changed abruptly for the 
better.'' 
  Let's look at the facts. Vice Admiral Chernov commanded the 
submarine flotilla until June 1986, and not until summer 1987, 
as Kalashnikov asserts. For only 10 months of the 4 years' and 9 
months' existence of Captain 1st Rank Vanin's crew was it 
directly subordinated to Vice Admiral Chernov. Given these 
facts, only dishonorable people can discern any kind of trend, 
and accuse Vice Admiral Chernov of training this crew poorly. 
There were another 2 years and 8 months after Vice Admiral 
Chernov's departure from the flotilla for Captain 1st Rank 
Vanin's crew to prepare for its first independent cruise. This 
would have been fully enough time to form and train a new crew 
for any submarine. Many more examples of this sort could be 
presented, because Vice Admiral Kalashnikov's article is full of 
lies, beginning with the accusations against the commander of 
the first crew, Captain 1st Rank Yu. A. Zelenskiy, and ending 
with the dirty insinuations addressed toward Vice Admiral 
Chernov regarding a ``set of Japanese video recording 
equipment'' he supposedly received as a gift. Unfortunately, it 
is still very difficult in our country to prosecute slanderers, 
especially when they slander ``in the performance of official 
duty.'' 
  4. Considerable attention needs to be devoted to an article 
by Captain 1st Rank (Reserve) A. N. Gorbachev, a former 
submarine commander, printed in the newspaper KOMSOMOLSKAYA 
PRAVDA (29 April 1989), and to his interview with this paper on 
17 December 1989. In both publications Gorbachev blames the 
demise of the submariners and the submarine itself on the 
designer on the basis of rumors and talks with ``yardkeeper 
acquaintances'' of his. But it is not among designers, it is not 
in ship building industry, it is not in the military acceptance 
system and, finally, it is not in the navy's Main Directorate of 
Ship Building that we must seek those ``who sank this ship as 
well,'' as the captain 1st rank (reserve) does. 
  To put it briefly, the tragedy occurred due to a 
catastrophic 
gap between the level of the equipment installed in modern 
submarines and the level of occupational training of 
submariners, the quality of routine maintenance and repairs 
carried out during preparation of submarines for cruises. High 
personnel turnover brought about by the lack of social 
safeguards for submariners doesn't play the last role either. As 
for the culprits, they must be sought among those who permitted 
this inconsistency to develop. As for ``ensuring this 
nuclear-powered submarine against accidents,'' the high fire and 
explosion safety of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' was confirmed 
by an expert commission appointed by the navy after a hands-on 
inspection of its condition in the period from 11 to 20 October 
1983. 
  The fact that even after that deflagration occurred in 
compartment 5 a fire didn't start in it also attests to the fire 
safety of compartments of the submarine ``Komsomolets''. And it 
was not from a random electric spark or flash that the fire 
started in compartment 7, as Gorbachev asserts. The fire was 
predestined by the poor preparation of the ship for the cruise 
and the grossest violations of the rules of operating the 
submarine's equipment. 
  Nor was the compartment fully involved aboard the submarine 
in the initial period of the accident. It was not until 15-20 
minutes after the fire started as a result of the incompetent 
actions of the ship's command that the compartment became fully 
involved. 
  Praising or, on the other hand, cursing the LOKh fire 
extinguishing system using freon as the fire extinguisher 
wouldn't change anything. There are no alternatives today, and 
there will be none before 1995. And in the meantime the existing 
LOKh system is the most effective firefighting system. If the 
fire aboard the submarine ``Komsomolets'' had not been 
extinguished by means of this system, this system is not at 
fault: fire extinguisher was not delivered to the distressed 
compartment. 
  The rescue chamber was discussed earlier. There are full 
grounds for believing that the devices of the rescue chamber 
were designed ``by the book.'' The built-in electric lighting 
functioned in the chamber until the very last moment. 
Unfortunately the mistakes and vexing lapses of the personnel 
resulted in the fact that only one of five men survived. I am 
compelled to report, with Comrade Gorbachev in mind 
specifically, that the rescue chamber had been tested by the 
first crew of the ``Komsomolets'' during the period of 
experimental operation with the direct participation of 
representatives of the designer, the ship building plant and the 
navy's search and rescue service, and that the testing involved 
actual separation of the rescue chamber from the submarine and 
its surfacing. Thus the references by the captain 1st rank 
(reserve) to a ``chamber of death'' and his rhetoric--``who 
designed this chamber, and at what level of mind and 
heart?''--are groundless, and may be qualified as slander 
against the designer. I dare to assert that the chamber was 
designed by competent specialists at the highest ``level of mind 
and heart.'' 
  The former commander of the submarine asked some questions 
that sound very strange coming from him--``Who taught the 
submariners to use the life rafts and prepare them for use? And 
who taught the lads to find their individual protective 
equipment in total darkness and never lose contact with them?'' 
Is this really something that must be done by nannies from 
Moscow, or by governesses enlisted from abroad? Isn't this the 
responsibility of the command of the submarines and fleet 
formations? Or does the captain 1st rank (reserve) believe that 
this responsibility is confined only to telling a seaman who 
doesn't know how to swim: ``Jump, sonny, jump, my boy, swim out 
from the side: Our ship will soon go beneath the water''? 
  Concluding, let's consider Gorbachev's question ``...is he 
(Gorbachev--D.R.) capable of meanness?'' What other word can you 
use to describe the attempt to blame the designer for the 
submarine's demise without any proof or justifications? How do 
we qualify his unsubstantiated accusation of the Sevryba 
Association in the death of the submariners? 
  It would appear that the captain 1st rank (reserve) found a 
suitable definition for his own acts. 
  5. The journal KHIMIYA I ZHIZN (No. 11, 1990) printed an 
article titled ``Did the ``Komsomolets'' Sink Accidentally?'' by 
Doctor of Physicomathematical Sciences V. N. Mineyev, Candidate 
of Technical Sciences V. V. Korenkov and Candidate of 
Physicomathematical Sciences Yu. N. Tyunyayev. The authors 
assert that ``as in Chernobyl, the disaster aboard the 
``Komsomolets'' was embodied in its design.'' They feel in this 
case that their main argument is the absence of obvious words 
such as ``reliable,'' ``unsinkable'' and ``safe'' from the 
supposedly official name of the submarine 
``Komsomolets''--``experimental torpedo nuclear-powered 
submarine.'' Relax, comrade scientists, everything is in order 
with the official name of the submarine ``Komsomolets''. It was 
named as is required by the warship classification established 
in the navy. Moreover there were no sudden fires in electrical 
equipment aboard the submarine ``Komsomolets'', the fuel and oil 
pipelines didn't crack, oxygen didn't flow into the zone of 
fire, fossil fuel didn't catch fire, and neither titanium, nor 
the powder of gas generators nor torpedo detonators burned. 
There were no explosion, and equally so, there was no iron scale 
or chlorate plugs. And the titanium hull did not heat to a 
temperature of 900-1,100ëC. 
  According to calculations of specialists, in the entire time 
of the accident around 700 kilograms of flammable 
materials--expressed in units of fossil fuel--burned in 
compartments 6 and 7. In light of this, dear scientists, all of 
your ``calculations'' are far afield of not only chemistry but 
also life. 
  As for flammable materials, unfortunately our science has 
not 
yet created nonflammable paints and varnishes for submarines, 
nonflammable thermal insulation for the pressure hull, 
nonflammable insulation for ship electric cabling, and 
nonflammable oils and supplies, or introduced them into 
production. When it comes to food products, it is true that 
there has been some forward progress: They are still flammable, 
but consuming them as food is already dangerous. 
  Nor are Gosstandart [State Committee for Standards] or the 
ship minister at fault. 
  And of course it is forgivable for you, dear scientists, not 
to know that kingston valves are not installed aboard submarines 
for the purpose of flooding compartments, or that all Soviet 
submarines were equipped with standardized rescue hatches and 
coamings for attachment of rescue craft long before 1971. Nor 
could you have known that the American submarine ``Thrasher'' 
sank not due to ``inadequate underwater unsinkability'' but for 
an entirely different reason. None of this information is 
contained in the adventure novels on the basis of which you 
probably developed your ideas about submarine building. And 
don't recall Admiral S. O. Makarov and Academician A. N. Krylov 
in vain, believe me that submarine designers also understand 
unsinkability and the procedure for designing particular systems 
and entire submarines. 
  By the way, let me state for your information that the term 
``underwater unsinkability'' has not yet been introduced into 
ship building theory and practice. 
  And so, comrade scientists, return to your ``hockey arenas'' 
and play quietly with your little ``pucks.'' All the more so 
because not all of your scientific works and dissertations begin 
with the words ``original,'' ``distinctive'' or ``highly 
scientific.'' And in your free time, it wouldn't be wrong to 
think about why our country, which is first in the world in the 
number of scientists per capita, is in the backwaters of world 
science. To reassure you, let me give you the full official name 
of the submarine ``Komsomolets'': ``deep-sea large 
nuclear-powered torpedo submarine.'' As you can see, this name 
does not contain the ominous term ``intended for 
experimentation'' that troubled you so. 
  6. Something has to be said about the articles written by 
the 
writer N. A. Cherkashin, a former submarine deputy commander for 
political affairs. While I do not feel it necessary to fully 
analyze the author's version of the crew's actions during the 
accident, we do need to examine some of the questions associated 
with the submarine's design, and dwell on just certain aspects 
of this version. 
  The author writes: ``The fire aboard the ``Komsomolets'' was 
altogether unprecedented. It was unique, because the nuclear- 
powered submarine was itself unique: a special hull, navigation 
at very great depth....''[.sup]56[/] It seems that a fire 
depends on the structure and material of the hull, as well as on 
the depth at which a submarine travels. There can be only small 
fires on submarines that do not travel deep, while fires aboard 
submarines with a unique depth of navigation can only be unique. 
How far must we go in the effort to somehow find fault with the 
submarine ``Komsomolets''?! And that's not the only assertion of 
this sort by the writer: ``First about the ship. It was 
noteworthy only in its ability to reach depths beyond those of 
all modern submarines. But at least because it was the first of 
its kind, as is true with all prototype ships, initially the 
``Komsomolets'' needed further design improvements--that is, it 
was not perfect. Even American experts say this.``[.sup]57[/] 
There's logic for you: If its first, then it must be poor. All 
the more so because some mythical ``American experts'' say this. 
  Still, we should be thankful to the writer for his high 
assessment of the deep-sea qualities of the submarine 
``Komsomolets''. As for design concepts not associated with 
deep-sea navigation, they are all standard ones, tested by many 
years of practical Soviet submarine ship building, and they 
correspond to the requirements of the navy, the sector's 
standards, and state standards. Five years of accident-free 
operation confirmed the high operating reliability of the 
submarine, and this time was fully sufficient to reveal any 
deficiencies, if there were any. 
  There is one other statement by the author that cannot be 
ignored: ``The positions of the sides were extremely polarized. 
The builders: The ship was good, and the crew was poorly 
trained. The navy: The ship had flaws, and the crew was 
sufficiently trained.''[.sup]58[/] The author goes on to say: 
``In discussing the causes of the disaster, even the most 
frantic revilers of the unfortunate crew are forced to kick the 
ball through their own goalposts: Accident prevention aboard 
this nuclear-powered submarine remained at the level of previous 
years. There is nothing new in it to protect against electric 
sparks. A single spark can create an inferno. No, when it comes 
to protection from accidents, Soviet designers have not gone 
very far.'' The writer shouldn't have juggled the facts in this 
way, even to prove his dubious version of a conflict between 
industry and the navy. The cited statement of a ``frantic 
reviler'' belongs to Captain 1st Rank (Reserve) A. N. Gorbachev, 
and it was printed in the newspaper KOMSOMOLSKAYA PRAVDA (17 
December 1990). As everyone knows, the captain 1st rank 
(reserve) is not a submarine builder, and if he is trying to 
``score a goal,'' he is not at all doing it through his own 
goalposts. The writer knows quite well that such a polarity 
between the sides--the builders versus the navy--does not exist. 
Following the laws of nature as it should, the watershed extends 
vertically, and not horizontally, as the top brass of the navy 
and their proteges try to persuade everyone. 
  Vice Admiral Ye. D. Chernov, Captain 1st Rank Yu. A. 
Zelenskiy, Captain 2d Rank V. V. Stafanovskiy and many other 
submariners are not builders of submarines, but this doesn't 
keep them from making a realistic assessment of the level of 
occupational training of submarine crews. None of the builders 
or submariners named above intended to revile Captain 1st Rank 
Vanin's crew. The crew did everything it could. And this was not 
so much its fault as its misfortune, because there were many 
things that it had not been taught, and many things for which it 
was unprepared. Their reference is to those responsible for the 
weak combat and occupational training of all submarine crews, to 
those who, rather than engaging in honest, open and principled 
dialogue, are hiding behind the backs of the deceased members of 
Captain 1st Rank Vanin's crew, and who are dealing with 
dissidents out of public view. 
  The writer Cherkashin also has specific complaints against 
the design of the submarine ``Komsomolets'': ``Before ``the 
red-hot walls of the pipelines ruptured,'' their plastic gaskets 
melted out, causing the release of high-pressure air into the 
compartment. Before, these gaskets used to be made of 
fire-refined copper (with a far-higher melting point than 
plastic). Pursing the noble goal of economizing the people's 
money, they substituted this nonferrous metal by polyamide, 
omitting the possibility of fire from their calculations.... The 
conditions under which the fire burned aboard the 
``Komsomolets'' had never been encountered before, and I believe 
they wouldn't be encountered if the polyamide gaskets were to be 
substituted by fire-refined copper.''[.sup]59[/] 
  Allow me to inform you, my respected writer, that the sorry 
specialists from the 1st Submarine Flotilla misled you. No one 
ever substituted polyamide gaskets for fire-refined copper ones 
in high-pressure air pipelines. And despite this, the conditions 
under which the fire burned aboard the submarine ``Komsomolets'' 
may recur, especially if the fans of ``unsoiled uniforms'' and 
their defenders continue to close their eyes to the bad state of 
combat and occupational training of submarine crews. 
  It would be pertinent here to cite the following statement 
by 
division deputy commander Captain 1st Rank Kolyada, as presented 
by the writer N. A. Cherkashin: ``The submarine behaved 
normally. The mechanical engineer told me that after the two aft 
compartments (the sixth and the seventh) were flooded, according 
to the stability diagram the ship would have remained 
afloat.''[.sup]60[/] 
  When compartments 6 and 7 are flooded at the same time that 
main ballast tank No. 10 is flooded, the submarine loses 50 
percent of its buoyancy reserve at the stern. This is not 
counting the unblown tank No. 5 and the flooded starboard tank 
No 7. Elementary logic tells us that no submarine can remain 
afloat with such loss of buoyancy and with such an upsetting 
moment. It is hard to say how poorly trained you have to be not 
to understand this simple truth. It was because of this 
professional incompetency that the crew found itself in the 
frigid waters of the Norwegian Sea without rescue equipment, and 
was forced to pay for this with its life. 
  In his effort to show the crew's actions as heroic, 
Cherkashin loses his sense of proportion, and steps beyond all 
permissible limits: ``Not knowing yet whether the submarine was 
sinking or surfacing, the ``keeper of the reactor,'' 
remote-control group commander Captain Lieutenant Igor Orlov 
began shutting down the menacing heart of the nuclear-powered 
submarine. He lowered the shim rods to the lower limit switch 
and quenched the fire of the ``nuclear boiler''.''[.sup]61[/] 
I read this, and I am astonished. Is this a military crew welded 
together by military discipline, or is this an unruly mob in 
which each person can do whatever he likes? It is shameful for 
the former submarine deputy commander for political affairs not 
to know that any action associated with changing a submarine's 
propulsion parameters is made only on the basis of orders from 
the attack center, and not on one's own initiative. As far as 
the specific circumstances are concerned, the reactor was 
stopped by the emergency shielding system when the ship was 
already on the surface. The main task of the operator of the 
main propulsion unit under these conditions is to not ``get 
under foot'' when the automatic system goes into play. We could 
go on with such examples, but what more can you say about an 
author who expands even the abbreviation ``RB'' (radiation 
safety) as ``radioactive underclothing''? 
  7. The newspaper SMENA (15 April 1990) carried an article by 
Captain 1st Rank (Retired) V. A. Boyko titled ``No Culprits as 
Usual?'' Everything the author says is clear and as simple as it 
can be. Submarines must have the ``tenacity'' ``not to sink as a 
result of any kind of fire,'' and fire extinguishing equipment 
must put fires out ``with maximum possible force.'' The matter 
of designing such submarines, Boyko believes, is simple, it is 
something ``that is taught in basic courses at ship building 
VUZes.'' 
  However, rather than designing such submarines, designers, 
builders, testers, recipients and operating executives 
``administer justice over crews, laying emphasis not on saving 
people but on their own prestige and well-being.'' And as for 
mistakes made by personnel, ``certain mistakes have always been 
made and will continue to be made in such difficult stressful, 
life-threatening situations.'' Such is his position. And one 
unwittingly thinks that perhaps the designing of submarines 
needs to be assigned to students dropped for poor performance, 
and their operation should be given over to cadets who have not 
undergone the full course of training, to whom it was explained 
in the first year that it is harmful and dangerous to make 
mistakes. Fortunately, however, V. A. Boyko himself leads us out 
of this dead end. As it turns out, in order to create submarines 
with ``tenacity,'' we need to first ``improve the concept of and 
requirements on submarine survivability,'' and not until this 
should we ``realize them in design and construction, and test 
them out in trials and during certification--thus designing 
submarines with tenacity.'' Then it would be up to the 
``specialist on survivability,'' as the captain 1st rank 
(retired) refers to himself. He is in a better position to know 
how imperfect the concepts of and requirements on submarine 
design are in relation to survivability. Captain 1st Rank 
(Retired) Boyko served most of his career behind the walls of 
Naval Institute No 1, which develops such ``imperfect concepts 
of and requirements'' on survivability. 
  As for specific complaints regarding the design of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'', there is nothing to say--Boyko simply 
didn't have any. It is obviously easier to talk about complaints 
in general-- this requires neither substantiation of these 
complaints, nor even their existence. 
  8. An open letter written by Captain 1st Rank B. G. Kolyada 
and his associates[.sup]62[/] cites specific ``deficiencies'' 
of the submarine which, in the opinion of the authors influenced 
the tragedy's outcome. Let's examine these ``deficiencies.'' 
  ``The absence of an integrated system aboard the ship for 
estimating the situation in the distressed compartment on the 
basis of objective data, especially in the absence or 
incapacitation of personnel, made it impossible to estimate the 
situation in the distressed compartment in the first minute,'' 
the captain 1st rank announces. Could the authors of the remark 
explain to me what this ``integrated system for estimating the 
system in the distressed compartment'' is? What is it that it 
must estimate integrally, on the basis of what objective data, 
and in what units of measurement? 
  Fire detection equipment was foreseen aboard the submarine 
``Komsomolets''. The fire was reported by the watchstander for 
compartment 7, and there were objective warning signals 
indicating an increase in temperature in compartment 7 and low 
insulation resistance in the electrical system. Objective 
information on the fire in compartment 7 could have been 
obtained with the television camera, had the television system 
been working. Is this really not enough to be able to classify 
the fire in compartment 7? If it isn't, then what do we make of 
the command issued at 1103 to deliver fire extinguisher into 
compartment 7? Analysis of the personnel's actions shows that 
throughout the entire time of the accident, the attack center of 
the ``Komsomolets'' was unable to really estimate the situation 
in the distressed compartments, to really monitor the 
submarine's buoyancy and stability, and to take real steps to 
fight for its survival. All of this affected the accident's 
outcome. The absence of ``an integrated system for estimating 
the situation'' has no relevance to this. 
  All of this does not exclude the need for improving existing 
equipment for detecting fires in compartments. As for an 
integrated system for estimating the situation, no ship of the 
navy has such a system. Not even the concept of such a system 
has been developed, and exploratory research in support of its 
creation has not been conducted. Thus any talk today about such 
a system is pointless. 
  The authors of the letter have other complaints against the 
structures of the submarine: ``The situation was aggravated by 
design deficiencies, to wit: The LOKh system; the standard 
system for relieving excess pressure in distressed compartments; 
an integrated system that would help the personnel to forecast 
the possible development of events in extreme situations on the 
basis of objective data; the impossibility of controlling the 
airtightness of compartments from the control room.'' 
  Let's examine these design deficiencies. 
  The detail design of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' was 
developed to include an LOKh firefighting system equipped with 
remote control from the control room. However, because of the 
supposedly insufficient reliability of remotely controlled 
electromagnetic valves, a joint decision of the USSR Ministry of 
Ship Building Industry and the navy in 1975 prescribed a 
transition to manual control of the LOKh aboard all submarines. 
After the new valves were developed, in 1987 the navy placed an 
assignment to study installation of a remote-controlled LOKh 
system in submarines, but for some unknown reasons a decision 
was made not to introduce a remote-controlled LOKh system into 
the ``Komsomolets''. Such are the facts. 
  Remote control of the LOKh firefighting system is absent 
today from all submarines, and this must be considered in ship 
operation. 
  All submarines also lack a special system for relieving 
pressure from distressed compartments. Such a system does not 
exist in the navy's requirements on submarine design. Thus it 
would be wrong to refer to something that was never ordered as a 
design deficiency. In the best case this may be viewed as a 
proposal for study. 
  In addition Article 275 of the RBZh-PL-82 foresees 
development of recommendations on relieving pressure from 
distressed compartments. The leadership of submarine formations 
is responsible for such development. As the division deputy 
commander Captain 1st Rank Kolyada bears a certain amount of 
responsibility for the fact that such recommendations were not 
drawn up for the submarine ``Komsomolets''. 
  There is no need to bring up the fact that not a single 
submarine of the navy has an integrated system for forecasting 
possible development of events in extreme situations on the 
basis of objective data. The concept has not been developed, and 
exploratory research in support of creating such a system has 
not been conducted. During the accident the leadership of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'' did not undertake any action to 
measure the parameters of the ship's attitude or determine the 
elements of its buoyancy and stability, which would have made it 
possible to forecast the accident's development. Given such a 
passive attitude toward ship damage control, no integrated 
systems of any kind can help. 
  No submarines of the navy have a system for controlling the 
airtightness of compartments from the control room (with the 
exception of a certain class of submarine with a limited number 
of personnel). Development of such systems for manned 
compartments is not foreseen in the navy's requirements on 
submarine design. 
  Thus even this ``design deficiency'' can be treated only as 
a 
proposal for development. Introduction of such a system into a 
submarine would be equivalent to complicating the design, 
increasing the weight and size characteristics of the equipment, 
and reducing its reliability. In addition the system may turn 
out to be unserviceable in emergency situations due to failure 
of control circuits. As for the degree to which these negative 
indicators could be compensated by the anticipated increase in 
submarine survivability, the answer to this question can be 
provided only through meticulous design development. 
  At the same time remote control of the airtightness of 
compartments cannot solve the problem completely. Analysis of 
the actions taken by personnel of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' 
during the accident showed that the submarine's leadership had 
not given the order promptly to take the main turbogear unit 
(GTZA) off line, and then to seal off the bulkhead of 
compartment 7. The operator at the console of the main 
propulsion unit did not shut the kingston valve of the 
stern-tube gland's cooling system, which is equipped with remote 
control. The mains were not closed throughout the entire time of 
the accident, even though closing them manually did not present 
any difficulty. Hence follows the same simple conclusion: No 
technical tricks will help in the absence of the needed combat 
and occupational training of the crew. 
  Summarizing all of the ``design deficiencies'' of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'' stated by Captain 1st Rank Kolyada, we 
can make the following conclusions: Not one of the indicated 
``deficiencies'' could have been a cause of the accident; these 
``deficiencies'' are inherent to all or most submarines of the 
navy. 
  9. In conclusion we need to examine the ``numerous design 
imperfections'' revealed in the investigation of the accident 
aboard the submarine ``Komsomolets''. Despite the fact that the 
navy's top brass wielded these ``numerous imperfections'' wildly 
like a Neanderthal club, they never were officially presented to 
the designer. Nor did the government commission officially 
present them. Therefore we will have to use unofficial materials. 
  The list of ``design imperfections'' was signed by naval 
deputy commander-in-chief V. V. Zaytsev and it is called 
``Submarine Design Peculiarities Influencing, in the Navy's 
Opinion, the Advent and Development of Large and Fast-Developing 
Fires and Hindering Ship Damage Control.'' It is presented in 
its entirety at the end of the book. We will limit ourselves for 
the moment only to the conclusions based on the results of 
analyzing this list. 
  None of the ``design peculiarities'' could have caused the 
accident and the demise of the submarine. 
  The ``consequences'' indicated by the authors do not reflect 
the actual circumstances of the accident, and they are directed 
at justifying the inactivity of the submarine's leadership in 
ship damage control, and at covering up the mistakes it made. 
  Certain items of the ``Design Peculiarities'' may be used in 
design development as a way to determine the possibilities for 
improving equipment and finding new technical concepts that 
would increase ship survivability and reduce the probability of 
incorrect actions by personnel. 
  You can agree or disagree with these conclusions. But if the 
highly placed authors of the navy's remarks believe that all of 
these ``design peculiarities'' caused the accident and demise of 
the submarine ``Komsomolets'', and if they do nothing to 
prohibit patrol duty by submarines having such 
``peculiarities,'' then what should we call them--criminals or 
liars? There is no third choice in this case. It would be 
permissible to ask: How can the navy allow such submarines to 
operate? Won't there be more fires, won't more ships sink, and 
won't more people die? 
  The government commission left unaddressed many pieces of 
equipment and devices having deficiencies that were discussed in 
the examination of the circumstances of the accident aboard the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'': 
  the self-contained emergency buoy failed to operate after 
the 
submarine's demise; 
  the sunken submarine locator failed to operate; 
  the inflating system of the PSN-20 life rafts failed to work 
completely, ``by the book''; 
  the survival suits and diving suits are hard to use; 
  the face masks of the IDA-59 apparatus are uncomfortable and 
unreliable. 
  We should also add to this list the ``Listvennitsa'' 
loudspeaker communication system, although it has already been 
discussed. 
  These are all different items of equipment, but there is one 
common trait that unites them. All of these items of equipment 
were designed on the basis of specifications of the navy's 
institutes, and under their observation and leadership. The navy 
accepted this equipment as armament and as supply items. The 
questions that arise in this connection are: Aren't there a 
little too many negative remarks regarding equipment for which 
the navy bears responsibility, and is there in fact ``something 
rotten in Denmark''? And could it be that concern for the 
``cleanliness of the uniform'' has overshadowed concern for 
creating reliable equipment? There's some ``food for thought'' 
for you. 
  Now a few words about measures to increase fire protection 
to 
submarines and exclude accidents aboard them, developed on the 
basis of the results of examining the circumstances of the 
accident aboard the submarine ``Komsomolets'', and accepted for 
implementation. 
  A joint decision of the USSR Ministry of Ship Building 
Industry and the naval leadership foresees development of a 
large number of measures directed at raising the fire safety and 
survivability of submarines, at developing documentation and at 
designing crew training equipment. As for the degree to which 
these measures will be implemented and by when, and how much 
they will help to increase the survivability of ships and 
improve crew training, life will show. However, many years will 
pass before there can be any discussion of results. 
In August 1990 the USSR Council of Ministers published a 
decree on the results of the examination of the circumstances 
behind the accident aboard the submarine ``Komsomolets'', 
drafted by the naval leadership. It contains measures for 
creating training centers and for improving ship basing and 
technical maintenance conditions, it foresees fulfillment of a 
large number of scientific research and experimental design 
projects, and it doesn't forget the social sphere either. 
  But there's one thing that raises questions: The deadline 
for 
fulfilling measures to organize training centers and to improve 
submarine basing and technical maintenance conditions, and 
measures in the social sphere, has been extended to the year 
2000, and most of the funds for scientific research and 
experimental design work (up to 75 percent) are to be spent on 
projects having nothing to do with the fire safety of submarines 
or their survivability, or with designing individual protective 
and rescue equipment for submariners. Nor is optimism raised by 
the nonspecific nature of measures to create training centers 
and establish submarine basing and technical maintenance 
conditions. The planned purchase of 50,000 survival suits abroad 
evokes bewilderment in light of the cheerful assertions by Vice 
Admiral R. L. Dymov, chief of the navy's search and rescue 
service, that series production of Russian-made survival suits 
will begin in 1991.[.sup]63[/] 
  Naval commander-in-chief Fleet Admiral V. N. Chernavin said 
nothing about this in his interview with the journal MORSKOY 
SBORNIK (No. 12, 1990). The tone of the statements is optimistic 
and confident. This immediately brings to mind Vice Admiral V. 
V. Zaytsev's ``classical'' pronouncement: ``Confident reports 
prior to 1635 indicate that ship damage control efforts were 
proceeding according to plan, that the situation aboard the 
submarine was being monitored, and that entry of water into the 
pressure hull was not noted.'' 
  The ``secret'' stamp applied to decisions makes it very easy 
to produce such ``confident'' reports. But as for what awaits us 
after ``1635,'' time will tell. 
  And in conclusion it would be somewhat interesting to 
compare 
the position of specialists of the U.S. Navy with the position 
of specialists of our country's navy regarding the accident rate 
aboard ship. Here is what is said about this in an article 
written by the ``troubadour'' of the navy's leadership--Captain 
1st Rank S. I. Bystrov, editor of the naval department of the 
newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA:[.sup]64[/] ``Late last year 
specialists of the U.S. Navy came up with proposals which in 
their opinion could help to reduce the accident rate. Principal 
among them are: raising the theoretical level of personnel 
training, improving the practical skills of servicemen in 
maintaining combat activity, introducing computerized trainers 
into the training process, and intensifying naval supervision 
over construction and repair of warships. The priority with 
which these proposals are listed deserves attention: The 
problems of improving personnel skills are addressed by three of 
them. And this is in the professional American navy.'' What can 
we say about these proposals? The adherence to principles and 
high civic-mindedness of specialists of the U.S. Navy in the 
performance of their duty evoke respect. It is immediately 
evident that people are working, rather than looking for others 
to blame. And now let's listen to our own specialists: ``Our 
compulsory-service seamen have not permitted as many accidents 
as American professionals. And what the Americans put in last 
place regarding influence upon the accident rate--the 
reliability of equipment, is in first place in our country.'' 
  What fine recruits we have! They've certainly tweaked the 
noses of those celebrated American professionals. Naturally with 
such fine men, only the equipment can be to blame. But the 
finest man of all is Captain 1st Rank S. I. Bystrov. How 
expertly he plays up to our generals and admirals who oppose a 
professional army! And industry is not forgotten either. He also 
has some ``good things to say'' about it. Though somewhat 
condescendingly, of course, in passing: ``And by the way, there 
can be no argument when it comes to recognizing the services of 
our industry.'' Well thanks for that, considering that designers 
and ship builders are something less than fine. 
  Appealing to all ``not to shift blame on anyone, but to 
objectively analyze all of it and implement effective, 
economically supported and rooted measures,'' with army 
straight-forwardness the author proposes the sequence in which 
this ``objectivity'' should be exercised: ``First of all, 
perfecting the design, technical reliability and quality of our 
ships, making damage control equipment and rescue resources 
effective, and upgrading the quality of personnel training.'' 
  How appropriate it is to repeat the captain 1st rank's 
pronouncement here, though in somewhat amended form. The order 
in which he lists the problems deserves attention: Those of 
upgrading equipment quality are addressed by three of them. 
  Captain 1st Rank (Retired) V. A. Boyko expressed the naval 
leadership's position more clearly: ``Let's build sufficiently 
viable submarines with full crew rescue support at the level of 
the best world accomplishments. And after that we can talk about 
the mistakes of personnel.''[.sup]65[/] 
  What they say is apparently true: ``A wise person learns 
from 
other's mistakes, while a fool has no desire to learn from his 
own.'' 
  Let submariners understand me correctly: Equipment, and 
especially military equipment, has to undergo constant 
improvement, regardless of accidents or any other circumstances. 
But the main thing today is to raise the level of crew combat 
and occupational training, to improve the quality of ship 
technical maintenance, and to solve all problems associated with 
these objectives. Here lies the fundamental difference between 
the leadership of the military- industrial complex and, in 
Captain 1st Rank Bystrov's terminology, ``one of the interested 
parties that is unfortunately opposed to the navy.'' 
<H5>  ``Design Peculiarities'' of the Submarine ``Komsomolets'' </H5>
  Looking over the list of the navy's Main Directorate for 
Operation and Repair, ``Submarine Design Peculiarities 
Influencing, in the Navy's Opinion, the Advent and Development 
of Large and Fast- Developing Fires and Hindering Ship Damage 
Control,'' we can make the following conclusions. 
  1. ``Placement of three oil tanks, an oil separating 
unit and reserves of GPD (30 units) and regeneration resources 
(10 cans) in compartment 7, which contains a large amount of 
electrical equipment (power panels), the absence of an oil 
cleaning system, and presence of a large number of openings 
communicating with the outside. Distribution panels in power 
compartments are not protected from the influence of oil vapor. 
The requirements of the TPPL-75, articles 11.4.2, 11.4.14, 
11.4.15, 11.4.16, 11.4.18, 11.4.19 regarding the location of 
electrical equipment, and of Article 11.4.26 requiring 
installation of resources for removing oil vapor from air at the 
locations of electrical equipment, are not satisfied. 
  The consequences: 
  This resulted in a decrease in fire and explosion 
safety, saturation with oil vapor, and the advent and rapid 
development of the fire.'' 
  The designer's conclusion. 
  1. There were 49 alternating current distribution panels, 
nine direct current distribution panels, four alternating 
current main distribution panels and one direct current main 
distribution panel--that is, 63 distribution panels--within the 
electric power system of the submarine ``Komsomolets''. Presence 
of four distribution panels and one section of the main 
distribution panel in compartment 7 cannot be said to be ``a 
large amount,'' given an average density of 10.5 distribution 
panels per compartment (distribution panels are not located in 
the reactor compartment). Such placement of panels is 
characteristic of all of the navy's submarines, and it is not a 
peculiarity of the submarine ``Komsomolets''. 
  2. For practical purposes there was only one tank containing 
turbine oil in compartment 7 of the submarine, and not three--a 
9 m[.sup]3[/] reserve oil tank, because the 7 m[.sup]3[/] 
dirty oil tank is not filled with oil, and it is used only to 
replace oil in the GTZA (in this case the reserve tank is dried 
out completely), and the 0.8 m[.sup]3[/] emergency oil drain 
tank does not communicate with compartment 7 (instructions 
K-902-022 TO). The reserve and dirty oil tanks are equipped with 
ventilation, oil traps and shut-offs making it possible to 
disconnect these tanks from compartment 7 in the event of fire 
(instruction K-902-032 TO). The temperature of oil in the 
reserve tank did not exceed a figure between +3 and +5ëC 
during the cruise under normal operating conditions, which 
precluded any evolution of oil vapor from it. The oil reserve's 
location in the aft compartment is not a peculiarity of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets''. Nor is location of the oil separating 
unit and of reserves of damage control and regenerating 
resources in compartment 7 a peculiarity. There are no 
restrictions on their location in aft compartments. Regenerating 
reserves must be located in each compartment according to naval 
requirements. Tests carried out by the government commission's 
working group proved the GPD resources to be highly fire- and 
explosion-safe. As for the overall amount of equipment, 
compartment 7 aboard the ``Komsomolets'' has less than any of 
the others. This is obviously why compartment 7 was loaded with 
reserves of food and supplies before the ship's cruise, even 
though the design does not foresee their storage in the 
compartment. 
  3. The assertions of the authors of the remark that 
compartment 7 contained a large number of openings communicating 
with the outside is inconsistent with reality. There are 
significantly fewer such openings aboard the ``Komsomolets'' 
than in other submarines of the navy. In particular there are 53 
openings in the pressure hull in the aft compartment of a 
certain third-generation submarine with a compartment 7 of the 
same size as that in the ``Komsomolets''. The number of openings 
is even greater in other submarines in which the aft 
compartments are larger. There were only 38 openings in the 
pressure hull in compartment 7 of the submarine ``Komsomolets''. 
  4. The assertion of the authors of the remark that the 
distribution panels aboard the submarine ``Komsomolets'' are not 
protected from the influence of oil vapor is inconsistent with 
reality. Power production equipment (the GTZA in compartment 6 
and TTsNA in compartment 5) producing free vapor from hot oil 
(temperatures up to 70ëC) is supplied with self-contained 
units for removing oil vapor from air. In addition the air of 
power compartments is purified of oil vapor by compartment air 
conditioning equipment containing FK-U cassette filters rated 
for oil vapor absorption. The equipment in compartment 7 did not 
produce any free hot oil vapor, making it unnecessary to install 
a self-contained oil cleaning unit. This is why compartment air 
conditioning equipment containing the indicated cassette filters 
was used to remove oil vapor from air in compartment 7. This 
system for removing oil vapor from air is also used aboard other 
submarines of the navy, and the ``Komsomolets'' is not unique in 
this. It should be noted that such combination of the functions 
of the air conditioning and cleaning system is to be expanded by 
measures for increasing the fire safety of the navy's submarines 
(decision No. S-13/1788, 22 September 1989, of the USSR Ministry 
of Ship Building Industry and the navy, item 9 in the 
attachment). 
  Five years of the submarine's operation demonstrated the 
effectiveness of the system for removing oil vapor from the air 
of compartments. In all of the time that the ``Komsomolets'' was 
in operation, not a single case of oil getting on equipment in 
any compartment was documented. 
  5. The complaints of the authors of the remark that the 
designers failed to satisfy the requirements of the TPPL-75 
[Submarine Design Requirements] are wrong. These TPPL were 
published by the navy in 1976 without coordinating them with 
industry. The detail design of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' had 
already been approved by this time (1972), and the shop drawings 
were practically finished. No decisions were made regarding the 
procedure and time of introduction of the TPPL-75. Thus these 
TPPL-75 were not introduced on any submarine of the navy. In 
1981 they were replaced by the ``Basic Technical Requirements'' 
OTT-6.1.1-81. The submarine ``Komsomolets'' was designed in 
accordance with specifications approved in 1966, and the TPPL-67 
submarine design requirements, developed by the navy. As far as 
the essence of the question is concerned, all requirements of 
articles 11.4.2, 11.4.14, 11.4.15, 11.4.16, 11.4.18, 11.4.19, 
11.4.26 of the TPPL-75 were satisfied in the submarine 
``Komsomolets'', with the exception of requirements on using 
KMZh cable in emergency electric power networks. Because such 
cable was difficult to manufacture, it was not used aboard any 
submarine. 
  6. The ``consequences'' of imagined peculiarities of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'' dreamed up by the authors are also 
inconsistent with reality. The high fire and explosion safety of 
this ship was confirmed by a hands-on inspection of its 
condition in the period from 11 to 20 October 1983 by an expert 
commission appointed by the navy. The fire and explosion safety 
of compartment 7 diminished as a result of unauthorized storage 
of provisions and supplies in it and uncontrolled delivery of 
oxygen into the compartment in the presence of a faulty oxygen 
gas analyzer. An elevated oxygen concentration in the 
compartment (estimated at up to 30 percent) led to the advent 
and intensive development of fire. As far as saturation of the 
compartment with oil vapor is concerned, calculations carried 
out by the Central Scientific Research Institute imeni A. N. 
Krylov and the Naval Institute No. 1 demonstrated that it is 
impossible for oil vapor to reach even the lower concentration 
limit of ignition when the temperature in the compartment is 
70ëC (the actual temperature was around 20ëC) and when 
air cleaning units are not working. 
  These facts allow us to say that all of the complaints of 
the 
authors of the remarks are unjustified, and that they are 
inconsistent with real circumstances. 
  2. The design precluded airtightness of compartments 6 
and 7 when the shafting was operating because of the presence of 
transit oil feed and drain lines of the main propulsion unit and 
the gap in the shafting's bulkhead gland. The requirements of 
items X-75 and 11.6.4 of the TPPL-67 and TPPL-75 respectively 
regarding the airtightness of bulkheads when shafting is 
operating under normal conditions and at elevated pressure were 
not satisfied. 
  Recommendations of the design office regarding the use 
of the submarine's equipment in emergency situations, 
21.GGK-E-478-82, do not foresee closure of valves on oil 
pipelines when sealing compartment 7. In addition the design 
office did not draw up instructions, to be included in the 
operating documents, on testing the airtightness of 
intercompartment submarine bulkheads with a vacuum of 100 mm Hg 
(see Article 201, RBZh-PL-82). 
  The consequences: 
  This led to an increase and spread of pressure and a 
fire in compartment 6, as well as gas contamination of 
compartments 2, 3 and 5.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. The assertion of the authors of this remark that the 
design did not provide for sealing of compartments 6 and 7 when 
the shafting is operating is inconsistent with reality, as is 
true of the assertion that there is some sort of ``gap in the 
bulkhead gland.'' The shafting of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' 
is designed in full correspondence with Article X-75 of the 
TPPL-67, which contains no requirement regarding the 
airtightness of bulkheads when shafting is operating at elevated 
pressure, as is asserted by the authors of the remark. The 
shafting was designed on the basis of standard plans, and it 
contains no ``design peculiarities'' in comparison with other 
submarines as far as the main thrust bearing (GUP) lubricating 
system and the bulkhead gland are concerned. 
  2. The reference of the authors of the remark to the 
requirements of the TPPL-75 is wrong for the reasons set forth 
in the designer's conclusion regarding item 1. As far as the 
essence of the issue is concerned, the bulkhead between 
compartments 6 and 7 is airtight aboard the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' when the shafting is operating under normal 
conditions and at elevated pressure (within normal conditions). 
  The authors of the remark incorrectly interpret the meaning 
of the requirements of Article 11.6.4 of the TPPL-75 regarding 
elevated pressure. The article discusses only elevated pressure 
under normal operating conditions, and nothing else. There are 
no requirements in the article on the airtightness of the 
operating shafting under emergency conditions, nor are there any 
references to the magnitude of the corresponding elevated 
pressure. 
  3. The attempt to criticize the ``Recommendations'' 
21.GGK-E-478-82 drawn up by the designer is wrong, because they 
were not intended for use by submarine personnel. The 
recommendations were drawn up in response to an assignment from 
the Naval Institute No. 1 specially to serve as the basis upon 
which this institute was to draw up the ``Manual on Combat Use 
of Technical Resources'' (RBITS)-- one of the fundamental 
documents of the set of submarine damage control documents. 
However, the RBITS never was written by the Naval Institute No. 
1, and the navy's Main Directorate for Operation and Repair did 
not plan or support its development for the ``Komsomolets'' in 
time. 
  The assertions of the authors of the remark that the 
recommendations lack instructions on closing valves on oil 
pipelines are inconsistent with reality. Closure of these valves 
is not foreseen in the general section on sealing the bulkheads, 
because this affects submarine power and must be carried out on 
the basis of a decision of the control room (Article 89, 
RBZh-PL-82). In the event of fire in compartment 7, the 
``Recommendations'' (items 3.3 and 3.20) provide instructions on 
deenergizing (that is, shutting down) the oil pumps of the 
lubricating system of the main turbogear unit (GTZA) and 
shutting down the unit itself. The instructions on servicing the 
GTZA oil system make a reference to closing valves on the oil 
pipeline when oil pumps are shut down in order to seal the 
bulkhead between compartments 6 and 7 (instruction K-902-022 TO, 
items 2.3.1 and 2.5.4). 
  4. The complaint of the authors of the remark that the 
absence of instructions on testing the airtightness of the 
submarine's intercompartment bulkheads with a 100 mm Hg vacuum 
is unjustified. The designer's operating and design documents do 
not foresee testing a submarine's intercompartment bulkheads for 
airtightness with a 100 mm Hg vacuum, and there is nothing in 
Article 201 of the RBZh-PL-82 that says that such a test must be 
conducted on the basis of the designer's documentation. Moreover 
nothing makes such testing an official requirement. 
  5. The ``consequences'' dreamed up by the authors are 
inconsistent with reality. The rise in pressure and the fire in 
compartment 6 were the result of the failure of the attack 
center to satisfy the requirements of articles 89 and 121 of the 
RBZh-PL-82 concerning shut-down of the main turbogear unit, 
disconnection of the high- pressure air mains entering the 
distressed compartment, and bleeding overboard the air reserve 
out of the emergency cofferdam of the high-pressure air main, 
located in compartment 7, and they were not the result of any 
mythical peculiarities in the design of the shafting. The 
absence of the RBITS played a negative role in this matter. The 
assertions that these peculiarities resulted in gas 
contamination of compartments 2, 3 and 5 are simply absurd, 
because the shafting is not associated with these compartments 
in any way. Compartments 2, 3 and 5 were contaminated with gas 
through unclosed mains because the personnel failed to satisfy 
the requirements of articles 89 and 90 of the RBZh-PL-82. 
  3. ``The design does not allow for sealing of the 
bulkhead between compartments 5 and 6 from the direction of 
compartment 5 due to the absence of valves in compartment 5 on 
the system for supplying vapor to the gasket in the system 
removing the vapor-air mixture from TTsNA No. 1, 2. 
  The consequences: 
  This resulted in gas contamination of compartment 5, an 
increase in pressure in it and subsequent ignition of oil vapor, 
and the death of people in the compartment due to burns.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. The design does not provide for sealing off the pipeline 
of the system removing vapor-air mixture from gaskets of the 
turbocirculation pumps from the direction of compartment 5, 
which was a mistake of the designer. 
  2. The ``consequences'' presented by the authors are 
inconsistent with reality: 
  the personnel had not closed the clinket gates on the line 
carrying spent vapor from the turbocirculation pumps (300 mm 
diameter), which practically excluded the influence of the 
suction system pipeline (50 mm diameter) on entry of gas into 
compartment 5 through gaskets of the turbocirculation pumps; 
  the high rate of growth of pressure in compartment 5 in the 
initial period of the accident and confinement of the 
deflagration just to the upper part of the compartment's central 
passage permit the assertion that oil vapor or products of 
incomplete combustion may have entered compartment 5 not through 
the suction system leading from the gaskets of the 
turbocirculation pumps, which is located along the sides of the 
compartment, but out of the oil tank supplying these pumps when 
combustion products from compartment 7 were blown through it 
into the oil separation line, which had not been reset in its 
initial position after work. Products of incomplete combustion 
may have entered compartment 6 through the pressure equalizing 
valve between compartments 5 and 6, which is constantly open 
under normal operation. The turbocirculation pump oil tank vents 
and the pressure equalizing valve are located in the upper part 
of the central passage. Later on these sources of hot gases were 
closed by the submarine's personnel, which for practical 
purposes stopped the growth of pressure in compartment 5; 
  the assertion of the authors of the remark that this mistake 
by the designer led to the death of personnel due to burns is a 
deliberate lie. The personnel of compartment 5 (Warrant Officer 
S. S. Bondar and Seaman V. Yu. Kulapin) died not of burns but as 
a result of carbon monoxide poisoning through their ShDA 
equipment due to mistakes made by the attack center and the 
compartment 5 commander. Air supply to the medium-pressure air 
main was stopped at the direction of the attack center without 
notifying personnel wearing ShDA masks and using air from the 
medium-pressure air system. The commander of compartment 5 
failed to monitor operation of the stationary breathing system, 
which supplied air to ShDA equipment from the high- or 
medium-pressure air system. After the entire air reserve in 
cofferdam No. 4, located in compartment 7, was bled away as a 
result of the fire, and the supply of air to the medium- 
pressure air line was cut off, poisoned air from compartment 7 
began entering compartment 5's stationary breathing system 
through one of the pipelines (high- or medium-pressure air) and 
then into the ShDA equipment. Warrant Officer Bondar and Seaman 
Kulapin, who were connected up to ShDA equipment, were poisoned 
by carbon monoxide. Because of delays in evacuating the victims 
the poisoning was irreversible. 
  4.``The design did not provide for remote delivery of 
fire extinguisher from the LOKh system into the distressed 
compartment by the attack center (the requirements of Article 
XI-37 of the TPPL-67, Article 12.2.34 of the TPPL-75, and 
Article 1.5.6.22 of the OTT6.1.1-81 were not satisfied). 
  The consequences: 
  This made it impossible to use fire extinguisher from 
the LOKh station in compartment 7 to put out the fire, and it 
may have led to unjustified delay in delivering fire 
extinguisher from compartment 6 into compartment 7, had the 
roving watchstander been in compartment 4 or 5.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. The detail design for the submarine ``Komsomolets'' was 
drawn up with an LOKh system that could be started remotely from 
the attack center in accordance with requirements of the 
specifications and the TPPL-67. Later on, citing insufficient 
reliability of remotely controlled electromagnetic valves, 
decision No. S-13/002834, 17 October 1975, of the USSR Ministry 
of Ship Building Industry and the navy prescribed replacement of 
these valves aboard all submarines by manually controlled 
fittings, which is what was done on the ``Komsomolets''. 
  The OST [All-Union Standard] on designing the LOKh 
firefighting system was corrected on the basis of this decision. 
A manually started LOKh system is used on most submarines, and 
therefore the assertion of the authors of the remark that this 
was a peculiarity of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' is 
inconsistent with reality. 
  2. It should be noted that the USSR Ministry of Ship 
Building 
Industry and the navy ordered the designers (on the basis of 
decision No. 1/02095, 4 August 1987) to complete design 
developments in support of introducing remotely started LOKh 
systems aboard submarines. This decision was based on the 
results of developing a new remotely controlled valve for the 
LOKh system. In this case for unknown reasons the navy decided 
not to install the system in the submarine ``Komsomolets'', and 
it did not foresee completion of these developments for this 
ship. It is consequently wrong for the navy to lodge any 
complaints about the absence of a remotely started LOKh system 
aboard the submarine ``Komsomolets''. 
  3. The reference of the authors of the remark to 
requirements 
of the TPPL-75 is wrong for the reasons set forth in the 
conclusion regarding item 1. The same can also be said for the 
requirements of the OTT6.1.1-81. As for the essence of the 
issue, the requirements of Article 12.2.34 of the TPPL-75 and 
Article 1.5.6.22 of the OTT6.1.1-81 have to do with remote 
starting of the LOKh system (remote control), and not with 
remote delivery of fire extinguisher by the attack center, as 
the authors of the remark assert. Moreover the requirements of 
the OTT6.1.1-81, which were issued in place of the TPPL-75, 
allow starting of the LOKh system both from the attack center 
remotely and from the compartments, including manually. 
  5. ``The submarine design did not foresee a system with 
the necessary freon reserve for fast recharging of any LOKh 
station to provide for repeated delivery of freon to a 
distressed compartment in the presence of large fires in order 
to create a fire-quenching concentration. In addition the 
operating documents (instructions on operating the LOKh system) 
say nothing about the loss of fire extinguishing properties when 
high pressure is present in a distressed compartment. Other 
resources capable of extinguishing a fire at elevated pressure 
are not foreseen by the submarine's design. 
  The consequences: 
  A fire-quenching concentration of freon could not be 
created in compartments 6 and 7, and the fire could not be put 
out. The submarine lacks resources for extinguishing a fire at 
compartment pressures exceeding 2 kg/cm[.sup]2[/].'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. The LOKh system in the submarine ``Komsomolets'' was 
developed in full correspondence with naval requirements OTT MO 
6.1.17-79, Part II, and OST V5.5059-81, which do not foresee 
installation of tanks containing a reserve of freon. The 
complaints of the authors of the remark can be viewed only as a 
proposal for development. 
  2. None of the navy's submarines has containers with a freon 
reserve, and this is also not a peculiarity of the submarine 
``Komsomolets''. 
  3. It is unsuitable to place reserve freon containers aboard 
submarines because attempts to recharge stations in an emergency 
situation could only aggravate the emergency situation aboard 
the ship. 
  4. The instructions on operating the LOKh system were 
developed for the submarine ``Komsomolets'' in accordance with 
standard instructions coordinated with the navy, which say 
nothing about the fire extinguishing characteristics of freon. 
Nor is anything said in the operating instructions of LOKh 
systems in other submarines of the navy. It does not make any 
sense to introduce this information into LOKh system operations, 
because the instructions are not part of the set of submarine 
damage control documents. Information on the fire extinguishing 
characteristics of freon and on the range of uses of the LOKh 
system should be contained in the RBZh-PL-82, which is the 
principal submarine damage control document, in attachment No. 
3, ``Firefighting Resources.'' And who's the author of the 
RBZh-PL-82? The navy. 
  5. There are no other resources in the country today that 
are 
highly effective in putting out fires in the presence of 
elevated pressure. Experimental design work aimed at creating 
such resources is in its initial stage. Consequently any 
discussion of the absence of these resources aboard the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'' is pointless and totally meaningless. 
  6. The assertions of the authors of the remark that a fire 
extinguishing concentration of freon could not be created in 
compartments 6 and 7 because of the absence of freon reserves 
aboard the submarine are unfounded. Freon had not in fact been 
delivered to compartment 7, and its delivery into compartment 6 
did not begin until after the fire went out. 
  6. ``The design does not foresee protection of electric 
circuits between synchro transmitters and synchro receivers of 
the ``Korund'' system from short-circuit currents (the 
requirements of Article VII-7 of the TPPL-67, Article 8.2.7 of 
the TPPL-75, and articles 1.3.3.1 and 1.3.3.6 of the OTT6.1.1-81 
were violated). 
  The consequences: 
  This resulted in a fire in the GKP, which complicated 
leadership of submarine damage control efforts.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. Protection of electric circuits between synchro 
transmitters and synchro receivers of the ``Korund'' system from 
short-circuit currents is not required, as is confirmed by 
experiments carried out by the developers of the ``Korund'' 
system. Such protection is absent from all submarines of the 
navy that have the ``Korund'' system, such that this is also not 
a peculiarity of the submarine ``Komsomolets''. 
  2. Analysis of the interrogation of the personnel of the 
``Komsomolets'' by the government commission shows that the 
``Korund'' caught fire not in the vicinity of the sunchro 
circuits but in the power supply units of the ``Korund'' located 
inside the stand of the ``Vektor'' subsystem. The power supply 
system circuit of the ``Korund'' is fully protected against 
shorts. In this connection the assertion of the authors of the 
remark that the designer failed to satisfy Article VII-7 of the 
TPPL-67 is inconsistent with reality. 
  3. The cause of the fire in the ``Korund'' console and its 
consequences were presented sufficiently objectively in the 
conclusion written by Vice Admiral V. V. Zaytsev, the naval 
deputy commander-in-chief and the chief of the Main Directorate 
for Operation and Repair, to the ``Analysis'' written by Vice 
Admiral Ye. D. Chernov: ``At 1122 the transformer block 
servicing the ``Korund'' system's rudder position indicators 
caught fire in the control room. Compartment 3 filled with gas, 
and so the attack center was compelled to carry out the 
subsequent submarine damage control actions while wearing 
individual protective equipment. Knowing the situation, and 
having made certain that rudder control failed, the control room 
was obligated to have given the command to deenergize the 
``Korund.'' This was not done, however.'' 
  In light of the above, the so-called ``consequences'' of the 
imagined peculiarities of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' have no 
real basis. 
  4. The requirements of the TPPL-75 and the OTT6.1.1-81 do 
not 
apply to the submarine ``Komsomolets'' for the reasons set forth 
in the conclusion regarding item 1 of the ``peculiarities.'' 
  As for the essence of Article 8.2.7 of the TPPL-75 and 
articles 1.3.3.1 and 1.3.3.6 of the OTT6.1.1-81, all that can be 
said is that the requirements of these articles have not been 
accepted by industry even for designing submarines of the 
future, because they are unrealistic (as regards mistakes by 
personnel) and the requirements on operating conditions 
(pressure) are unsubstantiated. 
  7. ``The design does not provide for complete 
deenergizing of electrical equipment in a distressed compartment 
by switching apparatus. For example in order to deenergize 
compartment 7, according to recommendations on using technical 
resources in emergency situations, 21.GGK-E-478-82, cables must 
be disconnected at GRShch 02 (compartment 5), and ShchTG 1 
(compartment 6) and at APPM-413V (compartment 4), which is 
practically impossible to do. 
  The consequences: 
  It is impossible in a major emergency situation to 
completely deenergize a submarine compartment, which is why the 
accident occurred and why a fire arose in compartment 4.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. All power lines of the electric power system are 
deenergized by switching apparatus. The only things it doesn't 
deenergize are the control, blocking and monitoring circuits. 
These are the circuits to which the ``Recommendations'' refer. 
The electric power systems of all submarines of the navy are 
built on the basis of this principle, such that this is not a 
peculiarity of just the submarine ``Komsomolets''. Introduction 
of switching apparatus into control circuits unjustifiably 
complicates the circuits and reduces the reliability of a 
submarine's electric power system as a whole. 
  2. Complete deenergization of compartment 7 requires, 
besides 
disconnecting electrical equipment with switching apparatus, 
additional disconnection of: one cable in compartment 2 (two 
strands), two cables in compartment 4 (10 strands), two cables 
in compartment 5 (three strands), and three cables in 
compartment 6 (three strands). The labor consumed by this 
operation does not exceed 2-5 minutes, and it does not present 
any difficulties to trained personnel. The cables in the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'' were not disconnected not because it 
was a major emergency situation, as the authors of the remark 
assert, but only because the personnel did not know what had to 
be disconnected due to the absence of the RBITS, and because 
they never practiced this operation in ship damage control 
training. During the accident the personnel did not even make an 
attempt to disconnect the cables. 
  3. The assertion of the authors of the remark that 
development of the accident was a consequence of incomplete 
deenergization is unfounded, because this could in no way have 
affected the fire in compartments 6 and 7. This led only to a 
short flash in the TsNPK No. 1 pump starting station (and not to 
the fire in compartment 4, as the authors of the remark assert), 
after which the TsNPK pump continued to work in its prescribed 
mode. Even after the circuit breaker tripped in the distribution 
panel RShchN-12, located in compartment 7, the electric power 
system of the submarine remained serviceable, and continued to 
function until the end of the tragedy. 
  8. ``The kingstonless design of the TsGB sharply 
reduces the longitudinal stability of a submarine when it is not 
in trim and when the sea is disturbed. The requirement of 
Article 12.2.2 of the TPPL-75 was not satisfied: ``Ballast tanks 
of the middle group and, as a rule, part of the tanks of the 
fore and aft groups must have kingston valves, and mandatorily, 
second vent valve shut- offs.'' 
  The consequences: 
  This resulted in the flooding of TsGB No. 8, 9, 10 and 
disturbance of their integrity, as a result of which the 
submarine lost buoyancy and longitudinal stability.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. Most submarines of the navy are made with the 
kingstonless 
design, and this is not a peculiarity of the submarine 
``Komsomolets''. 
  2. The TPPL-67, in accordance with which the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' was designed, does not contain a requirement of 
mandatory installation of kingston valves in main ballast tanks. 
For the reasons set forth in the conclusion regarding item 1, 
the requirements of the TPPL-75 do not apply to the submarine 
``Komsomolets''. In addition Article 12.2.2 of the TPPL-75 does 
not contain a mandatory requirement of installing kingston 
valves in the end groups of main ballast tanks, which can be 
seen upon inspection of the text of the article cited by the 
authors of the remark. The new OTT6.1.1-81, Article 1.5.6.11 
published by the navy contain no requirements on installing 
kingston valves in ballast tanks. Here as well, the complaints 
of the authors of the remark regarding absence of kingston 
valves from the main ballast tanks are groundless. 
  3. The line of reasoning of the authors of the remark 
suggesting that the kingstonless design of main ballast tanks 
sharply reduces the longitudinal stability of a submarine if it 
is not in trim and if the sea is disturbed is essentially 
incompetent. A submarine does not go out of trim on its own, but 
as a result of a loss of buoyancy reserve when the end 
compartments or ballast tanks fill up; in this case the 
submarine's longitudinal stability also decreases regardless of 
the design of the main ballast tanks and the sea state. 
Reduction of longitudinal stability manifests itself in 
kingstonless submarines to a somewhat greater degree than on 
submarines equipped with kingston valves; however, the 
possibility submarines have for blowing ballast tanks makes it 
possible to completely exclude the influence of the lack of 
kingston valves upon the elements of ship buoyancy and 
stability. In addition sea state begins to affect the buoyancy 
reserve of a submarine (and not its longitudinal stability, as 
the authors of the remark assert) at a sea state of 5-6 points 
or more. At the time of the accident of the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' the sea state was around 2-3 points, and its 
influence upon the ship's buoyancy reserve was negligible. 
  4. The ``consequences'' developed by the authors of the 
remark are inconsistent with the real circumstances. The 
submarine surfaced with its starboard main ballast tanks No. 5 
and 10 not blown. Under the particular circumstances of the 
accident, the port tank No. 10 would have lost its integrity and 
would have filled with water regardless of design. There are no 
grounds for asserting that tanks No. 8 and 9 lost their 
integrity and filled with water. The submarine sank as a result 
of flooding of compartment 7 and partially of compartment 6, 
with absolutely no damage control efforts attempted by the 
personnel. 
  9. ``The design of the VVD system does not permit 
blowing of the corresponding TsGB by what is left of the air 
reserve when one of the VVD cofferdams ruptures. Blowing the 
TsGB using the VZU system when on the surface is possible, but 
its effectiveness is extremely low, and it leads to a large loss 
of air reserve through blown tanks (see Act No. 6/8, 26 May 
1989, on the results of testing the effectiveness of blowing the 
aft group of TsGB using the VZU system). 
  The consequences: 
  This led to the impossibility of blowing the aft group 
of TsBG using cofferdam No. 2 during the accident. As a result 
of the system's low effectiveness and a large loss of air 
through the blown TsGB No. 7, possible blowing of the aft TsGB 
by the VZU would not have positive results in preserving 
longitudinal stability.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. The high-pressure air system aboard the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' was built in accordance with OST V5.5017-79, and 
it is similar in its structure to the same systems of other 
submarines of the navy. The assertion of the authors of the 
remark that this system is unique to the ``Komsomolets'' is 
inconsistent with reality. 
  2. Nor is the assertion that it is impossible to blow the 
corresponding main ballast tanks when one of the cofferdams 
ruptures using the remaining high-pressure air reserve 
consistent with reality. When any one of the cofferdams fails, 
the high- pressure air system provides for surfacing of the 
submarine and subsequent blowing of previously unblown main 
ballast tanks through the blowing line using air from the 
outboard air main with the assistance of a diver. The assertion 
that the effectiveness of blowing the main ballast tanks using 
the outboard air system when surfaced is extremely low, and that 
it results in considerable loss of air reserve through the blown 
tanks, is based on technical ignorance, on an ignorance of the 
elementary laws of physics. Act No. 6/8, 26 May 1989, to which 
the authors of the remark refer, has not been furnished to 
workers of industry, and it is not known who took part in the 
tests. In this connection it is impossible to offer any kind of 
conclusion regarding this act. 
  Field trials conducted on 2-3 November 1989 aboard a certain 
submarine with the participation of representatives from the 
designer, from the Naval Institute No. 1, from the Naval Academy 
and from the Northern Fleet's 1st Submarine Flotilla confirm the 
high effectiveness of blowing the main ballast tanks using the 
outboard air system, and maintenance of high effectiveness of 
blowing any tank regardless of the physical state of neighboring 
tanks. 
  3. The ``consequences'' formulated by the authors of the 
remark are deliberately misleading: 
  the personnel of the ``Komsomolets'' made no attempts during 
the accident to blow the main ballast tanks with air from 
cofferdam No. 2 of the high-pressure air system through the 
outside air main because of their poor knowledge of the ship's 
material; 
  main ballast tanks can be blown with outboard air from high- 
pressure air cofferdam No. 2 by way of a special main connecting 
the No. 1 and 2 high-pressure air cofferdams. Because of the 
absence of the RBITS, the personnel had not practiced this 
variant of blowing the tanks; 
  if the aft group of main ballast tanks had been blown with 
outboard air when the port tank No. 7 was flooded, only an 
eighth of the expended air would have been used unproductively. 
To say that the system's effectiveness is low and that there 
would supposedly be a greater loss of air through the blown 
starboard tank is simply not serious. 
  10. ``The design does not foresee a system aboard the 
submarine for computerized documentation of events pertaining to 
calculation of stability and unsinkability, or an automated 
system producing recommendations to the leadership regarding 
damage control in major emergency situations. In addition to 
this, the submarine lacks instruments by which to monitor the 
submarine's static attitude in a disturbed sea (violation of the 
requirements of articles 9.2.5, 5.2.4 of the TPPL-75, and 
Articles 1.1.2.7, 5.2.2.8 of the OTT6.1.1-81). 
  The consequences: 
  1. An objective picture of the course of events in the 
accident situation could not be obtained. 
  2. The absence of a computer reduces the effectiveness 
of damage control and increases the time it takes to reach 
decisions in complex emergency situations. 
  3. The means of objectively monitoring change in the 
submarine's attitude are lacking, making it impossible for the 
GKP to correctly predict the submarine's behavior when water 
enters a compartment and the TsGB.'' 
The designer's conclusion: 
  1. Automated systems for solving unsinkability problems and 
for issuing damage control recommendations are absent from all 
submarines and surface ships of the navy. Instruments monitoring 
static attitude are absent as well. Moreover we have still not 
developed the concepts of creating these systems, and we have 
not conducted exploratory research on the design of such 
instruments. The navy has not issued the specifications for 
their design. All of the discussion concerning absence of these 
automated systems and instruments aboard the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' are directed at consciously and deliberately 
misleading public opinion. 
  2. The requirements of the TPPL-75 and OTT6.1.1-81 do not 
apply to the submarine ``Komsomolets'' for the reasons set forth 
in the conclusion regarding item 1 of the ``peculiarities,'' and 
any reference to them is wrong. As far as the essence of the 
issue is concerned, Article 5.2.4 of the TPPL-75 and Article 
5.2.2.8 OTT6.1.1-81, which present the requirements on designing 
the systems and instruments, have not been accepted by industry 
even for the design of submarines in the future. Article 9.2.5 
of the TPPL-75 and Article 1.1.2.7 of the OTT6.1.1-81 have no 
relationship to the issue under discussion here. 
  3. As for the ``consequences,'' the following needs to be 
said: 
  The attack center of the ``Komsomolets'' did nothing to 
study 
the objective information on the course of events in the 
accident situation. It did not monitor change in the ship's 
attitude, nor did it carry out any kind of calculations on 
change in its buoyancy and stability. All of this could have 
been done without a computer or special instruments. As a result 
of the attack center's inaction the loss of stability was a 
surprise to it. Given such an attitude toward the work, no 
computers could have helped. 
  The authors of the remark are concerned not with clarifying 
the true causes of the tragedy but only with finding plausible 
``evidence'' in order to conceal and justify the poor 
occupational training of the crew of the submarine 
``Komsomolets'', which is the sole cause of the tragedy. 
  11. ``The design does not foresee a system for 
monitoring the filling (blowing) of the submarine's TsGB. 
  The consequences: 
  This made it impossible to establish the causes of 
listing, or to monitor filling of TsGB Nos. 8, 9 and 10 when 
their airtightness was disturbed.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. The TPPL and OTT contain no requirements on installing 
systems aboard submarines for monitoring the filling of the main 
ballast tanks. The remark of the authors that such a system is a 
necessity is groundless. Not a single submarine of the navy has 
a system for monitoring the filling of main ballast tanks. Such 
that its absence from the ``Komsomolets'' is not a peculiarity 
of this submarine. Certain classes of submarines have systems 
that indicate completion of blowing of main ballast tanks. 
However, tank batch-blowing systems were introduced in 
submarines of more recent classes, and the need for installing 
systems indicating completion of blowing disappeared. 
  2. About the ``consequences'': The attack center could have 
clarified the causes of listing during repeat blowing of the end 
main ballast tanks, which was done at 1134, by visually 
observing the tanks from the bridge. This was not done. The 
cause of listing could have been clarified and filling of the 
ballast tanks could have been subsequently monitored by 
periodically introducing batches of air into them through diver 
tank blowing lines. This was not done either. In light of the 
above, it is clear that the ``consequences'' are totally 
fabricated, and that they do not reflect the facts of the matter. 
  12. ``Use of RAVA rubberized metal hoses, which have 
low resistance to temperature effects (around 150ëC), in the 
outboard water system. Absence of a device in the outboard 
system preventing entry of water into a compartment as a result 
of rupture of RAVA hoses (the requirements of Article VII-7 of 
the TPPL-67, Article 8.2.7 of the TPPL-75, and articles 1.3.3.1, 
1.3.3.6 of the OTT6.1.1-81 were violated). In addition there is 
nothing in the technical documents indicating to the personnel 
that RAVA hoses have low resistance to temperature effects. 
  The consequences: 
  RAVA hoses ruptured in response to fire and the 
elevated temperature in the compartment, which led to 
uncontrolled flooding of the compartment and loss of the 
submarine's longitudinal stability and buoyancy.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. There are no requirements of any kind in the TPPL and OTT 
on heat resistance of articles used aboard submarines. RAVA 
reinforced hoses are guaranteed to remain serviceable at a 
temperature of 150ëC for 30 minutes and at full working 
pressure, which are rather high characteristics for rubber 
articles. 
  2. The assertion that there are no devices in the outboard 
water system preventing entry of water into a compartment as a 
result of rupture of RAVA hoses is inconsistent with reality. 
There is a remotely controlled kingston valve at the intake of 
the cooling line of the stern-tube gland, and a check valve in 
the drain line, which cut off a damaged RAVA hose. 
  3. RAVA hoses are used aboard all submarines built in recent 
years, and their use aboard the ``Komsomolets'' is not unique to 
this submarine. 
  4. The assertion that the requirements of Article VII-7 of 
the TPPL-67 were violated is inconsistent with reality. The 
requirements of the TPPL-75 and the OTT6.1.1-81 do not apply to 
the submarine ``Komsomolets'' for the reasons set forth in the 
conclusion regarding item 1 of the ``peculiarities.'' As for the 
essence of the issue, Article 8.2.7 of the TPPL-75 and articles 
1.3.3.1, 1.3.3.6 of the OTT6.1.1-81 have not even been accepted 
for submarines of the future, because they are unrealistic (as 
regards mistakes of the personnel) and because of the 
requirements on operating conditions (pressure) are 
unsubstantiated. 
  5. The heat resistance characteristics of RAVA hoses are 
presented in documents given to the personnel based on 
K-909-045-ED1 (items 1049 and 1333). 
  6. As for the ``consequences'': 
  The operator at the main propulsion unit console did not 
fulfill requirements of articles 90 and 91 of the RBZh-PL-82 
with regard to sealing off the distressed compartment, and he 
did not close the remotely controlled kingston valve of the 
stern-tube gland's cooling system, which does not affect the 
submarine's propulsion; this resulted in entry of water into 
compartment 7 following rupture of the RAVA hose in response to 
the fire. The heat resistance of the RAVA hose has no relevance 
to this. 
  Because of the absence of the RBITS, this measure was not 
practiced by the ship's personnel in firefighting exercises; the 
``consequences'' dreamed up by the authors are inconsistent with 
the actual circumstances of the accident. 
  13. ``Low reliability of the electric power system and 
its components, especially of series AM and AM-M circuit 
breakers, the gap of which between the main contact securing 
pins is not checked during manufacture. 
  The submarine lacks a program supporting the 
reliability of technical resources (the requirements of Article 
2.3 of the OTT6.1.1-81 and Article 6.2.5 of the TPPL-75 were 
violated). 
  The consequences: 
  The low reliability of circuit breakers has resulted in 
emergencies aboard submarines on several occasions. Sixteen 
fires occurred aboard second-generation submarines in the period 
from 1971 to 1985 due to shorts in automatic AM and AM-M circuit 
breakers. Because of the absence of such a program, it is 
impossible to organize maintenance of high reliability of 
technical resources during operation.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. The assertion that the reliability of electric power 
equipment in systems in the submarine ``Komsomolets'' is low is 
not justified by anything, and is inconsistent with reality. Not 
a single failure of the electric power system as a whole or of 
its components was ever documented in over 5 years of operation. 
According to the Elektrosila Association the gap between the 
pins securing the main poles of series AM and AM-M circuit 
breakers is checked for its correspondence with shop drawings. 
The results are entered on the data card of each circuit breaker. 
  2. The requirements of the TPPL-75 and OTT6.1.1-81 do not 
apply to the submarine ``Komsomolets'' for the reasons set forth 
in the conclusion regarding item 1 of the ``peculiarities.'' 
  As for the essence of the issue: 
  The requirements regarding reliability of particular systems 
and of the submarine as a whole were satisfied by the designer 
by issuing specifications on new equipment with high reliability 
indicators, and with the large volume of experimental design 
work carried out by the equipment manufacturer, including 
manufacture of experimental models of this equipment. The 
requirements of the OST and GOST on designing these systems and 
devices were fulfilled by the designer during the planning of 
these systems and devices. All of this made it possible to 
guarantee high comprehensive reliability indicators in the 
specifications on the submarine ``Komsomolets''; the high 
comprehensive indicators of the reliability of the systems, 
equipment and the ship as a whole were confirmed by bench tests 
on experimental models of new equipment, which included testing 
for failure-free operation of this equipment throughout the 
entire time of continuous operation established by the 
specifications, and experimental operation of the submarine on 
the basis of a special program, to include a fully independent 
cruise. A log was developed and a spare set of equipment not 
used aboard other classes of submarines was delivered in order 
to keep the submarine's reliability high. The high reliability 
of equipment designed on the basis of the designer's 
specifications and of the submarine as a whole manifested itself 
during the accident, in the course of which all equipment and 
systems operated without failure until the last moment, and all 
safety and blocking systems foreseen by the design worked, which 
ensured automatic accident-free shut- down of equipment of the 
main propulsion unit, including the reactor and the main 
turbogear unit. 
  The designer drew up the following basic documents on the 
reliability of the submarine ``Komsomolets'': 
  design reliability justification K-020-556; 
  specific features of base support K-020-073; 
  equipment reliability indicators K-030-640; 
  technical crew calculations and justification K-030-631; 
  recommendations for developing the RBITS 21.GGK-E-478-82; 
  in accordance with the standard program for supporting 
submarine reliability No. 004-65-013, the navy should have 
developed a specific program, with the designer's participation, 
to support reliability during operation of the ``Komsomolets''. 
The program was not developed, and responsibility for this is 
borne by the navy's Main Directorate for Operation and 
Repair--the author of this remark, who scores no points for 
trying to dump the responsibility upon the designer. 
  3. About the ``consequences'': 
  Leaving aside the thoughts of the authors of the remark 
regarding electrical equipment of second-generation submarines 
as being irrelevant to the accident aboard the submarine 
``Komsomolets'', we need to say that in 5 years of operation of 
the ``Komsomolets'', no negative remarks were ever made 
regarding the work of series AM and AM-M circuit breakers. 
During the accident these circuit breakers provided for 
automatic disconnection of damaged networks, distribution panels 
and damaged electrical equipment, and ensured trouble-free 
operation of the electric power system until the submarine's 
demise. 
  The navy's Main Directorate for Operation and Repair failed 
to carry out the following basic measures to support high 
reliability of technical resources during operation of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'': 
  A reliability support program was not created; 
  a set of repair documents for planned preventive inspections 
and repairs to be carried out between cruises was not developed; 
  basing of the submarine in accordance with requirements of 
document K-020-073 was not provided for; 
  a technical crew was not organized for the submarine; 
  the operating cycle governing use of the submarine foreseen 
by the specifications was not maintained, as a result of which 
the ship set off on its cruise with part of the life of the 
equipment and systems expended (automatic systems, outboard 
fittings, gas analyzers). 
  In light of the above, the thoughts of the authors of the 
remark regarding the absence of any kind of ``program,'' which 
made it impossible to maintain ``high reliability of technical 
resources'' aboard the submarine ``Komsomolets'', are devoid of 
any grounds. 
  14. ``Flammable materials that are not heat resistant 
were used to trim compartment 7 (glue, thermal insulation etc.), 
Article V-4 of the TPPL-67, Article 3.5.10 of the TPPL-75, and 
Article 5.2.3.8 of the OTT6.1.1-81 were violated. 
  The consequences: 
  This resulted in swift development of the fire and an 
increase in the temperature in the compartment to 
800ëC.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. Materials corresponding to OST V5.9025-80 and the 
``Statute on Selection of Nonmetallic Structural Materials for 
Submarines'' No. 74-0450-06-78 were used to trim compartments of 
the submarine ``Komsomolets'', including compartment 7. They are 
all permitted for use in submarines. There are simply no other 
alternative materials that had been permitted for use in 
submarines. They are used to trim the compartments of all 
submarines of the navy, such that this is not a peculiarity of 
the ``Komsomolets''. 
  2. The assertion that Article V-4 of the TPPL-67 was 
violated 
is inconsistent with reality. As for the TPPL-75 and 
OTT6.1.1-81, these requirements do not apply to the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' for the reasons set forth in the conclusion 
regarding item 1 of the ``peculiarities.'' As for the essence of 
the issue: Article 5.2.3.8 of the OTT6.1.1-81, which were 
published to replace the TPPL-75, states: ``Structural, heat and 
sound insulating and finishing materials...must be only 
nonflammable or fire-retardant.'' This requirement was satisfied 
to a realistic extent aboard the submarine ``Komsomolets''. 
  3. The assertion that the materials used to trim compartment 
7 resulted in ``swift development of the fire and an increase in 
the temperature in the compartment to 800ëC'' is absurd. 
According to calculations, when there is a fire in the 
compartment, when the initial oxygen concentration in the 
atmosphere is nominal, and when air does not enter from without, 
the average compartment-wide temperature would be around 
200ëC. Intensive development of the fire (and not swift, as 
the authors of the remark assert) was the consequence of the 
high oxygen concentration in the compartment atmosphere due to 
its uncontrolled entry. Further entry of air into compartment 6 
out of the high-pressure air system due to incorrect actions 
taken by the submarine's command led to development of the fire 
and the increase in temperature in the compartment to 
800-900ëC (according to calculations) at a compartment 
pressure of 13 kg/cm[.sup]2[/]. 
  15. ``The SDS system is not equipped with the necessary 
protection from entry of contaminated air from a damaged 
compartment under high pressure into the ShDA system when the 
airtightness of VSD and SDS pipelines is disturbed (Article 
8.2.7 of the TPPL-75, Article VII-7 of the TPPL-67, and Article 
1.3.3.6 of the OTT6.1.1l-81 were violated). 
  The consequences: 
  This led to poisoning of personnel in compartments 5 
and 2 connected up to ShDA.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. The stationary breathing system (SDS) of the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' was developed in full correspondence with 
guidelines RD V5.5536-82, coordinated with the navy. Such 
systems were developed for all submarines according to the same 
principle, and it is not a peculiarity of the submarine 
``Komsomolets''. 
  2. The SDS system excludes the possibility of entry of 
contaminated air from a damaged compartment at high pressure 
into hose-type breathing apparatus even when the integrity of 
medium- pressure air and SDS lines is disturbed, because the SDS 
system is self-contained in each compartment, and the pressure 
in the medium- pressure air system is considerably higher than 
it could be in a damaged compartment. 
  3. The requirements of Article VII-7 of the TPPL-67 are 
satisfied in their full volume in the submarine ``Komsomolets''. 
The requirements of the TPPL-75 and OTT6.1.1-81 do not apply to 
the submarine ``Komsomolets'' for the reasons set forth in the 
conclusion regarding item 1 of the ``peculiarities.'' The 
essence of the issue: Article 8.2.7 of the TPPL-75 and Article 
1.3.3.6 of the OTT6.1.1-81 have not been accepted by industry 
even for designing submarines of the future, because they are 
unrealistic (as regards mistakes by personnel). 
  As for the ``consequences'': 
1. personnel of compartment 2 were poisoned as a result of the 
incorrect actions of the commander of this compartment, who 
connected the SDS to the medium-pressure air system according to 
the back-up procedure, and then the submarine's command, which 
disconnected the high- and medium-pressure mains without warning 
the personnel of compartment 2 of this; 
2. personnel in compartment 5 were poisoned because the 
commander of this compartment failed to monitor operation of the 
SDS system, which was receiving air from the damaged cofferdam 
No. 1 of the high-pressure air main, and the incorrect actions 
of the attack center, on the instructions of which air was cut 
off to the medium- pressure air system without the personnel of 
the compartments being notified. 
  Consequently the assertion of the authors of the remark that 
the absence of any kind of ``necessary protection'' resulted in 
the poisoning of the personnel is inconsistent with reality. It 
should be noted that among the measures to raise the reliability 
of personnel life support resources in emergency situations 
developed as a result of the accident, there are no measures for 
improving the SDS system. 
  16. ``The number of personnel calculated by the central 
design office serving as the designer was insufficient to 
service equipment in normal conditions, and absolutely not 
enough to carry out submarine damage control in times of 
accident. 
  The consequences: 
  Damage control was made difficult, and it was 
impossible to fulfill all of the requirements of the guidelines 
regarding damage control.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. According to the detail design the crew of the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' should have consisted of 41 persons, in which 
case the number of personnel in BCh-5 should have been 19 
officers and warrant officers. Without the consent of industry 
the navy increased the crew to 57 persons by its Directive No. 
730/2/00395 dated 23 April 1982; in this case the number of 
personnel in BCh-5 was increased by only one person. Apparently 
the navy felt that this number was fully sufficient for this 
department, which maintains technical resources and carries out 
submarine damage control. This same directive introduced the 
position of watch mechanical engineer, which was not justified 
by anything and which reduced the number of BCh-5 personnel 
serving watch in the compartments. Later on, four of 10 warrant 
officers of BCh-5 were replaced on the basis of naval directives 
by compulsory-service seamen, which significantly reduced the 
potentials of the BCh-5 in technical maintenance of the materiel 
and in ship damage control. Further addition of one officer and 
two seamen to BCh-5 could not compensate for the weakening 
suffered by this subdivision earlier. 
  It follows from this that the potential of BCh-5 was reduced 
and the number of personnel became ``insufficient'' not because 
the designer incorrectly calculated the size of the crew, but 
because the navy unjustifiably replaced warrant officers by 
compulsory- service seamen and increased the overall number of 
personnel without grounds. 
  Moreover the assertion of the authors of the remark 
regarding 
an insufficient number of personnel is not reinforced by any 
kind of calculations. Were the qualifications of the specialists 
adequate, the increase that was made in the crew size to 64 
persons would have been quite enough to maintain the submarine 
under normal operating conditions. Analysis of the personnel's 
actions during the accident showed that most of the crew did not 
participate in ship damage control, and that the main load of 
this fight was carried by only a few persons. 
  2. The submarine ``Komsomolets'' set off on its cruise 
without the full complement of personnel in the damage control 
division of BCh- 5 (Warrant Officer Yu. P. Podgornov had not 
been certified for independent control), which weakened the 
principal division of BCh- 5, responsible for damage control, 
even more. The requirement of Article 173 of the RBZh-PL-82, 
which prohibits a submarine from going to sea undermanned, was 
violated. 
  3. About the ``consequences'': 
  Analysis of damage control efforts aboard the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' shows that: 
1. The submarine's leadership used the commander of the damage 
control division for duties inconsistent with the prescriptions 
of Article 45, RBZh-PL-82, as a result of which neither the 
buoyancy and stability of the ship, nor expenditure of 
high-pressure air, nor pressure in the compartments was 
monitored, and competent actions were not taken in submarine 
damage control; 
2. Captain 1st Rank Ye. A. Vanin's crew did not have 
sufficient knowledge of the material of the submarine, and its 
combat training level was very low in regard to ship damage 
control; 
3. during the accident the submarine's attack center displayed 
passiveness in ship damage control efforts, and certain 
decisions that it did make were incompetent as a rule; 
  4. the attempt by the authors of the remark to transfer the 
blame for the outcome of the accident onto the designer is 
directed at concealing the low occupational and combat readiness 
of Captain 1st Rank Vanin's crew. 
  17. ``Low reliability of the ``Listvennitsa'' ship GGS 
and battery-free telephone communication. Breakdown 
(short-circuiting) of the corresponding cables in one of the 
compartments resulted in loss of internal ship communication 
(the requirements of Article 5.3.5 of the TPPL-75, Article 
5.2.4.2 of the OTT6.1.1-81 were violated). 
  The consequences: 
  Absence of communication made efficient leadership of 
submarine damage control practically impossible.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. The ``Listvennitsa'' loudspeaker communication system 
(GGS) is installed aboard all submarines of the navy, in 
connection with which this is not a peculiarity of only the 
submarine ``Komsomolets''. 
  2. ``Listvennitsa'' loudspeaker communication is installed 
as 
a requirement of the navy's Main Communications Directorate in 
spite of the opinion of the designer, who pointed out its 
shortcomings in comparison with the previously used ``Kashtan'' 
loudspeaker communication system. Without going into the 
technical side of the matter, I should say that the entire 
responsibility for the low reliability of the ``Listvennitsa'' 
loudspeaker communication system lies with the navy's Main 
Communications Directorate, which issued the specifications, 
financed and monitored the development of the loudspeaker 
system, and accepted it for the navy. 
  3. The assertion of the authors of the remark that breakdown 
(short-circuiting) of the corresponding cables in one of the 
compartments led to loss of communication via the battery-free 
telephone system is inconsistent with reality. There are full 
grounds for suggesting that telephone communication between 
compartment 5 and the attack center was lost due to incompetent 
use of this system (the distressed compartments were not 
disconnected at the switchboards). 
  4. The assertion of the authors of the remark that loss of 
communication made efficient leadership of submarine damage 
control practically impossible is inconsistent with reality, 
because all of the necessary and fundamental decisions and 
actions relating to ship damage control should have been carried 
out by personnel of compartment 3--that is, the compartment 
containing the attack center. This assertion by the authors of 
the remark is only an excuse for the inactivity of the 
submarine's command in damage control efforts. 
  18. ``The design does not foresee a system for 
relieving pressure from the distressed compartment in major 
accident situations (the requirements of Article 12.2.9 of the 
TPPL-75 were not fulfilled). 
  The consequences: 
  This led to fire in compartments 6 and 5 and gas 
contamination of compartments 2 and 3.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. Naval guidelines on designing submarines do not contain 
requirements on developing a special system for relieving 
pressure from a distressed compartment. Not a single submarine 
of the navy has such a system, and therefore its absence from 
the ``Komsomolets'' is not unique to the ship. 
  2. Article 12.2.9 of the TPPL-75 discusses relief of 
pressure 
by compressors in normal submarine operating conditions, which 
has nothing in common with the remarks here, and therefore the 
reference to it is incorrect. 
  3. In accordance with Article 275 of the RBZh-PL-82, the 
responsibility of developing recommendations on relieving 
pressure in each compartment of a surfaced and a submerged 
submarine of each class is assigned to the naval formations. 
These recommendations were obviously not drawn up, and they were 
not studied by the personnel of the ``Komsomolets'' during 
submarine damage control exercises. The absence of the RBITS 
from the ship also played a negative role. 
  4. The assertion of the authors of the remarks that the 
absence of a system for relieving pressure from distressed 
compartments led to the fires in compartments 6 and 5 and gas 
contamination of compartments 2 and 3 is inconsistent with 
reality. The fire and gas contamination of the compartments were 
caused by the failure of the submarine's command to fulfill the 
requirements of articles 89 and 121, and the failure of the 
personnel to fulfill articles 90 and 91 of the RBZh-PL-82 
regarding sealing off compartments, disconnecting high-pressure 
air and hydraulic system pipelines passing through the 
distressed compartment, and bleeding air reserves overboard from 
the damaged cofferdam No. 4 of the high- pressure air system. 
The absence of the RBITS and failure of the naval formation to 
fulfill the requirements of Article 275 of the RBZh-PL-82 
concerning development of recommendations on relieving pressure 
from compartments also played a negative role. 
  19. ``The VVD, VZU and VSD systems do not correspond in 
full volume to the requirements on maintaining viability of 
technical resources (Article 5.3.5 of the TPPL-75, articles 
5.2.4.2, 1.3.3.1 of the OTT6.1.1-81). 
  The consequences: 
  Loss of airtightness of the air systems led to swift 
development of a compartment-wide fire and a rise in pressure in 
compartments 7 and 6 and of temperature to 800ëC.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. The assertion of the authors of the remark that the high- 
and medium-pressure air and outboard air systems do not 
correspond ``in full volume'' to the requirements of maintaining 
the viability of technical resources is groundless and 
unspecific. These systems were built in full correspondence with 
OST V5.5057-79, and they satisfy all requirements of the navy. 
The air systems of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' do not differ 
from the systems of other third-generation submarines, and they 
are in no way ``unique.'' 
  2. The requirements of the TPPL-75 and the OTT6.1.1-81 do 
not 
apply to the submarine ``Komsomolets'' for the reasons set forth 
in paragraph 1 of the ``peculiarities.'' The essence of the 
issue: The requirements of Article 5.3.5 of the TPPL-75 and 
Article 5.2.4.2 of the OTT6.1.1-81 concerning system back-up 
were fully realized in the ``Komsomolets'', while the 
requirements of Article 1.3.3.1 of the OTT6.1.1-81 were not 
accepted by industry even to design submarines of the future 
because they are unrealistic (as regards mistakes by personnel). 
  3. The assertion of the authors of the remark that swift 
development of a compartment-wide fire occurred because the 
high- pressure and medium-pressure air and outboard air systems 
somehow ``do not correspond'' to requirements of the navy does 
not reflect the actual events: 
A. in the initial stage of the accident there was neither a 
swiftly developing nor a compartment-wide fire; 
B. an intense local fire was a consequence of the elevated 
oxygen concentration in compartment 7 due to uncontrolled 
delivery of oxygen into this compartment. Failure of the control 
room to fulfill the requirements of articles 89 and 121 of the 
RBZh-PL-82, and the incorrect decision to blow the aft group of 
main ballast tanks with air from the damaged cofferdam, caused 
rupture of the emergency blowing pipe and bleeding of air from 
it into compartment 7, and then caused loss of airtightness of 
high- and medium- pressure air and outboard air system pipelines 
and bleeding of air out of high-pressure air cofferdams No. 1, 3 
and 4, transforming a local fire into a compartment-wide one. 
The above assertions of the authors of the remark are aimed at 
covering up the incorrect actions of the attack center of the 
submarine ``Komsomolets''. 
  20. ``Valves of the emergency compartment pumping 
system are not equipped with manual control from adjacent 
compartments (the requirements of Article 12.2.21 of the TPPL-75 
were violated). 
  The consequences: 
  This made it impossible to use the pumping system to 
relieve pressure from the distressed compartments.'' 
  The designer's conclusion: 
  1. The emergency pumping system aboard the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' was built in accordance with the OST, and it did 
not differ in any way from similar systems aboard other 
submarines. The assertion of the authors of the remark that the 
design of the emergency pumping system is a ``peculiarity'' of 
the ``Komsomolets'' is inconsistent with reality. 
  2. The requirements of the TPPL-75 do not apply to the 
submarine ``Komsomolets'' for the reasons set forth in the 
conclusion regarding item 1 of the ``peculiarities.'' The 
essence of the issue: In accordance with requirements of Article 
12.2.21 of the TPPL-75, the compartment pumping valves must be 
equipped with manual control from adjacent compartments. Aboard 
the ``Komsomolets'', these valves had manual and hydraulic 
drives. The electro-hydromanipulator that controls the opening 
and closing of the compartment pumping valve is located in the 
adjacent compartment, and it provides for manual control out of 
the adjacent compartment, as is required by Article 12.2.21 of 
the TPPL-75. Thus the assertion of the authors of the remark 
that the designer did not fulfill this requirement is 
inconsistent with reality. 
  3. The ``consequences'' have the goal of covering up the 
inaction of the attack center of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' 
in containing the accident and fighting for the ship's survival. 
The decision to relieve pressure was made by the submarine's 
command at 1150--that is, at a time when the hydraulic system 
was disconnected and control over ship systems in the distressed 
compartments was lost, and pressure in the compartments attained 
13 kg/cm[.sup]2[/]. Under these conditions the pumping valve 
could be opened only by hand inside the distressed compartment, 
which was unrealistic. It should be noted that the RBZh-PL-82 
say nothing about preliminary opening of this valve in case of 
fire. Considering that this valve is designed as a check and 
stop valve, it would have been reasonable to include a statement 
to this effect. The absence of the RBITS and failure of the 
naval formation to fulfill requirements of Article 275 of the 
RBZh-PL-82 regarding development of recommendations on relieving 
pressure from distressed compartments played a negative role. 
<H5>  Postscript </H5>
  While this book was at the typesetters we became acquainted 
with B. A. Karzhavin's books ``Tayna gibeli linkora 
``Novorossiysk'' ''[The Mystery of the Sinking of the Battleship 
``Novorossiysk''] and ``Gibel lineynogo korablya 
``Novorossiysk'' '' [The Sinking of the Battleship 
``Novorossiysk'']. They returned me once again to the question 
of the roots of the tragedy of the submarine ``Komsomolets''. 
  In 1949, when the Italian navy was divided up, our country 
received the battleship ``Novorossiysk'' (formerly the ``Julius 
Caesar''). Surface unsinkability was practically lacking on this 
ship, and its stability did not correspond to norms of the USSR 
Navy. 
  In the 6 years that the battleship was on line, the naval 
leadership did nothing to correct these deficiencies. Documents 
on unsinkability and ship damage control were not even drawn up, 
and those that were available, were written in Italian. It was 
dangerous for the battleship to go to sea--it could sink as a 
result of any navigation accident in which water enters the ship. 
  On 29 October 1955 the battleship ``Novorossiysk'' sank as a 
result of an outside explosion while standing at the main base 
of the Black Sea Fleet. Over 600 men perished. 
  The government commission that investigated the 
circumstances 
of the sinking of the battleship turned out to be incapable of 
making the proper assessment of the inactivity of the navy's 
central structures--the main culprits of the tragedy. The proper 
conclusions were not made, and consequently shortcomings were 
not corrected in personnel work, in personnel combat training, 
in repair and technical maintenance of ships, in the work of the 
emergency rescue service, and in providing ships with damage 
control guidelines. 
  The tragedy of the submarine ``Komsomolets'' occurred 33 
years later, and once again for the same reasons. 
  Ships are sinking, people are dying, and the navy's central 
structures continue to pretend they have nothing to do with this. 
Footnotes 
  1. The newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, 8 August 1989. 
  2. The journal SOVETSKIY VOIN, No. 1, 1990. 
  3. The journal RODINA, No. 4, 1990. 
  4. Rear Admiral L. L. Belyshev, deputy chief of the Naval 
Main Ship Building Directorate, the journal MORSKOY SBORNIK, No. 
6, 1989. 
  5. SOBESEDNIK, No. 30, 1990. 
  6. The newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, 8 August 1989. 
  7. The newspaper SMENA, 29 July 1989. 
  8. The newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, 15 March 1990. 
  9. Bringing a crew up to the first line means officially 
confirming the readiness of a submarine crew for independent 
navigation and patrol duty. This is preceded by a theoretical 
course attended by the crew in the training center, its training 
under a program of shore training between cruises, and study of 
submarine material, instructions in manuals on operation of 
combat and technical resources of the ship and the organization 
of ship service, together with test cruises at sea and the 
passage of special tests, including in combat training and in 
organization of ship damage control. 
  10. The newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, 15 April 1989. 
  11. The newspaper SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA, 26 April 1990. 
  12. The newspaper SMENA, 29 July 1989. 
  13. The newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, 7 October 1989. 
  14. The newspaper LENINGRADSKAYA PRAVDA, 16 July 1989. 
  15. The newspaper IZVESTIYA, 15 January 1990. 
  16. LOKh--a chemical room fire extinguishing system aboard 
submarines. Freon is used as the fire extinguisher. Each 
compartment of a submarine contains a station of the LOKh 
system, from which fire extinguisher can be delivered into that 
or neighboring compartments. The system is used to put out large 
fires at any stage of their development. The command ``Deliver 
LOKh to compartment 7'' means deliver fire extinguisher to 
compartment 7 to put out a fire. 
  17. ``Listvennitsa''--code name given to the internal ship 
loudspeaker communication system installed aboard the submarine 
``Komsomolets''. 
  18. Line of defense--in an emergency, the attack center 
designates a line of defense--that is, it indicates the 
transverse bulkheads of the compartments that separate the zone 
of distress from the rest of the ship. At these lines of 
defense, the personnel seal off the bulkheads and plug the main 
pipelines passing into the damaged compartment. Constant 
monitoring of the airtightness of bulkheads and pipelines, the 
temperature of the bulkhead and pressure in the distressed 
compartment is established at lines of defense. 
  19. A quickly dismountable rack-and-pinion device is used to 
close bulkhead doors aboard submarines. In this case the 
reference is to the rack-and-pinion ring, which had to be turned 
until the recesses in this ring lined up with teeth on the door, 
after which the door could be opened. 
  20. VPL--air-foam fire extinguishing system. In this case 
the 
reference is to the liquid that forms after the foam settles. 
For greater detail about the system, see footnote 33. 
  21. IDA-59--self-contained breathing apparatus. To connect 
an 
unconscious person up to an IDA-59 means securing the mask over 
the victim's face, opening the oxygen bottle delivery valve, and 
verifying that the victim is breathing. For greater detail on 
the IDA-59, see footnote 37. 
  22. The newspaper SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA, 26 April 1990. 
  23. The journal MORSKOY SBORNIK, No. 6, 1989; No. 2, 1990. 
  24. The newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, 8 August 1989. 
  25. Here and subsequently, pressures are indicated in the 
values of a technical system of units (the 
meter-kilogram-force-second system of units), because all 
pressure measuring instruments aboard the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' were graduated on the basis of this system. 
  26. The newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, 7 October 1989. 
  27. The newspaper IZVESTIYA, 15 January 1990. 
  28. The newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, 13 May 1989. 
  29. The newspaper NA STRAZHE ZAPOLYARYA, 25 April 1989. 
  30. ShDA--hose-type breathing apparatus. It is intended for 
breathing by personnel in a smoky compartment atmosphere. Air 
for breathing is supplied from the ship's high- and 
medium-pressure air lines through a stationary breathing system. 
It permits limited movement of personnel connected to ShDA 
apparatus. ``Connect up to the ShDA'' means donning the face 
mask or starting to breathe air from the stationary breathing 
system. 
  31. SDS--ship stationary breathing system. Provides air for 
breathing to hose-type breathing apparatus (see above). Charging 
the SDS system means supplying air to it from the high- or 
medium- pressure air lines. 
  32. IP--the IP-6 self-contained breathing protective mask. 
Possesses an independent breathing support system. Used to 
protect respiratory organs from poisoned air at normal 
atmospheric pressure. ``To be connected up to an IP'' means 
wearing the IP-6 self-contained breathing protective mask. 
  33. VPL system--air-foam fire extinguishing system. Used 
aboard submarines to extinguish small local fires. A typical 
system consists of two air-foam emulsion preparing stations 
located in the end compartments, a line passing through all 
compartments, and hoses bearing dispensers (sprayers ) located 
in all compartments. The air-foam emulsion is delivered by air 
at a pressure of 15 kg/cm[.sup]2[/]. One of the system's 
stations is permanently connected to the line--that is, the VPL 
system is always ready for immediate use. When a damage control 
alarm is announced, the status of the stations of the VPL system 
is kept under constant observation. When the air-foam emulsion 
of the station connected to the line is used up, it is 
recharged. At this time the other of the system's stations 
standing in reserve is connected to the line. Stations are 
recharged and connected to the line during a damage control 
alarm without orders from the attack center. 
  34. TsVK--here, the digital computer system room. The TsVK 
room aboard the submarine ``Komsomolets'' is located in 
compartment 3, next to the control room. 
  35. When sending a radio message, a submarine must receive a 
message (an acknowledgement) from the addressee indicating that 
it had been received and correctly understood (decoded). The 
entry ``no acknowledgement'' means that messages confirming 
receipt of the distress signals by the addressee had not arrived. 
  36. SIZ--individual protective equipment, collective name of 
equipment used to protect the breathing organs of an individual 
from environmental effects. Regarding ShDA, see footnote 30. 
  37. IDA--IDA-59 self-contained breathing apparatus. Has a 
self- contained breathing support system. Used for underwater 
work and for work in compartments with high pressure and a 
poisoned atmosphere. 
  38. VSK--rescue chamber. Aboard the submarine 
``Komsomolets'' 
it was intended for the rescue of all personnel from a depth 
exceeding the submarine's maximum diving depth. It was equipped 
with limited life support resources, and it had its own electric 
lighting. 
  39. PDU--portable breathing device. Intended for short-term 
(around 10 minutes) protection of the personnel's respiratory 
organs in a smoke-filled compartment. Small in size. Each 
crewmember is obligated to always have a PDU with him when 
aboard a submarine. 
  40. SPS documents--secret business documents. 
  41. PGA-VPM--portable instrument for measuring the 
concentration of carbon monoxide in the atmosphere of 
compartments. Measurements are taken with indicator tubes for 
different concentrations of carbon monoxide through which 
compartment air is pumped. 
  42. RDO--radio message. All radio messages from a submarine 
are numbered. 
  43. RSP-30 mm--signal cartridges launched with a flare gun. 
  44. Regenerating cartridges--chemical substances used aboard 
submarines to regenerate air (restore its percent concentration 
of oxygen and carbon dioxide) in compartments. Made in the form 
of flat wafers contained in metallic soldered rectangular cans. 
The submarine ``Komsomolets'' had only an emergency reserve of 
regenerating cartridges. 
  45. The journal MORSKOY SBORNIK, No. 6, 1989. 
  46. The newspaper IZVESTIYA, 15 January 1990. 
  47. The newspaper IZVESTIYA, 15 January 1990. 
  48. The newspaper PODVODNIK ZAPOLYARYA, 20 April 1989. 
  49. From a report submitted by B. Z. Taubin to USSR People's 
Deputy A. F. Yemelyanenkov. 
  50. The newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, 19 April 1989; the 
journal 
SOVETSKIY VOIN, No. 1, 1990. 
  51. The newspaper KOMSOMOLSKAYA PRAVDA, 17 December 1989. 
  52. The journal MORSKOY SBORNIK, No. 7, 1990. 
  53. The newspaper IZVESTIYA, 15 January 1990. 
  54. The newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, 21 April 1989. 
  55. The newspapers SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA, LENINGRADSKAYA PRAVDA 
etc. 
  56. The journal SOVETSKIY VOIN, No. 1, 1990. 
  57. The newspaper SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA, 26 April 1990. 
  58. Ibid. 
  59. The newspaper SOVETSKAYA ROSSIYA, 26 April 1990. 
  60. The newspaper PRAVDA, 12 May 1989. 
  61. The journal SOVETSKIY VOIN, No. 1, 1990. 
  62. The journal MORSKOY SBORNIK, No. 2, 1990. 
  63. The newspaper IZVESTIYA, 3 September 1990. 
  64. The newspaper KRASNAYA ZVEZDA, 15 March 1990. 
  65. The newspaper SMENA, 15 April 1990. 

